Google 



This is a digital copy of a book that was preserved for generations on library shelves before it was carefully scanned by Google as part of a project 

to make the world's books discoverable online. 

It has survived long enough for the copyright to expire and the book to enter the public domain. A public domain book is one that was never subject 

to copyright or whose legal copyright term has expired. Whether a book is in the public domain may vary country to country. Public domain books 

are our gateways to the past, representing a wealth of history, culture and knowledge that's often difficult to discover. 

Marks, notations and other maiginalia present in the original volume will appear in this file - a reminder of this book's long journey from the 

publisher to a library and finally to you. 

Usage guidelines 

Google is proud to partner with libraries to digitize public domain materials and make them widely accessible. Public domain books belong to the 
public and we are merely their custodians. Nevertheless, this work is expensive, so in order to keep providing tliis resource, we liave taken steps to 
prevent abuse by commercial parties, including placing technical restrictions on automated querying. 
We also ask that you: 

+ Make non-commercial use of the files We designed Google Book Search for use by individuals, and we request that you use these files for 
personal, non-commercial purposes. 

+ Refrain fivm automated querying Do not send automated queries of any sort to Google's system: If you are conducting research on machine 
translation, optical character recognition or other areas where access to a large amount of text is helpful, please contact us. We encourage the 
use of public domain materials for these purposes and may be able to help. 

+ Maintain attributionTht GoogXt "watermark" you see on each file is essential for in forming people about this project and helping them find 
additional materials through Google Book Search. Please do not remove it. 

+ Keep it legal Whatever your use, remember that you are responsible for ensuring that what you are doing is legal. Do not assume that just 
because we believe a book is in the public domain for users in the United States, that the work is also in the public domain for users in other 
countries. Whether a book is still in copyright varies from country to country, and we can't offer guidance on whether any specific use of 
any specific book is allowed. Please do not assume that a book's appearance in Google Book Search means it can be used in any manner 
anywhere in the world. Copyright infringement liabili^ can be quite severe. 

About Google Book Search 

Google's mission is to organize the world's information and to make it universally accessible and useful. Google Book Search helps readers 
discover the world's books while helping authors and publishers reach new audiences. You can search through the full text of this book on the web 

at |http: //books .google .com/I 



o 



THE 



RATIONALE OF REWARD. 



BY 



JEREMY BENTHAM. 



/ 
J) 

LONDON: 
PUBLISHED BY ROBERT REWARD, 

8 WELLINGTON STREET, STRAND. 

1830. 



EcowM\^^'S»r 



/ 



> 



\^ 



v 



m ■■i^ 2/ ^9^} 



LONDON: 

rniNTBD BY C, AND W. BEVMELI., BROAD STREET OOLDBN SQUAKB. 



ADVERTISEMENT 



BY THE EDITOR. 



The liistory of the present work is some- 
what curious : it is extracted from two sets of 
manuscripts, differing considerably as to their 
arrangement; the one in French, and the 
other in English, written by Mr. Bentham 
between forty and fifty years ago ; and which 
do not appear to have been ever confronted 
together. 

Both these manuscripts, with Mr. Ben- 
tham's papers on Punishment, were, at the 
desire of M. Dumont, placed in his hands, 
and, together with some few additions from 
his own elegant pen, form the matter of the 
work published by him (at Paris in 1811) 
under the title of ThSorie des Peines et des 
Recompenses* Of this work three editions 
have been printed in France, and one in 
England ; the " Rationale of Reward'' occu- 
pies the second volume. 

In preparing it for its appearance before 
the English public, the Editor has taken the 



IV ADVERTISEMENT. 

above volume as the ground-work of his 
labours; but having availed itself, wherever 
it could, of the original manuscripts, his will, 
in many instances, not be found a literal 
translation of M. Dumont's work. 

The additions made by M. Dumont are 
marked out, where distinguishable, by appro- 
priate indications. One of these additions 
being at variance with Mr. ^entham^s present 
opinions, has given rise to the remarks which 
immediately follow. 

Editor. 



REMARKS BY MR. BENTHAM. 

" Catherine's Scale of Ranks :" — " Bentham 
or Dumont, on Pensions of Retreat?'' which 
you please. — You ask my present thoughts : — 
I am all obedience. Allow me only to name 
the place. Not in your work, but let it be 
in a sequel I am preparing for it. From that 
which you have so kindly made yours, those 
wicked thoughts would scare away readers, 
whom, if content with what you give them 
from my first friend, that sequel may have a 
chance for. In that production may be seen, 
not in description only, but in terminisj the 
arrangements, which, after from forty to fifty 
years for reflection, exhibit the practical^ — I 
do not say the now practicable — ^result of the 



ADVERTISEMENT. V 

principles of yours: and that^ cleared (forgive 
my saying so) of what now shows itself to me 
as dross. Nor yet will it draw readers from 
yours ;— for in yours alone will be found dis- 
cussions, explanations, and reasonings at 
length; in the new one (except where the 
opposite officially avowed principles are 
examined) little else than results. 

Official Aptitude maximized.; Expense mini-' 
mized. In these words you have the title of 
a plan of official economy and education 
that gives denomination to the whole, and an 
indication of the matter of the first and 
principal part. Send your readers, if you 
have any, to that work. There, with official 
economy, and official education, they may 
see national growing out of it — added, and 
that without need of additional description or 
expense. There, confronted with Radical, 
they may see Whig and Tory Economy, and 
take their choice. I say Whig and Tory; for 
these two are one. 

As to Catherine and her ranks, they rank 
not quite so high with me now as then. Pen- 
sions of retreat would be invited to make 
their retreat from your pages, were it not for 
my respect for editors and readers. In my 
own work may be seen a picture of them, 
painted in those colours which now appear 
to me their proper ones. 

" Revise ? '' Impossible : not to speak of 
my doing you more harm than good. In 



■* 



▼1 ADVERTISEMENT. 

the French alone, the " Pensions of Retreat '^ 
have already cost me — I had almost said lost 
me — more days than I can endure to think 
of: I who have so few left, and work enough 
left for a hundred times the number. What 
I have found possible, I have done, — looking 
over the titles of the chapters and sections 
(still in the French alone) and, in relation to 
them, submitting what appears to me an ap- 
propriate wording, together with some little 
alterations and additions which presented 
themselves to me as amendments. 



The other Work, mentioned in pages iv. and v., is in the Press. 



CONTENTS. 



Page 

Preliminary Observations . ... i 



BOOK I. 

OF REWARDS IN GENERAL. 



Chap. 1. Definitions . . . 

2. Matter of Reward — Sources 

3. Reward and punishment combined 

4. Union of Interest with Duty — Self-executing 

Laws . . . . 

5. Matter of Reward — Reasons for Husbanding 

6. Remuneration ex-post-facto 

7. Punition and Remuneration — ^their Relations 

8. Remuneration — where hurtful 

9. Remuneration — where needless 

10. Proportion as to Rewards 

11. Choice as to Rewards 

12. Procedure as to Rewards 

13. Rewards to Informers 

14. Rewards to Accomplices 

15. Competition as to Rewards 

16. Rewards for Virtue 

17. Accompaniments to Remuneration 



BOOK II. 

REWARD APPLIED TO OFFICES. 

Chap* 1 . Salary — how a Reward 
2. Rules as to Emoluments 
3. — 1. Fees and Perquisites — None 
4. — 2, Minimize Emolument 
5. — 3. No more Nominal than Real 



3 

7 

19 

24 

28 

37 

42 

54 

67 

70 

81 

93 

99 

104 

110 

125 

137 



143 
150 
161 
163 
167 



Vlll 



CONTENTS. 



Chap. 6.-4. Couple Burthen with Benefit 

7, — 5. By Emoluments exclude Corruption 
8. — 6. Give Pensions of Retreat 
9. Ofthe Sale of Offices 

10. Of Qualifications 

11. Of Trust and Contract Management 

12. Of Reforms 



Pag« 

169 
174 
178 
181 
189 
193 
198 



BOOK III. 

EEWARJD APPLIED TO ART AND SCIENCE. 

Chap. 1. Art-and-Science— Divisions . . . 203 

2. Art-and-Science — Advancement • .214 

3. Art-and-Science — Diffusion . . .217 



BOOK IV. 



REWARD APPLIED TO PRODUCTION AND TRADE. 

Chap. 1. Bentham and Adam Smith . • . 229 

2. Wealth and Happiness — Relation — Increase. 237 

3. Production is limited by Capital •. . 241 

4. Capitalist the best Judge of his own Interest . 243 

5. False Encouragements— 1. Loans . . 246 
6. — 2. Gifts, or Gratuitous Loans . . . 249 
7. — 3. Bounties upon Production . . .2.51 
8. — 4. Exemptions from Taxes on Production . 259 
9. — 5. Bounties on Exportation . . .261 

10.— 6. Prohibition of Rival Productions . . 266 

11. Fixation of Prices . . . 270 

12. Taxes — Effects on Production . . 273 

13. Population — forced increase Desirable ? . 279 

14. Colonies Desirable? .... 287 

15. Wealth — Means of Increase . . . 302 

16. Rate of Interest — Evils of Fixation . .321 



Appendix 

(A) On Subscriptions to Matters of Opinion . . 337 

(B) Mischievousness of Reward latent — Exemplifications 341 



ERRATA. 

Page iv, Une 2, for 'itself" read "himself/* 

— iv, — 3, for " it " read '' he." 

— 49, -^ 1, for '* remain" read '^ remains.*' 

— .. — 4, for " efficacious" read '' inefficacious." 

— .. — 25, for " they'* read " this." 

— 60, at the end of note add, ^* or only a part." 

— 69, — 41, for '' attained " read "retained." 

— 68, line 15, read, '^ with which it accompanies the 

other rewards it bestows." 
— 295, — \6, for ''support" read ''supplant.** 



PRELIMINARY OBSERVATIONS. 



The greatest happiness of the greatest mi mber ^ 
ought, to be the object of every legislator: for 
accompltsbing his purposes respecting this object, 
he possesses two instruments^^ — ^Punishment and ' 
Reward. The theories of these two forces divide 
between them, although in unequal shares, the 
whole field of legislation. 

The subject of the present work is Reward ; and 
not reward alone, but every other use which can 
be made of that matter of which rewards may be 
formed.* 

In the following work, the different sources 
from which rewards may be derived are examined ; 
the choice which ought to be made between the 
different modifications of which it is susceptible, 
is pointed out ; and rules are laid down for the 
production of the greatest effect with the least 
portion of this precious qiatter. 

* Every thing which can be given in the shape of reward 
may be called matter of reward. This abstract term is neces- 
sary^ since in many cases> without being rewards this matter 
may be employed for the same purposes as reward ; whilst 
there are other cases in which it ought to be employed for 
other purposes. 

1 



.«■ 



11 PRELIMINARY OBSERVATIONS. 

On the one hand, indication is given of the 
venom, more or less concealed, which is included in 
the employments which have too commonly been 
made of it; and an attempt has been made to take 
away from others certain imputations which the 
enthusiasm of virtue has cast upon them. 

The limits have been traced between the fields 
of Reward and Punishment; the springs of that 
mechanism developed from whence those laws 
arise to which the power is attributed of executing 
themselves, and directions given for that combi- 
nation of remedies, the sweet with the bitter, 
whereby so happy a union is produced between 
interest and duty. 

The advantages of a system of remuneratory 
procedure are pointed out ; an idea given of the 
course it ought to take ; and an enumeration made 
of the uses of the matter of reward which are not 
remuneratory. 

The nature and effects of salaries and other 
official emoluments are enquired into ; the na- 
ture and degree of the encouragement proper to 
be afforded to the arts and sciences is discussed ; 
and, finally, the question, — How far it is possible 
beneficially to apply artificial reward to the en- 
couragement of production and trade, is consi- 
dered. 



RATIONALE OF REWARD. 



BOOK I. 

OF REWARDS IN GENERAL. 



CHAPTER I. 

DEFINITIONS. 



Reward, in the most general and extensive 
sense ever given to the word, may be defined to 
be — a portion of the matter of good,* which in \ 
consideration of some service supposed or expected 
to be done, is bestowed on some one, in the intent 
that he may be benefited thereby.^ 

* A portion of the matter of good, and not a portion of good 
itself. The cause must be distinguished from the effect j — 
the means of obtaining pleasures or exemptions from pains^ 
from the pleasures or exemptions from the pains themselves. It 
is the former alone which the legislator has to bestow. 

t Or, since Reward, in a certain sense, is among the number 
of those names of ficfitious entities which cannot be expounded 
but by paraphrasis, it may be said, that — Reward is given to 
a man, when in consideration of some service supposed or ex- 
pected to be rendered by him, a service, which it is iiitended 
should be a service, is done to him. 

1. 



4 B. I. Ch. 1.— definitions. 

When employed under the direction of the prin- 
ciple of utility, it operates as a motive for the per- 
formance of actions useful to society, in the same 
manner as, under the same guidance, punishment 
operates in the prevention of actions to which we 
ascribe an injurious tendency. 

The services, in the production of whichthis 
precious matter may be employed, may be distin- 
guished into ordinary and extraordinary. 

Ordinary services maybe subdivided into regu- 
larly recurring, or routine and occasional. By rou- 
tine services^ I mean those which, in all the various 
departments of government, the public function- 
aries are bound to perform in virtue of their re- 
spective offices. 

By occasional services^ I mean those required by 
the government at the hands of persons not in its 
employ. They belong almost entirely to the ad- 
ministration of justice, and that branch of the 
police which is connected with it, — as denouncing 
offences, prosecuting criminals, giving judicial 
evidence, and seizing persons accused, &c. To 
the same head may be referred services rendered 
to individuals in case of fires, inundations, and 
shipwrecks: inasmuch as the government is inte- 
rested in the preservation of every individual in 
the community, these services may be considered 
as rendered to it. 

^'To the head of extraordinary services^ may be 
iSJfeprred, — 1. Services rendered to the whole com- 
munity by new inventions giving to the operations 
of government, in any of its different branches, an 
increased degree of perfection : such as important 
improvements in military or naval tactics, fortifi- 
cation or shipbuilding, &c.; in the mode of admi- 
nistering justice, regulating the police, or- the 



B. 1. Ch. I.— definitions. 5 

finances, or in any other part of the field of legis- 
lation. 

2. Services rendered in tiaie of war, by the 
seizure or destruction of objects contributing to 
the power of the enemy, or by the preservation 
of such as belong to one^s own country. 

3. Services rendered by persons exercising the 
office of foreign Ministers, consisting in th^ pre* 
vention or termination of the calamities of war, or 
in the bringing about useful alliances. 

4. Discoveries of great importance to the aug- 
mentation of the national wealth; new methods of 
abridging labour; the introduction of new branches 
of industry, &c. 

5. Discoveries in science, which are not suscep- 
tible of immediate application to the arts. 

6. Noble actions and distinguished instances of 
virtue: in considering which not only the imme- 
diate benefit should be regarded, but their influ- 
ence, as examples, upon the cultivation of similar 
excellencies. 

Such is the field of services: such, therefore, is 
the field of reward. 

With regard to rewards, the most important 
division is into occasional ^ud permanent. The 
first are applied, according to times and circum- 
stances, to a single individual, or to a number of 
individuals, in virtue of some insulated and spe- 
cific service. The others are charged upon some 
general fund provided for an indefinite number of 
persons, and for a succession of services. 

In consequence of the extent and permanence 
of their effects, it is principally with regard to the 
latter class of rewards that it will be found of 
importance to establish the true principles which 
ought to regulate their distribution. Occasional 
rewards being confined within narrower limits and 



b B I. Ch. I.— definitions. 

their effects more transitory, erroneous views re- 
specting them are comparatively of trifling conse- 
quence. 

The most extensive use of the matter of reward 
takes place in transactions between individuals. 
In the case of personal services which are performed 
in virtue of a contract, the pay given to him by 
whom they are rendered, is his reward. In buy- 
ing and selling, the reciprocal delivery is the re- 
ward for the mutual transfer. But the public, 
that is to say the government on account of the 
public, has a demand for a variety of services and 
goods exactly similar to those of which an indi- 
vidual stands in need: and it is thus that the 
most advantageous mode of employing the matter 
of reward, even in the ordinary course of business, 
enters into the sphere of politics, and claims the 
attention of the legislator. 



[ 7 ] 



CHAPTER 11. 

MATTER OF REWARD — SOURCES. 

f 

BetWeen the four objects — delinquency, pu- 
nishment, expenditure, and reward, there is a» 
intimate connection. He who knows thoroughly 
the nature and possible modifications of any one, 
knows thoroughly the nature and possible modifi- 
cations of all the rest. Why so ? because they 
are all of them but so many modifications of good 
and evil, — of the instruments or causes of pain 
and pleasure considered in a particular point of 
view. Whatever mischief being produced contrary 
to the will of the legislator, takes the name of an 
offence, the same when produced in pursuance of 
that will (so it be with a direct intention on his 
part that the party shall be a sufferer by it) takes 
the nao^ of punishment. Reward is to good, 
what punishment is to evil. Reward on one part 
supposes expenditure on the other. Whatever is 
received by one party on the footing of reward, is 
expended by some other. When a view then is 
given of the several possible modifications of 
offence, a view is at the same time given in reality, 
if not in name, of the several possible modifications 
of reward. 

This may at first sight appear a paradox ; but as 
the absence of good is comparatively an evil, so 
the absence of evil is comparatively a good: the 
notion therefore of evil, and of all sorts of evil, isf 
included in the notion of reward. 

The several modifications of the matter of re- 
ward, may be comprised under four heads :— • 



\ 



8 B. I. ch. 11.— matter of reward— sources. 

1. The matter of wealth ; 2. Honour ; 3. Power ; 
4. Exemptions. In respect of the employment of 
the direct mode for affording pleasure, it belongs not 
properly to political,* but to domestic government 
or education. 

1 • The matter of wealth. Money or money^S" 
worth is by much the most common stuff of 
which rewards are made ; and in general the most 
suitable of which they can be made : why it is so 
will appeal^ hereafter. 

S. Honour. Honour may be made out of any 
stuff. In some cases, it i^ produced by the beat* 
ing H particular title not hereditary — as the natne 
of the office a man holds. In other cases, it is 
beredftary, and places the individuals bearing it 
in a difiTtinct rank, superior to that of the other 
elasses-^as in the case ^ the nobility. In other 
cases, it is unaccompanied with any distinguishing 
denomination, orany particular title — as in the case 
of medals, or public thanks conferred after any great 
victory, in the natne of the king and parliament. 

A gradtuUed scale of ranks, especially when its 
gradations are determined by merit, and depend 
upon actual service, id an excellent institution. 
It creates a new source of happiness, by means of 
a tax upon honour, almost itnperceptibte to those 
by whom it is paid — ^it augments the suOi of 
hu'man enjoyment—it inerealses the power of 
Government, by clothing its authority with benig- 
nity — it opens new sources for the exercise of 
hope^ the most precious of all possessions ; and it 

* Whether wisely or not, it is> however, in some coantriei 
employed by the Government itself. Under the Consulate 
Government of France, f&tes were given at the expense of the 
Government in each year, on what were called the jours compli-- 
inerUaires, The principal part of the expense of the Opera at 
F^ris, is said now to be defrayed by the government. 



B. I. Ch. Ilr-MATTER OF REWARD— SOURCES. 9 

nourishes emulation, the most powerful of all 
incentives to virtuous actions. 

Such a graduated scale of ranks has, at all times, 
been in use in the military branch of the public 
service. But in this case, the principal object is 
not honour, but power— superiority in rank is in- 
variably accompanied by superiority in command. 
The honour which accompanies the power is but 
an accidental appendage. 

Catherine II. extended the application of this 
arrangement to the civil service. She distributed all 
the public officers in the civil department into dis- 
tinct, aiid even numerical classes, corresponding 
with the distribution of rank in the army ; — secre- 
taries, judges, physicians, academicians, all the 
civil functionaries, being advanced by steps, a per- 
petual state of emulation and of hope stimulated 
their labours throughout the whole course of their 
career. It was an invention in politics, which 
matches the most ingenious discovery in art that the 
present century has witnessed. Atone stroke, with 
out violence or injustice, hereditary nobility was de- 
prived of the greater part of its injurious preroga- 
tives. The foremost in rank and wealth began 
his career at the lowest step : his ascent through 
each gradation depending upon the appointment 
of the sovereign, if without merit, he was left 
behind, while men of the most obscure birth took 
precedence of him. This engine was the more 
powerful from the gentleness with which it ope- 
rated^ The simple non-collation of reward, per- 
forming the office of punishment. ' 

Another advantage gained by the transference 
of the denominations of the military ranks into the 
civil service is, that the respect borne by the military 
to the civil functionaries, is thus in no small 
degree increased. It is an ingenious artifice for 



10 B.I. ch. II.— matter of reward— sources. 

conquering the barbarous and absurd contempt 
for civil functions which prevails in all military 
governments. The assimilation of ranks naturally 
leads to the assimilation of respect. From the 
time that this arrangement was made, the nobi- 
lity were seen eagerly to engage in offices, which 
before they had regarded with disdain. 

Orders of knighthood appear like floating frag- 
ments detached from some such regular system of 
honorary rewards. 

In some states, an order of knighthood has been 
established under the title of " The Order of Merit J^ 
It might be supposed, that this order had been es* 
tablished as a jest, by way of satire upon all other 
orders: not so, however: whatever ridicule there 
may be falls exclusively upon those who are 
members of this order : of all orders it is the 
least distinguished : the nobility are not candidates 
for admission ; they consider it derogatory to their 
hirth. It is the reward of, it may be purchased by, 

service. 

The higher ranks of knighthood, are they to be 
considered as rewards ? Are they public rewards ? 
To this question it appears difficult to give a de- 
cisive answer. They are bestowed for so great a 
variety of reasons, that to give any description of 
them, which shall be applicable to all cases, is 
impossible. They are sometimes given for the 
performance of distinguished services ; but much 
more generally to courtiers and men of rank, who 
are the companions of the sovereign, to increase 
the splendour of his court. In these cases, the 
merit proved is, that the individual has made him- 
self agreeable to the sovereign. But if persons 
thus; decorated claim distinctions not belonging to 
other members of the community ; if every one 
must yield them precedence, ought not some pub- 



B. I. ch. II.— matter of reward— sources. 1 1 

lie reason to be given for creating this superiority, 
for this comparative degradation of the largest por- 
tion of the community ? Ought such drafts upon 
the respect of the public to be drawn in favour of 
an individual, till it has been shown that he has 
rendered services to entitle him to this special 
homage ? When thus conferred, is not a resource 
that might yield important fruits employed witli 
bad economy ? We shall return to this sub-p 
ject. 

3. Power. The principles which ought to re- 
gulate the distribution of this great object of hu- 
man desire, belong to the head of constitutional 
law, rather than to our present subject. Power is 
created for a purpose altogether different from that 
of serving as matter of reward^ Merit is not the 
only consideration by which its distribution must 
be governed. ^. 

Under a monarchical government, for example, 
the inconveniences attending the. election of a 
king may be so serious, that the supreme power 
ought to be attached to some qualification more 
manifest and indispensable than the personal merit 
of an individual. In a mixed government, also, 
in which there is a chief magistrate, and a body of 
hereditary nobles invested with certain powers, it 
may be thought proper that this body should be 
composed of many members ; but the more nume- 
rous, the less susceptible is it of that sort of selec- 
tion which supposes in each individual distin- 
guished merit. 

Thus far, however, we may determine in general, 
viz. that power wherever it cin be employed with- 
out inconvenience, as matter of reward, ought to 
' be so employed. 

In thus using it, the difficulty is to select any 
act or event that shall serve as evidence of the ca- 



12 a I. ch. II.— matter of reward— sources. 

pacity of individuals, for exercising the power with 
which they may come to be invested. In public 
employments, for example, how various are the 
talents required, for the possession of which no 
single act can be considered as satisfactory evi- 
dence. Were this not the case, the greater num- 
ber of public employments might be conferred as 
rewards for the performance of some determinate 
service, respectively relating to them. 

In the Gazette, notices might be given, couched 
in the following terms, — " Whoever produces the 
most perfect die, shall be placed at the head of the 
Mint.'^ — " Whoever produces a model of the most 
serviceable piece of artillery, shall be placed at the 
head of the Ordnance.'^ — " He who constructs the 
swiftest sailing vessel, united with the most per- 
fect means of attack and defence, shall be placed 
at the head of the naval architecture.'* — " The 
author who writes the best treatise upon com- 
merce, finances, or the art of war, shall be placed 
at the bead of the Board of Trade; shall be first 
lord of the Treasury, or Commander-in-Chief, 
respectively. He who writes the best treatise on 
the laws, shall be made Chancellor.'* 

At first view, nothing can be more captivating 
than such a plan ; but upon the slightest examina- 
tion it will be found more specious than solid. 
Why ? because it is by no means uncommon for a 
man who is in an emiment degree endowed with 
one of the qualities requisite, to be altogether desti- 
tude of others equally indispensible. 

There, are, besides, cases in which even this im- 
perfect mode of proof is altogether wanting. Dur- 
ioga long period of tranquillity, by what describable 
service can a military man display his talents for 
command ? Among the qualities most essential 
for such a duty, presence of mifid. enlarged views, 



B. I. ch. h.— matter of reward— sources. 13 

• 

foresight, activity, courage, perseverance, personal 
influence^ &c.. &c. ; by what specific act can an 
oflScer who has seen no service, show himself to 
be possessed of any of these qualifications ? We 
are reduced then to mere conjecture. The best 
founded opinions are drawn from his habits of 
life, his attachment to his profession, and above 
all the confidence reposed in him by those who are 
engaged in the same profession, whose opinion is 
founded upon a multiplicity of acts, which in the 
aggregate constitute his character. 

Discernment, or the art of judging of individual 
capacity, is a rare quality, whose use it is impos- 
sible to supersede by general rules. 

A slight advance might perhaps be made in this 
difficult art, did we possess a catalogue of the in- 
dications of talents or capacity y as connected with 
the various departments of state.* 

* For the illustration of the ideas of the author upon this 
subject^ I had prepared a note> in which I had collected toge- 
ther various instances of the prompt display of that subtle and 
penetrating talent which detects the possession of qualities^ un- 
discernible to ordinary eyes. To avoids however, engaging in 
too long a discussion, I shall confine myself to a single instance. 
A person well acquainted with anecdotes relating to the Rus- 
sian court, gave me, while I was at Petersburgh, the follow- 
ing account of tbe origin of the success of the High Chancellor 
.Besborodko. — Being still in a subordinate office belonging to 
the Chancery, one cky, when he had presented various Ukases 
to the empress, (Catherine II.) he perceived that he had for- 
gotten to compose one that he had been particularly com- 
manded to prepare." His first alarm being over, he determined 
how to act, and pretended to read the Ukase in question, 
though he held in his hand only a sheet of blank paper. The 
empress was s6 well satisfied with the performance, that she 
desired to sign it immediately. The disconcerted ckrk wias 
coinpelled to acknowledge his neglect. Tbe empress, less 
offended with the imposition than struck by the presence of 
mind which it displayed, forthwith placed him at the head of 
the department, in which before he had held only a subordinate 
situation. — Dumont 



I' 



14 B. I. ch. II.— matter of reward— sources. 

4. Exemptions. — The legislator creates two sorts 
of evils ; he appoints punishment for offences ; he 
imposes burthensome duties upon the various 
members of the community. Hence, exemptions 
may be of two kinds: — exemptions from punish- 
ment already incurred, — exemptions from civil 
buthens. 

An exemption from punishment already incur- 
red, is a pardon ; — pardons have often been given 
in the way of reward, that is, in consideration of for- 
mer services. Such acts cannot be foreseen and 
provided for by anticipation : they are the result of 
the discretion entrusted in this behalf to the so- 
vereign. 

Under the English law, however, there are in- 
stances in which, by anticipation, exemption from 
punishment is granted, that is to say, before the 
punishment is inflicted. Thus, from the policy or 
weakness of the temporal sovereign, the English 
clergy obtained in times of barbarism an exemption 
in all cases from capital and several other kinds ot 
punishment ; an exemption which being by statute 
lawconfined, in regard to causes on the one hand, 
while by common law it was extended, with regard 
to persons on the other, has left this part of the pe- 
nal branch of the law in the confusion under which 
it still labours.* 

The nobility followed the example of the 
clergy. In almost every country of Europe they 
have found themselves invested with exemptions 

* In Poland^ the poor gentlemen serve as domestics to the 
wealthy nobility : they perform without scruple all the menial 
offices that are reckoned by us as most degrading. There was 
only. one thing about which they were solicitous^ and which 
•distinguished them from the class of slaves : it was that they 
should not be beaten except when stretched upon a" mat- 
truss. 



B. I. ch. II.— matter of reward— sources. 15 

of this nature. Ancient Rome set the example. 
No citizen could be put to death. Verres, con- 
victed of the most atrocious crimes, atoned for 
them by enjoying at a distance from Rome the 
fruits of his plunder. 

When Catherine II., empress of Russia, con- 
vened together deputies from all the provinces of 
that immense empire, under the pretence of their 
assisting in the formation of a code of laws (a sort 
of parody of the legislative assemblies of free 
states, wliich was not however without its use, in 
so far as it contributed to the spread of enlightened 
ideas) she conferred upon them, amongst other 
privileges, an exemption from all corporal punish- 
ment, cases of high treason excepted. This spe- 
cies of distinction, which as a reward for legis- 
lators, could scarcely be imagined in any other 
state than one just emerging from a state of bar- 
barism, ))ad doubtless for its object the increasing 
their self importance, and the conferring upon them 
a sort of rank which should last beyond the dura- 
tion of their duty. 

As a man may be punished in his person, his 
reputation, his property, in like manner, through 
necessity and not with the view of punishing him, 
he may be burthened. An exemption from a bur- 
then is an exemption from the obligation of ren- 
dering service : services are either services of sub- 
mission, in the rendering of which the will of the 
party has no share, or services of behaviour. 

Of exemption from services of submission, not 
exacted iti the way of punishment^ we shall not 
find a great variety of examples. In Great Britain, 
members of the upper house of parliament and 
other peers constantly, and members of the lower 
house, at certain periods, are exempted from ar- 
rests: this privilege they may be considered avS 



16 B. L Ch. II.— matter of REWARDS-SOURCES. 

enjoying partly on the ground of satisfaction, 
partly that they may not be diverted from the 
exercise of their functions, and partly because, 
being members of the sovereign body, they w^ould 
have it so. 

Among services performed by action, are some 
which may be styled services of respect. It is a 
service of respect exacted by usage in every king^ 
dom in Europe not to wear a hat, or what is equi- 
valent, in the presence of the king. In Spain, some 
families among thie nobility enjoy the privilege of 
remaining covered in the presence of the king. In 
Ireland the head of one family (the family of the 
De Courcys, earls of Kinsale) enjoys the like 
exemption, as a reward for some service rendered 
by an ancestor. 

By a British statute, he who apprehends and 
prosecutes to conviction, a criminal of a certain 
description, received amongst other rewards an 
exemption from parish oflSces, together with the 
privilege of transferring that exemption to ano- 
ther. 

By other British statutes, persons who have 
borne arms for a certain length of time in the ser- 
vice of the state, were exempted from the obligation 
of those laws which, lest industry should be too 
common, forbade a man from working for his own 
benefit at a trade at which he had not worked 
seven years for the benefit of another. 

There are various other exemptions of the same 
nature : but as the object here is not to give an 
exhaustive view of these several exemptions, but 
merely a few instances to serve by way of example, 
the above specimens may suffice. 

One general observation applies to all cases of 
exemptions from general obligations imposed by 
law : it is, that the more severe the laws the 



B. I. ch. ii.— matter of REWARD-'-SOURCES. 17 

more abundant, as drawn from this source, is the 
fund of reward. It may be created by a mere act 
of restitution, by the rendering of justice : to some 
may be given what ought to be left for all : condi- 
tions may be annexed to what ought to be given 
gratuitously. The greater the mass of injustice 
inflicted, the greater the opportunity for gene- 
rosity in detail. The oppressive government of 
one sovereign is a mine of gold to his successor. 
In the church, it is the good works of their prede- 
cessors — in the state, it is their bad works, that 
increase the treasure of their successors. In 
Russia and in Poland emancipation is a very 
distinguished reward. A tyrant may reward by 
doing le^ mischief. 

One word on the last article of reward — 'Plea* 
sures. Punishment may be applied in all shapes 
to all persons. Pleasure, however, in the hands of 
the legislator, is not equally manageable: pleasure 
can be given only by giving the means by which 
it is purchased : that is to say, the matter of wealth 
which every one may employ in his own way. 

Among certain barbarous or half civilized na- 
tions, the services of their warriors have been 
rewarded by the favours of women. Helvetius 
appears to smile with approbation at this mode of 
exciting bravery. It was perhaps Montesquieii 
that led him into this error, in speaking of the 
Samnites, among whom the young man declared 
the most worthy selected whomsoever he pleased 
for his wife, he adds that this custom was calcu- 
lated to produce most beneficial effects. Philoso- 
phers distinguished for their humanity; both of 
them good husbands and good fathers, both of 
them eloquent against slavery, how could they 
speak in praise of a law which supposes the 
slavery of the best half of the human species ? 



18 



B. I. Ch. II.— matter of REWARI>--S0URC££|« 



How could they have forgotten that favours not 
preceded by an uncontrolled choice, and which 
the heart perhaps repelled with disgust, afforded 
the spectacle rather of the degradation of wo- 
man than the rewarding a hero ? The warrior 
surrounded by palms of honour, could he descend 
to act the part of a ravisher? And if he disdained 
this barbarous right, was not his generosity a 
satire on the law ?* 

Voltaire relates with great simplicity that at the 
first representation of one of his tragedies, the 
audience, who saw the author in a box with an 
extremely beautiful young duchess, required that 
she should give him a kiss, by way of acknow- 
ledging the public gratitude. The victim, a par- 
taker in the general enthusiasm, felt apparently no 
repugnance to make the sacrifice: and, without 
the intervention of the magistrate, we may trust to 
the enthusiasm of the sex^ and their passion for 
distinction, for preferences that may animate cou- 
rage and genius in their career. 

* In the Koran^ Mahomet permits to his followers to add to 
the number of their concubines^ which otherwise is limited^ 
the captives whom they can take in battle. It was not thus 
the Scipios and Bayards made use of their victories. Such is 
the difference between barbarism and civilization. 






[ 19 ] 



CHAPTER III. 



OF REWARD AND PUNISHMENT COMBINED. 

There are some cases in which it would be 
improper to employ either reward or punishment 
alone. They are those in which the two forces 
may with advantage be united : in which the legis- 
lator says to the citizen — obey, and you shall 
receive a certain reward: disobey, and you shall 
suffer a certain punishment. 

The two modes may be properly united when 
the service required by the law depends for its 
performance upon a small number of persons in 
virtue of the peculiar circumstances in which they 
happened to be placed. If, for example, the object 
be the securing a delinquent at the moment that 
he is about to commit an offence, to inform against 
him or to prosecute him — it will be found expe- 
dient in order to ensure the rendering of such 
services, to combine with a reward for their perfor- 
mance, a punishment for their omission. 

In such cases, punishment is useful in two ways: 
beside the effect produced by its own force, it also 
sustains the value of the reward. There is a very ^ 
strong prejudice in the public mind against persons 
who accept pecuniary reward for the performance 
of such services ; but when a penal motive is added, 
the public resentment is abated, if not altogether 
removed. The ]R*osecution of a criminal for the 
sake of the pecuniary benefit derivable from ft is 
generally regarded as discreditable ; but he who 
undertakes the prosecution to avoid being himself 
punished, will be considered at least as excusable. 

9. 



20 B.I. Ch. III.— reward and punishment combined. 

The desire of self-preservation is called a natural 
propensity, that is to say is regarded with appro- 
bation. The desire of gain is a propensity not less 
natural, but in this case, although more useful, it 
is not regarded with the same approbation. This is 
a mischievous prejudice, but it exists, and it is 
therefore necessary to combat its influence. We 
must treat opinions as we find them, and not act as 
though they were what they ought to be. This is 
not the only instance in which it is necessary to put 
a constraint upon men^s inclinations, that they may 
be at liberty to follow them. 

An instance of the judicious mixture of reward 
and punishment is furnished by the practice pursued 
in many schools, called challenging. All thescholars 
in the same class having ranged themselves around 
the master, he who stands at the head of the class 
begins the exercise : does he malce a mistake, the 
next to him in succession corrects him and takes 
his place ; does the second not perceive the mis- 
take, or is he unable to correct it, the privilege 
devolves upon the third, and so of the test. The 
possession of the first place entitling the holder to 
certain flattering marks of distinction. 

The two incitements are in this case most care- 
fully combined. Punishment for the mistake : loss 
of rank. Reward for the informer : acquisition of 
that same rank. Punishment for not informing : 
loss of rank the same as for the offence itself. 

If, under the ordinary discipline of schools, in 
the case where the scholar has no natural interest 
which should induce him to point out the mistakes 
of his associate, it were attemptQ^l to produce these 
challenges by the force of reward alone, the opi- 
nion which the general interest would create 
would oppose an obstacle to the reception of the 
reward most difficult to overcome: but when the 



B. I. CH. HI.— REWARD AND PUNISHMENT COMBINED. 2 1 

young competitors have to say in their defence, 
that they have depressed their neighbour merely 
to avoid being depressed themselves, they are re- 
lieved from all pretence for reproach : every one 
without hesitation abandons himself to the sugges- 
tions of his ambition, and, under the sanction of the 
law, honour combats with unrestrained impetuo- 
sity. 

This ingenious expedient for exciting emulation 
is one among the other advantages of numerous 
classes. In the private plan of education there are 
seldom actors in sufficient number for the perfor- 
mance of this comedy. 

The most favourable opportunities for legislation 
are those in which the two methods are so com- 
bined, that the punishment immediately follows 
the omission of the duty, and the reward its per- 
formance. 

This arrangement presents the idea of absolute 
perfection — why ? Because to all the force of the 
punishment is united all the attractiveness and 
certainty of the reward. 

I have said certainty : but this requires to be 
explained. Denounce a punishment {ot such or 
such acts: the only individual who cannot fail to 
know whether or not he has incurred the f)unish- 
ment is interested in concealing his having in- 
curred it. On the other hand, offer a reward, and 
the same individual finds himself interested in 
producing the necessary proofs for establishing his 
title to it. Thus a variety of causes contribute to 
the failure of punishment — the artifices of the per- . 
son interested, the prejudices against informers, the ^ 
loss or failure of evidence, the fallibility or mis- / 
taken humanity of judges — while to the attain- 
ment of reward no such obstacles occur: it ope- 
rates then upon all occasions with the whole of its 
force and certainty. 



</ 



22 B. I. ch. III.— reward and punishment combined. 

Before a celebrated law, which we owe to Mr. 
Burke, the lords of the treasury were charged, as 
they still are, with the payment of the salaries of 
certain of the public servants. Justice required 
that all should be paid in the same proportion as 
funds for that purpose were received. But no law 
was as yet in force to support this principle. As 
might naturally be expected, all sorts of preferences 
had place. They paid their friends first, and it can- 
not be supposed they forgot themselves. When 
the funds set apart to this service were insufficient, 
the less favoured class suffered. The delays of 
payment occasioned continual complaints. How 
would an ordinary legislator have acted ? He 
would have enacted that every one should be paid 
in proportion to the receipts, and that his regula- 
tions might not be wanting in form, he would have 
added a direct punishment for its breach ; without 
enquiring if it were easy to be eluded or not. Mr. 
Burke acted differently : he arranged the different 
officers in classes; he prepared a table of preference, 
in which the order is the inverse of the credit which 
they might be supposed to possess. The noble 
lords, with the prime minister at their head, bring 
/ up the rear, and are prohibited from touching a 
single shilling of their pay till the lowest scullion 
has received every penny of his. 

Had he permitted these great officers to pay 
themselves, and prescribed his table of preference 
for the rest, under the penalty of losing a part of 
their salaries, what embarrassment, what difficul- 
ties, whatdelays 1 Who would undertake the odious 
task of informer? How many pretences of justifi- 
cation would they not have had ? Who would have 
dared to attack the ministers ? In this arrange- 
ment of Mr. Burke, till they have fulfilled their 
duty, they lose the enjoyment of all their salary; 
they lose it without enquiry and without embar- 



B.:i. ch. III.— reward and punishment combined. 23 

rassment. Thus rendered conditional, their salary 
becomes in reality the recompence of their regula- 
rity in paying the others. 

The advantages of this invention may be thus 
summed up. Their salary, depending upon the 
performance of the service, is no longer a barren 
gratification, but a really productive reward. The 
motive has all the/ore^ belonging to punishment : 
by the suspension of payment it operates as a fine. 
It possesses all the certainty of a reward: the 
right to receive follows the completion of the ser- 
vice, without any judicial procedure. 



[ 24 ] 



CHAPTER IV. 

or THE UNION OF INTEREST WITH DUTY, AND 
OF SELF-EXECUTING LAWS. 

f 

. What has been said in the preceding chapter 
will seem to elucidate the meaning of the above two 
expressions, which, though in familiar use with 
political writers, have never yet been completely 
explained. 

The legislator should, say they, endeavour to- 
unite interest with duty: this accomplished, they 
consider perfection as attained. But how is this 
union to be brought about ? What constitutes it ? 
To create a duty and aflSx a punishment to the 
violation of it, is to unite a man^s interest with his 
duty, and even to unite it more strongly than by 
any prospect of reward. But this is not, univer- 
sally at least, what they mean; for if punishment 
alone were sufficient for the establishment of the 
desired connection between interest and duty, 
what legislator is there who would fail in its ac^ 
complishment ? What would there be to boast of 
in a contrivance which surpasses not the ingenuity 
of the most clumsy politician ? 

In this phrase, by the word interest, pleasure or 
profit is understood ; the idea designed to be ex- 
pressed is, the existence of such a provision in the 
law as that conformity to it shall be productive of 
certain benefits which will cease of themselves so 
soon as the law ceases to be observed. 

In a word, the union in question is produced 
whenever such a species of interest can be formed 
as shall combine the/ore^ which is peculiar to pu- 



B. I. Cii. IV.^UNION OF INTEREST WITH DUTY, &t. 25 

nifihment with the certainty which is peculiar to 
reward. 

This connection between duty and interest, is to 
a high degee attained in the case of pensions and 
places held during pleasure. Let us suppose, for 
exanaple, that 'the continuance of the pension is 
made to depend upon the holder's paying at all times 
absolute obedience to the will of his superior. The 
pensioner ceases to give satisfaction — the pension 
ceases; there are none of the embarrassments and 
uncertainties attendant on ordina^ procedure, f^t 
There are no complaints of disobedience made 
Against persons thus circumstanced. It is against 
the extreme efficacy of this plan, rather than against 
its weakness, that complaints are heard. 

In some countries, by the revenue laws^ and par-> 
ticularly in the case of the custom-house duties, ^' 
it is not uncommon to allow the officers, as a re<- 
war^, a portion of the goods seized by them in the 
act of being smuggled. This is the only mode that 
has appeared effectually to combat the temptations 
to which they are perpetually exposed. The price 
which it would be worth while for individuals to 
offer to the officers for connivance, can scarcely 
equal, upon an average, the advantage they derive 
from the performance of their duty. So far from 
there being any apprehension of their being remiss 
in its discharge when every instance of neglect is 
followed by immediate punishment, the danger is 
lest they should be led to exceed their duty, and the 
innocent should be exposed to suspicion and vexa- 
tion. 

The legislator should enact laws which will exe^^ 
cute themselves. What is to be understood by this ? 
Speaking with precision, no law can execute itself. 
In a state of insulation a law is inoperative : to pro* 
duce its desired effects, it must be supported and 



26 B. 1. ch. IV.— union of interest with duty, &c. 

enforced by some other law which in its turn 
requires for its support the assistance of other 
laws. It is thus that a body of laws forms a group, 
or rather a circle, in which each is reciprocally sup- 
ported and supports. When it is said, therefore, 
that the law executes itself, it is not meant that it 
can subsist without the assistance of other laws, 
but that its provisions are so arranged, that punish- 
ment immediately follows its violation, unaided 
by any form of procedure : that to one offence 
another more easily susceptible of proof, or more 
severely punished, is substituted. 

Mr. Burke^s law, which has already been men- 
tioned, is justly entitled to be ranked under this 
head. The clause which forbids the ministers and 
treasurers to pay themselves till all other persons 
have been paid, possesses in effect the properties 
of a punishment annexed to any retardation of 
payments : a punishment which commences with 
the offence, which lasts as long as the offence, 
which is inflicted without need of procedure ; in a 
word, a punishment, the imposition of which does 
not require the intervention of any third person. 

Before the passing of this law, large arrears on 
the civil list were allowed to accumulate ; their 
accumulation bore the character merely of a simple 
act of omission, which could not be classed under 
any particular head of offence, and the evil of which 
might moreover be palliated by a thousand pretexts. 
After the passing of this law, the ministers, it is 
true, might still, in spite of the law, continue to give 
to themselves a preference oVer the other credi- 
tors on the civil list : there is no physical force 
other than existed before to prevent them : but in 
virtue of this law, any such preference would be a 
palpable offence ; a species of peculation, which 
would be strongly reprobated by public opinion. 



B. I. ch. IV.— union of interest with duty, &c. 27 

Another example is furnished by the laws respect- 
ing the payment of stamp duties. These Jaws 
are represented as among the number of those 
which execute themselves, and are panegyrized ac- 
cordingly. This is true with regard to so much of 
these taxes as is levied upon contracts and law 
proceedings. Let us explain their mechanism. 
The sanction given to private contracts, and the 
protection afforded by the law to person and pro- 
perty, are services which the public receives at the 
hands of the ministers of justice. The method in 
which these duties then are levied is this : these 
services are at first refused to all persons without 
exception ; they are then offered to all persons who, 
at the price set upon them, have the means and in- 
clination to become purchasers. Thus a protec- 
tion which might be considered as a debt due from 
the state to all its subjects, is converted into a 
reward, by means of the precedent condition an- 
nexed to it. This is not the time for examining 
whether this duty, which palpably amounts to the 
selling of justice, is a judicious tax: all that is 
here necessary to be observed is, that the payment 
is ensured by the security it affords, and the dan- 
ger with which the omission is accompanied. 

To range over the whole field of legislation, iii 
order to ascertain the different cases in which this 
species of political mechanism has been employed, 
or in which it might be introduced with advantage, 
does not belong to our present subject : — general 
directions might easily be framed for the construc- 
tion of self-executing laws, and their application 
nught occupy a place in " The recreations oflegisla^ 
tion.^^ 



[ 28 ] 



CHAPTER V. 

MATTER OF REWARD — REASONS FOR 

HUSBANDING. 

If it be proper to be frugal in the distribution of 
punishment, it is no less proper to be so in the 
distribution of reward. Evil is inflicted in both 
cases. The difference is that punishment is an 
evil to him to whom it is applied : — reward, to him 
at whose expense it is applied. The matter of re- 
ward and the matter of punishment spring from 
the same root. Is money bestowed as a reward ? 
Such money can only arise from taxes or original 
revenue ; can only be bestowed at the public ex- 
peiris6 : — truths so obvious, that proof is unneces- 
sary ; but which ought on all occasions to be re- 
collected, since, all other circumstances being 
equal, to pay a tax to a given amount is a greater 
evil than to receive it is a good. 

Rewards consisting in honour, it is commonly 
said cost nothing. This is, however, a mistake. 
Honours not only enhance the price of services, 
(as we shall presently see) they also occasion ex- 
penses and burthens which cannot be estimated in 
money. There is no honour without pre-eminence ; 
if then, of two persons, for example, who are equal, 
one profits by being made the higher, the other 
duffers in at least equal proportion by being made 
the louver of the two. With regard to honours 
which confer rank and privileges, there are com- 
monly two sets of persons at whose expense 
honour is conferred : the persons from amongst 
whom the new dignitary is taken, and the persons, 



«■ 



B. T. Ch. v.— matter of REWARD, &c. 29 

if any, to whom he is aggregated by his elevation. 
Thus the greater the addition made to the number 
of peers, the more their importance is diminished; 
the greater is the defalcation made from the value 
of their rank. 

The case is similar with regard to power. It is 
by taking away liberty or security, that power is 
conferred ; and the share of each man is the less, 
the greater the number of co-partners in it. The 
power conferred in any case must be either new or 
old : if new, it is conferred at the expense of those 
who are subject to it ; if old, at the expense of 
those by whom it was formerly exercised. 

Exemptions given in the way of reward, may 
appear at first sight but little expensive. This 
may be one reason why they have been so liberally 
granted by short-sighted sovereigns. It ought 
however to be recollected, that in the case of pub* 
lie burthens, the exemption of one increases the 
burthen on the remainder: if it be honourable tq 
be exempted from them, it becomes a disgrace to 
bear them, and such partial exemptiooa at length 
give birth to general discontent. 

The exemptions from arrest for debt, enjoyed by 
members of parliament, are a reward conferred at 
the expense of their creditors. Exemptions from 
parish offices and military services are rewards 
conferred at the expense of those who are exposed 
to the chance of bearing them. The burthen of 
exemptions from taxes fails upon those who contri- 
bute to the exigencies of the state. 

A privilege to carry on, in concurrence with a 
limited number of other persons, a particular branch 
of trade, is an exemption from the exclusion which 
persons in general are laid under with reference to 
that trade ; the favour is shewn at the expense of 
the persons who are sharers in the privilege. 



30 B. I. Ch. v.— MATTER OF REWARD, ke. 

If there be an instance in which any modifica« 
tion of the matter of reward can be conferred with- 
^ out expense, it will be found among those which 

consist in exemption from punishment. When an 
ex^nption of this sort is conferred, the expense of 
it, if there be any, is borne by those who are in- 
terested in the infliction of the punishment : that 
is, by those in whose favour the law was made, 
which the punishment was intended to enforce. 
But if by the impunity given, the sanction of the 
laws is weakened and crimes consequently multi- 
plied, the pardon granted to criminals is dearly 
paid for by their victims. 

The evil of prodigality is not confined to the 
diminishing the fund of reward : it operates as a 
law against real merit. If rewards are bestowed 
upon pretended services, such pretended services 
enter into competition with real services. He suc- 
ceeds best, who aims not to entitle himself to the 
gratitude of the people, but to captivate the goodwill 
of him at whose disposal the fund of reward is placed. 
Obsequiousness and courtly vices triumph over 
virtue and genius. The art of pleasing is elevated 
at the expense of the art of serving. 

What is* the consequence ? real services are not 
performed, or they are purchased at extravagant 
prices. It is not sufficient, that the price paid for 
them be equal to that of the false services ; be- 
yond this, there must be a surplus to compensate 
the labour which real services require. " If so 
much is given to one who has done nothing, how 
much more is due to me who have borne the heat 
and the burthen of the day ? — If .parasites are thus 
rewarded, how much more is due to my talents and 
industry ?" — Such is the language which will na- 
turally be employed, and not without reason, by 
the man of conscious merit. 



B. I. ch. v.— matter of reward, &c. 3 1 

It is thus that the amount of the evil is perpetu- 
ally accumulating. The greater the amount al- 
ready lavished, the greater the demand for still 
further prodigality; as in the case of punishment, 
the more profusely it has been dealt out, the greater 
oftentimes is the need of employing still more. 

When by the display of extraordinary zeal and 
distinguished talents, a public functionary has ren- 
dered great services to his country, to associate 
him with the crowd of ordinary subordinates is to 
degrade him. He will feel in respect of the fund 
of reward, in the same manner as the disposer of 
it ought to have felt. He will consider himself 
injured, not only when anything is refused to him, 
but when anything is bestowed upon those who 
have not deserved it. 

A profuse distribution of honours is attended with 
a double inconvenience : in the first place it dete- 
riorates the stock ; and in the next, it is productive 
of great pecuniary expense. When a peerage, for 
example, is conferred, it is generally necessary to 
add to it a pension, under the notion of enabling 
the bearer to sustain its dignity. 

It is thus that the existence of an hereditary 
nobility tends to increase the price necessary to, be 
paid in the shape of reward : has a plebeian ren- 
dered such services to his country as cannot be 
passed by with neglect, the first operation is to 
distinguish him from men of his own rank, by 
placing him among the nobility. But without 
fortune, a peerage is a burthen : to make it worth 
having, it must be accompanied with pecuniary re- 
ward: the immediate payment of a large surn 
vt^ould be too burthensome : posterity is therefore 
made to bear a portion of the burthen. 
. It is true, posterity ought to pay its share in the 



32 B. I. ch. v.— matter of reward, &c. 

price of services of which it reaps a share of the 
advantage ; but the same benefit might be procured 
at a less expense, if there were no hereditary nobi* 
Jity, personal nobility would answer every purpose. 
Among the Greeks, a branch froYn a pine tree, a 
handful of parsley, — ^among the Romans, a few 
laurel leaves, or ears of corn, were the rewards of 
heroes. 

Fortunate Americans 1 fortunate on so many ac- 
counts, if to possess happiness it were sufficient to 
possess every thing by which it is constituted, this 
advantage is still yours : preserve it for ever, bestow 
rewards, erect statutes, confer even titles, so that 
they be personal alone ; but never bind the crown 
of merit upon the brow of sloth. 

Such is the language of those passionate admirers 
of merit who would gladly see a generous emula- 
tion burning in all ranks of the community ; who 
consider every thing wasted which is not employed 
in its promotion. Can anything be replied to 
them ? If there can, it can only be by those who, 
jealous of the public tranquillity, as necessary to 
the enjoyments of luxury, and more alarmed at the 
folly which knows no restraint than at the selfish- 
ness which may be constrained to regulate itself, 
would have, at any price, a class of persons who 
may impose tranquillity upon those who can never 
be taught. 

In some states, the strictest* frugality is observed 
in the distribution of rewards ; such in general has 
been the case under republican governments ; 
though it is true, that even in democracies, history 
furnishes instances of the most extravagant prodi- 
gality and corruption. The species of reward be- 
stowed by the people upon their favourites with the 
least examination is power ; a gift more precious 



B. I. ch. v.-matter of reward, &c. 33 

and dangerous than titles of honour or pecuniary 
rewards. The maxim, IVoe to the grateful nation, is 
altogether devbid'of naeaning, unless it be designed 
as a warnio^ against this disposition of the people 
to confer unlimited authority upon those who for a 
moment obtain their confidence. 

After having said thus much in favour of eco- 
nomy, it must not be denied that specious pre- 
tences may be urged in justification of a liberal 
Use of rewards. 

That portion of the matter of reward which is 
superfluously employed, it is said may be consi- 
dered as the fund of a species of lottery. At a 
comparatively small expense a large mass ofex- 
pectation is created and prizes are offered which 
every man may flatter himself with the hope of 
obtaining. And what are all the other sources of 
enjoyment when put in competition with hope? 
But can such reasons justify the imposition or con- 
tinuance of taxes with no other view than that of 
increasing the amount of the disposable fund of 
reward ? — Certainly not. It would be absurd thus 
to create a real evil, thus to pillage the multitude 
of what they have earned by the sweat of their 
brow, to multiply the enjoyments of the wealthy. 
In a word, whatever may be thought of this lottery 
we must not forget that its prizes must be drawn 
before we can obtain any useful services. To the 
individual himself, active is more conducive tohi§ 
happiness than idle hope, — the one develops his^ 
talents, the other renders them obtuse; the first \ 
is naturally allied to virtue, the second to vice. | 
" In England, reasons, or at least pretexts, have 
been found for the arbitrary disposal of rewards, 
which would not exist under an absolute monarchy. 
The constitution of parliament gives occasion to the 
performance of services of such a nature as cannot 

3 



f 



34 B. I. Ch. v.— matter of reward, Ac. 

be acknowledged, but which in the eyes of[ many 
politicians are not the less necessary. A certain 
quantity of talent is requisite, it is said, to save the 
political vessel from being upset by any momen- 
tary turbulence or whim of thjp people. We must 
possess a set of Mediators interested in maintain- 
ing harmony between the.heterogeneous particles of 
our mixed constitution ; a species of Drill Serjeants 
is required for the maintenance of discipline among 
the undulating and tumultuous multitude. There 
must be a set of noisy Orators provided for those 
who'are more easily captivated by strength of lungs 
than by strength of argument ; Declaimers for 
those yfho are controuled by sentimentalism ; and 
imaginative, facetious, or satirical Orators, for those 
whose object it is to be amused ; Reasoners for the 
small number, who yeild only to reason ; artful 
and enterprising men to scour the country to obtain 
and" calculate the number of votes: there must 

id' 

also be a class of men in good repute at court, who 
may maintain a good understanding between the 
head and the members. And all this they say 
must be paid for — whether correctly or not, does 
not belong to our present discussion. 

It may be further said, that the matter of reward, 
besides being used for reward, may be used as a 
means of power, — and that in a mixed constitu- 
tion like ours, it is necessary to maintain a balance 
among its powers. Certain creations of peers 
therefore, for example, which could not be justified, 
if considered as rewards, may be justified as distri- 
butions of power. There is at least something in 
this which deserves examination ; but its exami- 
nation here would be out of place. 

Want of economy in the distribution of rewards 
may also be attempted Jo be justified, by com- 
paring the sum so expended with the expense in- 



B. I. Ch. v.— MATTEItOF REWARD, &c. 35 

tilirred in the carrying on of a war. I advise every 
one who has projects upon the public money, 
to employ this argument in preference to every 
other: when one calculates the immense sum ex- 
pended during a single campaign, either by land 
or sea ; when we reflect on the millions that vanish 
in sound and smoke, all other profusion sinks into ' 
insignificance. When we behold the treasures of 
a nation flowing away in such rapid torrents, can 
any great indignation be felt against those who, 
byart, or obsequiousness, or court favour, detach 
from the mass a single drop or a small stream for their 
own benefit ? If the people so readily lend them- 
selves to the gratification of political passions ; if 
they part so freely with their gold and their blood, 
for the momentary gratification of their vengeance 
or their passion for glory, can it be expected they 
will murmur at the pomp they covet, and the few 
insignificant favours which their prince bestows ? 
Will they be supposed so mean as to be niggard 
with pence and lavish with millions ? 

This mode of comparison is not new to courts : 
. it ought to have been familiar to Louis XIV. if it 
be true, as there is reason for believing, that the 
building of Versailles cost two thousand millions of 
livres. In respect of expense, this was more than 
equal to a war ; but at least it was expended with- 
out bloodshed, there was no interruption of trade, 
on the contrary it gave vigour to industry and shed 
lustre over the arts. What a fortunate source of 
comparison to the advocates of absolute monarchy ! 

There is yet another imode of estimating the just- 
ness of any public expenditure, another source of 
comparison somewhat less agreeable to the eyes of 
courtier^. Compare the amount of the proposed 
expenditure with an equal portion of the produce 
<^ the most vexatious and burthensome tax. In this 

3. 



36 



B.I. Ch. v.— matter of reward, &c. 



country, for example, let the comparison be made 
with the produce of the tax on law proceedings, 
whose effect is the placing of the great majority of 
the people in a state of outlawry. The option lies 
between the abolition of this tax and the proposed 
employment of its produce. They thus become 
two rival services. It is a severe test for frivolous 
expenses, but it is strictly just. How disgraceful 
does wasteful luxury appear in the budget when 
thus put in competition with the good whose place 
it occupies, or the evil of which it prevents the 
cure ! 

From these observations the practical conclusion 
18^ that the matter of reward being all of it costly, 
none of it ought to be thrown away* This precious 
matter is like the dew : not a drop of it falls upon 
the es^rth which has not previously been drawn 
up from. it. An upright sovereign therefore gives 
nothing. He buys or he sells^ His benevolence 
qonsists in economy. Would you praise him for 
generosity ? Praise also the guardian who lavishes 
among his servants the property of his pupils. 

The most liberal among the Roman emperors 
were the most worthless ; for example, Caligula^ 
Claudius^ NerOyOtho^Vitellius, Commodus^ Helio^ 
gabalus, and Caracalla : the best, as Augustiis^ Ves^ 
pastan^ Antoninus^ Marcus Aurelinus^ and Pertinax^ 
were frugal. (Esprit des Loix, liv. v, ch. xviii.) 

A most important lesson to sovereigns: it warns 
them not to value themselVes upon the virtue of 
generosity : in short, not to think that in their sta- 
tion generosity is a virtue. If not a strictly logical 
argument, it is, however, a popular and persuasive 
induction. " Esteem not yourselves to be good 
princes for a quality in which you have been out- 
stripped by the worst.^^ 



• [ 37 ] 



CHAP. VL 

REMUNERATION EX POST FACTO. 

In the preceding chapter it was stated, that in 
accordance with the principle of utility, the costly 
matter of reward ought only to be employed in the 
production of service; and that, in accordance 
with that principle, a reward can only consist of 
a portion of the matter of reward, employed as a 
motive for the production of service. This would 
seem to exclude everything which can be called 
liberality, every act by which a reward may be? 
bestowed upon any service to which it has not 
been promised beforehand. 

Such may appear the consequence at first sight. 
A reward, it may be said, ought only to be be- 
stowed upon the performance of the service to 
which it has been promised ; since it is only wheref 
it has been foreseen that it can have operated as a 
motive. Why then bestow it upon a service, how 
useful and important soever, to which it has not 
been promised ? The service you would have 
been willing to purchase, at the expense of a 
certain reward, has been happily rendered without 
any engagement on your part to bear the expense. 
Why therefore should any reward be bestowed > 
Why pretend to enifiloy reward in the production 
of an effect which has been produced without 
it ? Is not this a useless employment of reward ? 
Is not this an expenditure in pure waste ? 

Certainly such an expense cannot be justified 
as a means of producing an effect, which has by 
the supposition already been produced ; but it may 



/ 



38 B.I. Cu. VI.— REMUNERATION EX POST FACTO. 

be justified as serving to give birth to other effect* 
of^ like nature, as likely to cause future service* 
to oe rendered, which will agree with those that 
are past ; at least in this, that they are services* 
A reward which thus follows the service may be 
stiled an ex post facto^ or unpromised reward. — 
The Society of Arts has recognised and enaployed 
this distinction. A reward bestowed in fulfilment 
of a promise, upon the performance of a specified 
service, is called a premium. A reward bestowed 
without previous promise, is called a bounty. 

To make it a rule never to grant a reward which 
has not been promised, is to tie up the hands of 
true liberality, and to renounce all chance of re- 
ceiving any new kind of service. There is only 
one supposition which can justify this parsimony: 
it is, that every service has been foreseen and en- 
dowed beforehand; Whether legislation will ever 
attain this perfection, I pretend not to know. It 
has not attained it as yet ; and till it be attained. 
Sovereigns -may reckon liberality amongst the 
number of their virtues. 

Rewards, which in this manner are the fruits of 
liberality, possess a great advantage over those 
which are awarded in virtue of a promise. These, 
confined to one object, operate only upon the 
individual service specified. The genial influence 
I of the others extends over the whole theatre of 
Vmeritorious actions. These are useful in deter- 
mining researches to a particular point; the others 
present an invitatioti to extenckhemto everything 
which the human mind c^n grasp.. These are like 
the water which the hand of a gardener directs to 
a particular flower; the others are like the dew 
which is distilled over the whole surface of the 
earth. 
A promised reward, bestowed upon one who has 



B.I. Ch. VI.— REMUNERATION EX POST FACTO. 39 

not deserved it, is entirely lost. An unpromised 
reward, thus improperly bestowed, is not necessa- 
rily lost. The hand of liberality has been de- 
ceived, but the utility of the reward is not altoge- 
ther thrown away, whilst opportunity is left for a 
better application of it in future. Had Alexander 
lavished upon the man who, to obtain his bounty, 
exhibited his skill in darting grains of millet through 
the eye of a needle, the rewards he bestowed upon 
Aristotle, it would have been a proof of prodigality 
and folly, whose effect would have been to mul- 
tiply the race of mountebanks and jugglers. In 
rewarding Aristotle he, without doubt, rewarded 
much jargon, of no greater value than this man^s 
sleight of hand in darting millet ; but since, in 
the midst of this jargon, a certain quantity of 
useful, and at that time, new truth was found, the 
rewards which this celebrated philosopher received 
may justly be placed to the account of useful 
liberality — their tendency was to multiply the 
precious race of instructors of mankind — the race 
of philosophers. 

In fact, certain acts of liberality, which could 
not be justified, considered as promised rewards, 
may deserve more or less indulgence, may possess 
a sort of utility of the same kind as that which 
belongs to rewards not promised. Even the act 
regarded as service may not strictly deserve to be 
connected with reward, but the disposition dis- 
played by the distributing hand in awarding a 
recompense, may give birth to the expectation of 
similar rewards for really meritorious service. 

Rewards bestowed in pursuance ofa promise, may 
be considered as conferred, according to a law be- 
longing to the class of written laws; whilst unpro- 
mised rewards, though not productive of similar 
evils, may be considered as establishinga kind of law. 



40 B.I. Ch. VI.— REMUNERATION EX POST FACTO. 

or rather tacit rule, analogous to that established 
by means of punishment, in what is called unwritten 
law. It would be fortunate, indeed, if the penal 
law might remain unwritten with as little inconve- 
nience as remuneratory law. In the penal, and 
even the commonly called civil branches, these 
unwritten laws develop themselves by a train of 
hardships, not to say of injuries, whilst the worst 
which can happen in the remuneratory branch of 
unwritten law is this, that, by reason of its being 
unknown, it may become a tissue of useless 
bounty. 

Catherine II. did not allow the remuneratory 
branch of her laws to be exposed even to thi^ 
danger, from which there is so little to be feared. 
Had the hand of liberality been expanded — was 
the dew of reward poured out upon the head of 
merit — immediately inserted in the Gazette the 
notification of the reward connected with the name 
of the individual, and the service which had de- 
served it was resounded throughout the most 
distant and unfrequented parts of her vast empire. 
It would have been altogether glorious, had she 
hastened to give the same character of publicity 
and certainty to those other branches of unwritten 
law, in which it is required with so much greater 
urgency ; and had she never conferred favours 
which she would have blushed to see gazetted. 

In England, a noble example of reward, ex post 
facto, was exhibited in connection with the first 
establishment of mail coaches. The manager of a 
provincial theatre having proposed to the minister 
this plan for the better conveyance of letters, the 
plan was received, and having been tried in one 
part of the kingdom, it was afterwards extended 
to the whole : and this service being in conse- 
quence performed with a celerity and economy 



B.I. Ch. VI.— REMUNERATION EX POST FACTO. 41 

of which formerly there was no idea.* As a 
reward, the inventor was appointed Comptroller- 
General of the Post-office, with a salary of' 1,500/. 
per annum, besides a proportion of the savings, 
A reward thus judicious and equitable, transports 
us to the year 2440. f It is equivalent to a pro- 
clamation to this effect: — " Men of genius and in- 
dustry, employ your talents for the service of your 
country ; exert yourselves to the utmost ; produce 
your plans ; their reception shall depend alone 
upon, the opinion formed of their utility ; your 
country will not grudge the labour necessary for 
their examination. Good intentions shall not be 
treated with contempt; you shall not be nick- 
named projectors by the idle and the incapable^ 
Your plans shall not be disregarded because of 
tbeir authors ; they shall not be thrown aside 
because they are extraordinary, provided they be 
useful. Impartiality shall preside at their exami« 
nation, and their utility shall be the measure of 
your reward.^^ 

There may appear at first sight a discrepancy 
between this and t;he immediately preceding chap- 
ter, but it is only in appearance. I say here, no 
less than heretofore, that the upright dispenser of 
public treasures gives nothing. He buys or he 
sells. With promised rewards he purchases be- 
spoken, clearly defined, and limited services; with 
unpromised rewards he purchases services unbe- 
spoken, indeterminate, and infinite. The difficulty 
in both cases consists in making a proper choice 
of the action to be rewarded. This choice will 
form the subject of subsequent consideration, 

* SeeTraites de Legislation, torn. 2. ch. xi. (Ed. 18«0.) 
t i'ari'2440, by M. Merciefj a species of Utopian romance,, 
of which the idea was ingenious, but the execution weak. 



[ 42 ] 



n 



CHAPTER VII. 

MUNITION AND REMUNERATION — THEIR 

RELATIONS. 

Wherefore, throughout the Vhole field of le- 
gislation, cannot reward be substituted for punish- 
ment ? Is hope a less powerful incentive to action 
than fear ? When a political pharmacopoeia has 
the command of both ingredients, wherefore em- 
ploy the bitter instead of the sweet ? 

To these natural but unreflecting enquiries, I 

reply by a maxim that at first view may appear 

paradoxical. " Reward ought never to be em- 

. ployed when the same effect can be produced bjr 

jpunishment.^^ And, in support of this paradox, I 

{employ another — " Let the means be penal and the 

desired effect may be attained without giving birth 

to suffering : let the means be remuneratory, and 

suffering is inevitable.^^ 

The oracular style, however, being no longer in 
fashion, I shall in plain language give the solution 
of this enigma. 

When a punishment is denounced against the 
breach of a law, if the law be not broken, no one 
need be punished. When a reward is promised to 
obedience, if every body obey the law, every body 
ought to be rewarded. A demand for rewards is 
thus created : and these rewards can only be de- 
rived from the labour of the people, and contribu- 
tions levied upon their property. 

In comparing the respective properties of punish- 
ment and reward, we shall find that the first is in- 
^nite in quantity, powerful in its operation, and 
certain in its effect, so that it cannot be resisted. 



B. I. Ch. VII.-PUNITION AND REMUNERATION, Ac. 43 

That the second is extremely limited in quantity, 
oftentimes weak in its operation, and at all times 
uncei'tain in its eflfect: the desire after it varying 
exceedingly, according to the character and cir- 
cumstances of individuals. We may remark again 
that the prospect of punishment saddens, whilst 
that of reward animates the mind ; that punishment 
blunts, while reward sharpens the activity ; that 
punishment diminishes energy, while reward aug- 
ments it. 

It is reward alone, and not punishment, which a 
man ought to employ, when his object is to procure 
services, the performance of which may or may 
not be in the power of those with whom he has 
to do. This considered, were it necessary to 
draw a rough line between the provinces of re- 
ward and punishment in a few words, we might 
say, that punishment was peculiarly suited tol 
the production of acts of the negative stamp,\ 
reward to the production of acts of the positive] 
stamp. To sit still and do nothing is in the power 
of every man at all times : to perform a given ser- 
vice is in many instances in the power of one indi- 
vidual alone, and that only upon one individual oc- 
casion. This arrangement of nature suits very well 
with the unlimited plenitude of the fund of pu- 
nishment on the one hand, and the limited ampli- 
tude of the fund of reward on the other. The 
negative acts, of which the peace and welfare of 
mankind require the performance, are incessant and 
innumerable, and must be exacted at the hands of 
' every man : the positive acts of which the perform- 
ance is required, are comparatively few, perform- 
able only by certain persons, and by them on certain 
occasions only. Not to steal, not to murder, not 
to rob, must be required at all times at the hands of 
every man : to take the field for the purpose of 
national defence, to oqcupyaplacein the superior 



44 B. I. Cii. VJl.— PUNITJON AND REMUNERATION, &c. 

departments of executiveor legislative government, 
are acts which it is neither necessary nor proper to 
exact at the hands of more than a few, or of them 
except on particular occasions. To discover a 
specific remedy for a disease, to analize a mineral, ' 
to invent a method of ascertaining a ship's longitude 
within a given distance, to determine the quadra- 
ture of such or such a curve, are works which, if 
done by one man, need never be done again. 

It is thus, also, with regard to such extraordi- 
nary services as depend upon accident : such as 
the giving of information when required, either in 
the judicial or any other branch of administration. 
Are you ignorant whether an individual is in pos- 
session of the information in question, or if in pos- 
session whether he is disposed to communicate it ? 
Punishment would most probably be both ineffi- 
cacious and unjust as a means of acquiring this 
knowledge : resort then to reward. 

In regard to extraordinary services depending 
upon personal qualification, the impropriety of 
punishment and propriety of reward is the greater, 
when the utility of the service is susceptible of 
an indeterminate degree of excellence ; as is the 
case with works of literature, of science, and thefine 
arts. In these cases reward not only calls forth into 
exercise talents already existing, but even creates 
them where they did not exist. It is the property 
of hope, one of the modifications of joy, to put a 
man, as the phrase is, into spirits, that is, to increase 
the rapidity with which the ideas he is conversant 
about succeed each other, and thus to strengthen 
his powers of combination and invention by pre- 
senting to him a greater variety of objects. The 
stronger the hope, so that it have not the effect of 
drawing the thoughts out of the proper channel^ 
the more rapid the succession of ideas ; the more 
extensive and varied the trains formed by the prin- 



B. I. Ch. VII.— PUNITION AND REMUNERATION, &c. 45 

ciple of associatibn, the better fed, as it were, and 
more vigorous will be the powers of invention. 
In this state the attention is more steady, the ima- 
gination more alert, and the individual elevated by 
his success beholds the career of invention dis- 
played before him, and discovers within himself 
resources of which he had hitherto been ignorant. 

On the one hand, let fear be the only motive that- 
prompts a man to exert himself, he will exert him- 
self just so miuch as he thinks necessary to exempt 
him from that fear and no more : but let hope be 
the motive he will exert himself to the utmost, 
especially if he have reason to think that the mag- 
nitude of the reward, (or what comes to the same 
thing) the probability of attaining it, will rise in 
proportion to the success of his exertions. 

Such is the nature of extraordinary services, that 
it is neither practicable nor desirable for them to be 
performed by a large multitude of persons. If pu- 
nishment then were the means employed to induce 
men to perform them, it would be necessary to pitch 
upon some select persons as those on whom to im* 
pose the obligation. But of the personal qualifica- 
tions of individuals, the legislator, as such, can have 
no knowledge. The case will also be nearly the 
same, even with the executive magistrate, if the 
n.umber of the persons under his department is' 
considerable : for antecedently to specific experi- 
ence in the very line in question, a man^s personal 
qualifications for any such extraordinary task are 
not to be conjectured, apriori^ but from an intimate 
acquaintance; such an acquaintance as it is im- 
possible a man should have with a large number. 
The consequence is, that among any multitude of 
persons thus taken, at random, the greater number 
would not perform the task, because they would 
n<>t be able to perform it. But in this case, by the 
supposition,, they must all be punished : here there 



46 B. I. /Cli. Vll.-'PUNITION AND REMUNERATION, Aei 

would be a vast mass of punishment laid on in waste^ 
and perhaps the end not compassed after all : a 
mass of punishment imparting beyond comparison 
more pain than it would cost to provide a sufficient 
quantity of rewards. 

On the other hand, let reward be employed, and 
not an atom need be spent in waste; for it may be 
easily so applied, and it is common so to apply it, 
that it shall be bestowed in those instances only in 
which the end is compassed : in those instances, m 
which not only a benefit is attained, but a benefit 
more than equivalent to the expense. By punish* 
ment, a great expense would be incurred, and that 
for the sake of a faint chance of success ; by reward, 
a small expense is incurred, and that not without 
a certainty of success. 

Again, punishment in these cases would not 
only be less likely to produce the requisite ef- 
fect, but would have a tendency to prevent it. 
How little soever the magistrate might be qua- 
lified to collect and to judge of appearances of 
capacity, for such appearances he would, bow- 
ever, naturally keep some sort of look out. To 
exhibit those appearances would therefore be to 
run a chance of incurring the obligation and the 
punishment annexed to it. The consequence is 
obvious: to make sure of not appearing qualified, 
men would take care not to be so. We are told that, 
in Siam,whenamanhasatreeof extraordinary good 
fruit, it is seized for the king's use. If this be true, 
we may well imagine gardening does not make any 
very extraordinary progress in the neighbourhood of 
the court of Siam. Nature must do much, for art we 
may be certain will do nothing. We are told upon 
better authority of a time when it was the custom 
to give commissions to officers to look out for the 
best singers, and press them into the king's service : 
unless they were well paid at the same time, which 



B, I. Cb. Vn.— PUNITION AND REMUNERATION, Blc 47 

would have rendered the alarm occasioned by press- 
ing needless, one would not give much to hear the 
music of that day. 

That selection which in cases like these is so im- 
practicable in public, is not equally so in domestic 
life. To parents and other preceptors, it is by no 
means impracticable to make use of punishment as 
a motive. They are enabled to use it, because the 
intimacy of their acquaintance with their pupils in 
general enables them to give a pretty good guess 
at what they are able to perform. It may, perhaps, 
even be necessary to have recourse to this incen- 
tive: before the natural love of ease >has been got 
under by habit, and especially before the auxiliary 
motive of the love of reputation has taken root, and 
while the tender intellect has not as yet acquired 
sufficient expansion and firmness to receive and 
retain the impressions of distant pleasure. 

I say perhaps, for it certainly might be practi- 
cable to do with much less of this bitter recipe, 
than in the present state of education is commonly 
applied. All apparatus contrived on purpose might 
at least be spared. To\i^ards providing a suffi- 
cient stock of incentives for all purposes, a great 
deal more might be done than is commonly done, in 
the way of reward alone ; by a little ingenuity in the 
invention, and a little frugality in the application ; 
by establishing a constant connection between en- 
joyment and desert ; granting little or nothing but 
what is purchased; and thus transforming into re- 
wards the whole stock of gratification, or at least 
so much of it as is requisite. If punishment should 
still be necessary, mere privations seem to afford in 
all cases a sufficient store. A complete stock of in- 
centives might thus be fortned out of enjoyments 
alone: punishment, by the suspension of such as 



48 B. I. Ch. VII^PUNITION AND REMUNERATION, &c. 

arehabitual: reward, by the application of such as 
occasionally arise,* 

But even when applied by parents and preceptors, 
punishnoient, how well soever it may succeed in 
raising skill to its ordinary level, will never raise 
it higher; one of the imperfections of punish- 
ment remains still insuperable. Accordingly, in the 
training of young minds to qualify them for the 
achievement of extraordinary works of genius, the 
business is best managed, and indeed, in a certain 
degree is commonly managed, by punishments and 
rewards together; in such sortj that in the earlier 
part of man's career, and in the earlier stages* of the 
progress of talent, a mixture of punishments and 
rewards both shall be employed : and that by de- 
grees punishment shall be dropt altogether, and the 
force employed consist of reward alone. 

* See the chapter on Punishments and Rewards in Practical 
Education, by Maria and Lovell Edgworth^ a work which 
ought to be in the hands of every parent. 

No one who takes any interest in the public welfare, can be 
unacquainted with the plans of education introduced by Mr. 
Lancaster. Among other contrivances to which his success may 
be attibruted, his system of rewards occupies a conspicuous 
place. His school-roon) resembled a toy shop-^little carriages, 
wooden horses, kites, balls and drums, were suspended by ropes 
or hung upon the posts, and the walls were ornamented with 
halfpenny and penny prints. Every candidate for reward, thus, 
had always l)efore his eyes the object of his desire, and he knew 
the price he must pay for the possession of it. Among so large 
a number of boys it has, however, been found necessary to ' 
employ severer punishments than such as consist in a mere pri- 
vation of pleasure } those selected by Mr. Lancaster depend 
ekclusively upon the dread of shame, and have been made uni- 
fi^rnily emblematical or characteristic. Their efficacy far ex- 
ceeds that of corporal punishment, which children are apt to 
make it a point of honour to brave, which they habituate 
themselves to suffer, or which inspires them with a decided 
aversion for study. 



B. I. C«. VII.— PUNITION AND REMUNERATION, &c. 49 

There remain the casein which reward is pro- 
per, because punishment, at least punishment alone, 
would be unprofitable. By unprofitable, I mean 
not efficacious, but uneconomical, unfrugal: the 
interest of the whole community together being 
taken into the account, not forgetting that of the 
particular member on whom the burthen would be 
to be imposed, and consequently the punishment, 
in case of non-performance, be inflicted. 

This seems to be the case with all those offices 
which, standing ^lone^ ^ve offices of mere burthen : 
whether the party favoured be the public at large, or 
any individual, or class of indi viduals : in all cases the 
labourer is worthy of his hire, and unless it be when 
every man must labour, no man ought to be made to 
labour without his hire. The common soldier no 
more than the general, the common seaman no more 
than the admiral, the constable no more than the "^ ^ 
judge. 

. True it is, that take any man for example, it 
may with propriety be said, that the public has 
a right to his services, has a right to command 
his services, for that the interest of any one man 
ought to give way to the interest of all. But if 
they be true as to any one man who happens to be 
first taken, equally true is it of any other, and so 
in succession of every man. On the one hand then, 
each man is under an obligation to submit to any 
burthen that shall be proposed; on the other hand, 
each man has an equal right to iSee the burthen im- 
posed not upon himself, but upon some other. If 
either of these propositions are taken in their 
full extent, as much may be said in favour. of the 
one of them as of the other. In this case, if there 
were no middle course to take, things must rest in 
statu quo, the. scale of utility must remain in equi- 
librio,one man's interest weighing neither more nor 
less than another's ; the burthen would be borne by 

4 



60 B. 1. Ch. VII^PUNITION AND REMUNERATION, &c. 

nobody, and the immunity of each would be the 
destruction of all. But there is a middle course 
to take, which is, to divide the burthen and lay it 
ioequal proportion upon every man. 

The principle is indisputable : the application' of 
it is not free from difficulties. There are many 
cases in which the individual burthen cannot be 
divided ; an office, the duties of which it requires 
but one man to perform, cannot be divided amongst 
a thousand. But amass of profit may be formed 
sufficient to counterbalance the inconvenience 
which a man would sustain by bearing the office. 
Let the requisite mass of profit be taken from the 
general fund, and the burthen is distributed propor- 
tionably amongst the different members of the 
community.* 

An expedient sometimes practised in these cases, 
is, instead of distributing the burthen of the office, 
to lay it on entire upon some one person, according 
to lot. This prevents the injustice there would be 
in laying it upon any one by design : but it does 
not correct the inequality. The mischiefs of 
partiality and injustice are obviated ; but not so 
the sufferings of him upon whom the unfortunate 
lot falls. The principle of utility is in this case 
only partially followed. 

It is one of those instances in which.the principle 
of utility would seem to have given occasion to a 
wrong conclusion. According to this principle, it 
is said that the interest of the minority ought to be 

* This supposes the reward to consist in money : if a suffi- 
cient reward can be provided out of honour and power, or 
either of them without money, the burthen of it in the first 
case is distributed of course among all the members of the 
community over whom the honour gives him a precedence ; in 
the last case it may be distributed, according to the nature of 
the power, among all of them without distinction. 



B. I. Ch. VII.— PUNITION AND REMUNERATION, &<s 51 

sacrificed to that of the majority. The conclusion 
is just, if it were impossible to act otherwise; pal- 
pably false, if it is. But to charge this as a defect 
upon the principle itself, is as reasonable as it would 
be to maintain that the art of book-keeping is a mis- 
chievous art, because entries may be omitted. 

We are now prepared for establishing a compa- 
rison between punishment and reward. 

1. Punishment is best adapted for restraint or 
prevention : reward for excitement and produc- 
tion : the one is a bridle, the other a spur. 

2. In every case where very extensive mischief 
may be produced by a single act, and particularly 
in the case of such acts as may be performed at any 
time, punishnlent is the only restraint to be de- 
pended on ; such is the case of crimes in general. 
When the act endeavoured to be produced is in an 
eminent degree beneficial, it is proper to employ 
reward alone, or to combine punishment with re- 
ward, that the power of the governing motive may 
be doubled. 

3. Considering the abundance of the one, and 
scarcity of the other, punishment is the only eli- 
gible means of regulating the conduct x)f people in 
general : reward ought to be reserved for directing C 
the actions of particular individuals. By punish- ) 
ment, mischievous propensities are subdued ; by 
reward, valuable qualifications are improved. Pu- 
nishment is an instrument for the extirpation of 
noxious weeds: reward is a hot bed for raising 
fruit, which would not otherwise be produced. 

4. Necessity compels the employment of pu- 
nishment : reward is a luxury. Discard the first, 
and society is dissolved : discard the other, and it 
still continues to subsist, though deprived of a por- 
tion of its amenity and elegance. 

5. In every case where the service is of such a 

4. 



V 



52 B. I. Ch. VIl.-PUNmON AND REMUNERATION, Ac. 

nature as, that no individual possessed of the qua- 
lifications requisite for its performance can with 
certainty be selected, the denunciation of punish- 
ment would only produce apprehension and misery, 
and its application be but so much injury inflicted 
in wanton waste. 

In every such case offer a reward, and it travels 
forth in quest of hidden or unknown talents : even 
if it fail in its search, it produces no evil, not an 
atom of it is lost : it is given only when the service 
is performed, when the advantage obtained either 
equals or surpasses the expense. 

By the help of these observations, we shall be 
enabled to appreciate the opinion of those politi- 
cians, who, after a superficial examination of this 
subject, condemn legislators in general for the spar- 
ing use made of the matter of reward. 

The author of The Wealth of Nations^ who has 
displayed such extraordinary sagacity in all his 
researches, has upon this point been led away by 
mistaken notions of humanity. Fear (says he) is 
in almost all cases a miserable instrument of govern- 
ment.^ It is an instrument which has oftentimes 
been much perverted from its proper use ; but it is 
a necessary instrument, and the only one applica- 
ble to the ordinary purposes of society. 

A young king, in the first ardour for improve- 
ment, having resolved to purge his kingdom from 
all crimes, was not satisfied with this alone. His 
natural gentleness was shocked at the idea of em- 
ploying punishment. He determined to abolish it 
altogether, and to effect every thing by reward. 
He began with the crime of theft : but, in a short 
time, all his subjects were entitled to reward, all of 
tJiem*were honest. Every day they were entitled 

* Wealth of Nations, B. v. Ch. i. 



B. 1. Ch. VII.— PUNITION and REMUNERATION, Ac. 53 

to new rewards, their honesty remained inviolate. 
A scheme for preventing smuggling was proposed 
to him. " Wise king/^ it was said, " for every penny 
that ought to be paid into your treasury, give two, 
and the hydra is vanquished,^' The victory was 
certain, but he perceived that like that of Pyrrhus 
it would be somewhat costly. 

A distinction which exists between domestic 
and political government may be here worth no- 
ticing. No sovereign is so rich as to be able to 
effect every thing by reward. There is no parent 
who may not. At Sparta, a bit of black bread was 
the reward of skill. The stock of pleasures and of 
wants is an inexhiiustible fund of reward in the 
hands of those parents who know how to employ 
it. 



[ 54 ] 



CHAP, VIII. 

liEMUNERATION WHERE HURTFUt. 

- A K^)¥ARD is mischievous when its tendency 
jsi to produce offences, or to give birth to noxious 
dispositions. . . > 

; Tp offer a reward to. an individual as an induce- 
ment to hin^ to commit au: act prohibited by law, 
i§ to attempt to suborn him ; the offence may be 
called subornation. Upon the present occasion, 
this illegal subornation is not the subject of con- 
sideration. The rewards, of which we are about 
to speak, have a corruptive tendency, but do not 
possess the character of crimes ; they are autho- 
rized by custom, sanctioned by the laws, and 
given and received without disguise, without 
criminal intention: the evil is done with a pure 
conscience, and often with the public approbation. 
They are the result of erroneous conceptions, the 
effects of universal prejudice, or long-established 
habitj which, as Montaigne says, blunts the acute- 
ness of the judgment. 

The present is one of those extremely delicate 
topics, in respect of which it may be more pru- 
dent to put the reader in the path of truth, and 
leave him to travel by himself in quest of disco- 
veries, than going through the subject in detail to 
wound established opinions, or interfere with 
individual interests. Without restricting myself 
to any precise order, I shall therefore exhibit some 
few examples in which the mischievous tendency 
is too palpable to admit of denial, and I shall ' 



B. L Cu. VllL— REMUNERATION— WHERE HURTFUL. 55 

begin with an incontrovertible maxim, which will 
furnish the criterion of which we are upon the 
present occasion in search for distinguishing good 
from evil. 

Upon all occasions avoid bestowing anything in 
the shape of reward which may tend to interfere 
with the performance of duty. 

According to this rule, a judge ought not to 
find himself interested in the prolongation of law 
proceedings — the minister of state in the promo- 
tion of wars — the superintendant in promoting 
expense — the moral preceptor in setting an exam- 
ple of insincerity — the man of letters in maintain- 
ing mischievous prejudices at the expense of truth. 
The more narrowly we scrutinize into the sources 
of public evils, the more thoroughly shall we be 
convinced that they ought to be attributed tp the 
neglect of this fundamental rule. 

In support of this maxim, it is not necessary to 
ascribe to men in general an extraordinary procli- 
vity towards corruption. Ordinary prudence and 
probity are sufficient to enable a man to resist 
temptations to crimes, or to lead him to abstain 
from whatever is reputed dishonourable ; but it 
requires somewhat more than ordinary honesty 
and prudence to be proof against the seductions 
of an interest that acts with continual energy, and 
whose temptations are not opposed either by the 
fear of legal punishment, or the condemnation of 
public opinion*: to yield to such temptations, it is 
only necessary for him to follow in the beaten 
track, in which he will be cheered by the presence 
of a multitude of fellow travellers, and encouraged 
by the example of his superiors. To resist these 
seductions, he must expose himself to the impu- 
tation of singularity, he must proclaim that he is 
better than others, he must condemn his col- 



'6 B. I. ch. VIII.— remuneration— where hurtful. 

leagues and predecessors, and be bold enough to 
make an exhibition of his probity. Such magna-- 
nimity is not altogether unexampled, but we must 
not reckon upon prodigies. There are even some 
cases in which by its secresy this seductive inter- 
est is so much the more mischievous ; it operates 
like a concealed magnet, and produces errors in 
the moral conduct against which there has been 
DO previous warning. We have said that the 
legislator ought to endeavour to combine interest 
with duty ; for a still stronger reason ought he to 
avoid as much as possible everything that yields 
to the public functionary a certain or a casual, a 
known or an unknown profit, resulting from the 
omission or violation of his duties ; we now pro- 
ceed to give a few examples. 

In England, the superior judges, beside their 
ample salaries, which it would be improper to 
grudge them, receive certain fees which it is im- 
possible not to grudge them ; since it is from this 
source alone that they can generally be considered 
liable to corruption, and that so much the more 
easily, since they may be subject to its influence 
without themselves perceiving it. These fees are 
multiplied in proportion to the incidents of proce- 
dure, the multiplication of which incidents pro- 
portionably increases the expense and delay of 
obtaining justice, in one case, a judge receives 
nearly 4/. for tying for six months, or a year, the 
hands of justice, and this in one of those cases in 
which indolence adds her seductions to those of 
avarice, and the whole is effected in the presence 
of no other witnesses than such as are urged on- 
ward by a still stronger interest to aggravate the 
abuse. 

Another example from among a thousand : un- 
der the Lord Chancellor, there are twelve subor- 



. B. I. Ch.VUI.— REMUNERATION— WHERE HURTFUL. 67 

dinate judges called Masters in Chancery. When 
an account is to be taken before them, the follow- 
ing is the mode of procedure : — The attornies on 
the one side and the other ought to appear before 
the master, either alone or in company, with 
counsel, as may be convenient. First summons ; 
nobody appears. Second summons ; nobody ap- 
pears. At length, third summons, the parties 
appear, and the matter is put into train. Care, 
however, has been taken to allow only half an 
hour, or an hour, to each set of suitors. The 
parties are not always punctual; the matter is 
begun, the clock strikes, and then the matter is dis- 
missed. At the following hearing it is necessary 
to begin again.' All this is matter of etiquette. 
At each summons, the fees to the judges and the 
counsel are renewed. All the world must live. 
Extortion, it is said, is to be banished from this 
dwellings of finance. At some future day, per- 
haps, it will not be found a fitting guest for the 
Temple of Justice — it will be deemed advisable to 
chase it thence. 

In England as elsewhere, it is asked, why 
law-suits are eternal? The lawyers say it is 
owing to the nature of things. ' Other people say 
it is the fault of the lawyers. The above two 
little traits, which are as two grains of sand picked 
up in the deserts of Arabia, may assist the judg- 
ment as to the causes of delay in such pro- 
cedures. 

3. Previously to the year 1782, the emoluments, 
of the paymaster of the army, whose duty as such 
consisted in signing, or knowing how to sign, his 
name, were considerably higher in time of war 
than in time of peace, being principally constituted 
of a per'centage on the money expended in his 



68 B. I. CH.VlII.—REMUNERATiON— WHERE HURTFUL. 

department This great officer, however, always 
found himself a Member of Parliament, and it is 
believed he was thus paid, not for signing, or 
knowing how to sign, his name, but for talking and 
knowing how to talk. Upon a question of peace 
or war, the probity of this orator must have found 
itself in somewhat an awkward predicament, con-* 
tinually besieged as it must have been by Bellona 
with the offer of an enormous revenue, which was 
to cease immediately he suffered himself to be cor- 
rupted by Peace. When the question of econo- 
mical reform was upon the carpet, this place was 
not forgotten. It was generally felt at that time, 
that so decided an opposition between interest and 
duty was calculated to produce the most perni- 
cious consequences. The emoluments of peace 
and war were, therefore, equalized by attaching a 
fixed salary to the office, and the same plan was 
adopted with respect to various other offices. 

In running over the list of functionaries, from 
the highest to the lowest, one cannot but be 
alarmed at the vast proportion of them who watch 
for war as for a prey. It is impossible to say to 
what a degree, by this personal interest, the most 
important measures of Government are determined. 
It cannot be supposed that ministers of state, 
generals, admirals, or members of parliament, are 
influenced, in the slightest degree, by a vile pe- 
cuniary interest. All these honourable persons 
possess probity as well as wisdom, so that a trifle 
of money never can produce the slightest influence 
upon their conduct, not even the effect of an atom 
upon the immoveable mass of their probity. The 
mischief is, that evil-minded persons are not con.- 
vinced by their assertion, but continue to repeat, 
that—'' The honesty which resists temptation is 



B. r. ch. viii.--.remun£ration^wh£re hurtful. 69 

most noble) but that which flies from it is most 
secure/^*. 

4. In public and private works of all descrip- 
tions, it is customary to pay the architect a per 
centage upon the aggregate amount expended. 
This arrangement is a good one, when the sum to 
be expended is fixed : there is danger in the con* 

^ ^^ Judge A^ has a noble soul/' was. one day said to me by 
one of his friends; '^ this is what he told me was the difference 
between himself and Judge B. Consider him well 3 he will 
never listen to a single word which has the slightest connec- 
tion with any suit which maybe brought before him, unless in 
c^en court ; he fears lest he should be misled, so weak is he : 
he has told me so himself. W]iilst, a^ to me, a suitor might 
whisper in my ear, from morning till night, and might as well 
have been talking to a deaf man." 

I would not insinuate the least suspicion against the valorous 
judge J had I been constrained to form one^ it wouM have been 
dissipated by the elogium he bestowed upon his friend. 

The heroism of Lord Hale, the model of the English judges^ 
took a contrary direction. It had been customs^ry^ when upon 
the circuit, for the judge to receive from the sheriflF a certain 
number of loaves of sugar. On one occasion a sherifiP> who 
happened to have .^ suit which was to be tried before him, 
waited upon his lordship, and, as was customary, presented his 
sugar : Hale would not receive it. The other judge, if he 
had been consistent, would have taken sugar from everybody. 

General Rule, — ^When an honest man is desirous oiF estab- 
lishing his honesty, he ought to employ proo& whicfi will 
serve only for this purpose, and not such as dishonesty alone 
can be interested in causing to be received. 

Before an assembly of the Roman people, it was required 
of Scipio that he should render his accounts. His answer 
was — ^* Romans, on such a day I gained a victory: let us 
ascend to the Capitol, and return thanks to the Gods." His 
quietus was granted immediately, and since that day, besides 
allowing that Scipio was a great warrior, all the historians 
have been assured of the correctness of his accounts. As to 
me, had I lived at that time, most probably I should have gone 
up with the rest to the Capitol, but I should always have 
attained a little curiosity with respect to the accounts. 



60 B. 1. ch. VIII.— remuneration— where hurtful. 

trary case, since the greater the expense the 
greater is the architect's pecuniary profit. 

5. Veracity is one of the most important bases 
of human society. The due administration of 
justice absolutely depends upon it ; whatever 
tends to weaken it, saps the foundations of mora- 
lity, security, and happiness. The more we reflect 
on its importance, the more we shall be astonished 
that legislators have so indiscreetly multiplied the 
operations which tend to weaken itd influence.* 

When the possession of the revenues, or other 
privileges attached to a certain condition of life, 
depends upon the previous performance of certain 
acts which are required at entering upon that 
condition, these privileges cannot fail to operate 
upon individuals as incentives to the performance 
of those acts : the effect produced is the same as if 
they were attached to such performance under the 
title of reward. 

If among the number of these acts, promises 
which are never performed are required under 
the sanction of an oath, these privileges or other 
advantages can only be regarded as rewards 
offered for the commission of perjury. If among 
the number of these acts it is required, that 
certain opinions which are not believed should 
be pretended to be believed, these advantages are 
neither more nor less than rewards offered for in- 
sincerity. But the sanction of an oath once con- 
temned, is contemned at all times. Oaths may 
afterwards be observed, but they will not be ob- 
served because they are oaths* 

In the university of Oxford, among whose 
members the greater number of ecclesiastical be- 

♦ See Traites de Legislation, torn. 3> ch. xviiL (Ed. 1820.) 
Emploi du mobile de la Religion. 



B.I. Ch.VIII.— REMUNERATION— WHERE HURTJUL. 61 

nefices are bestowed, and which even for laymen 
is the most fashions^ble place of education, when a 
young man presents himself for admission, his 
tutor who is generally a clergyman, and the vice- 
chancellor who is also a clergyman, put into his 
hands a book of statutes, of which they cause him 
to swear to observe every one. At the same time, 
it is perfectly well known to this vice-chancellor 
and to this tutor, that there never has been any 
person who was able to observe all these statutes. 
It is thus, that the first lesson this young man 
learns, and the only lesson he is sure to learn, is a 
lesson of perjury.* 

Nor is this all ; his next step is to subscribe, in 
testimony of his belief, to a dogmatical formulary 
composed about two centuries ago, asserted by 
the Church of England to be infallibly true, and 
by most other churches believed to be as infallibly 
false. By this expedient, one class of men is ex- 
cluded, while three classes are admitted. The class 
excluded is composed of men who, either from a 
sense of honour, or from conscientious motives, 
cannot prevail upon themselves publicly and deli- 
berately to utter a lie. The classes admitted con- 
sist — 1. Of those who literally believe these dog- 
mas — 2. Of those who disbelieve them — 3. Of 
those who sign them as they would sign the 
Alcoran, without knowing what they sign, or 
what they think about it. A nearly similar prac- 
tice is pursued at Cambridge, and from these 
two sources the clergy of the Church of England 
is supplied. 

Socrates was accused as a corrupter of youth. 
What was meant by this accusation I know not. 

* Se« further upan this subject in Mr. Bentham's work, 
entitled^ Swear not at all. 



62 B.I. Ca.VUI-— REMUNERATION--WHERE HURTFUL. 

But this I know, that to instruct the young in 
falsehood and perjury, is to corrupt them; and 
that the benefit of all the other lessons they can 
learn can never equal the mischief of this instruct 
tion.* 

6. It may be enquired, whether rewards or other 
advantages ought to be oflFered for the defence of 
any opinion in matters of theory or science, or any 
other subject upon which opinions are divided ?f 
If the question be one of pure curiosity, the worst 
that can happen will be that the reward will be ex-- 
pended in waste. But if the opinion thus favoured 
happen to be a false one and at the same time 
mischievous, the reward will be productive of un- 
mixed evil. But whether it be a question of curi* 
osity or use, if truth be the object desired, the 
chance of obtaining it is not so great as when the 
candidates for reward are allowed to seek it where« 
soever it may be to be found. If error is to be de- 
fended, to ojQfer a reward for its defence, would be 
one if not the only method to be adopted. Who 
is there that does not perceive that to obtain true 
testimony, it is inexpedient to offer a reward to the 
witness who shall depose upon a given side ? Who 
does not know that the constant effect of such an 
offer is to discredit the cause of him who makes it? 
If then anything is to be gained by such partiality, 
it can only be by error ; truth can only be a loser 
by such partial reward. 

This practice is attended with another and more 
manifest inconvenience ; it is that of causing opi- 
nions to be professed which are not believed ; of 
inducing a truculent exchange not only of truth, 
but of sincerity, for money. 

I do not know if governments ought even to 

• See Appendix (A) f See Appendix (B) 



B.I. Ch.VHI,— REMUNERATION— WHERE HURTFUL. 63 

permitandividuals to oflfer rewards upon these con- 
ditions. To establish error, to repudiate truth, to 
suborn falsehood : these, in a few words, are the 
effects of all rewards established in favour of one 
system to the exclusion of all others. 

7. Charity is ever an amiable virtue ; but if in- 
judiciously employed, is liable to produce more 
evil than good. Hospitals inconsiderately multi- 
plied ; regular distributions' of provisions, such as 
were formerly made at the doors of many convents 
in Spain and Italy, tend to habituate a large pro- 
portion of the people to idleness and beggary. A 
reward thus offered to indolence, impoverishes the 
state and corrupts the people. Luxury (and I annex 
to this word whatever meaning, except that of pro- 
digality, people choose to give to it) luxury, that 
pretended vice so much reprobated by the envious 
and melancholic, is the steady and natural bene- 
factor of the human species : it is a master who is 
always doing good, even when he aims not at it ; 
he rewards only the industrious. Charity is also a 
benefactor, but great circumspection is required 
that it may prove so. 

8. There is another manner in which reward 
may be mischievous : by acting in opposition to the 
service required, when, for example, the emolu- 
ments attached to an office are such as to afford the 
means and temptation not to fulfil the duties of it. 
In such a case, what may appear a paradox is not 
the less a great truth : the whole does less than a 
part; by paying too much, the sovereign is less 
effectually served. But this subject belongs natu- 
rally to the bead of salaries. 

9. Whatever weakens the connexion between \ 
punishments and offences, operates in proportion as 
an encouragement to the commission of offences. 



64 B.I. Ch.VIII.^REMUNERATION— WHERE HURTFUL. 

It has the effect of a reward offered for their perpe- 
tration, for whether the inducement to conoimit 
offences is augmented, or the restraining motives 
are debilitated, the result in both cases is the 
same. 

Thus, a tax on justice is an indirect reward 
offered for injustice. The same is the case with 
respect to all technical rules, by which, indepen- 
dently of the merits, nullities are introduced into 
contracts and into procedure ; of, every rule that 
excludes the evidence of a witness, the only de- 
,pository of the fact upon which depends the due 
administration of justice. In a word, it is the same 
with everything fhat tends to loosen the connexion 
between injury and compensation, between the 
violation of the law and punishment. 

If we open our eyes we shall behold the same 
legislators establishing rewards for informers, and 
taxes and fees upon law proceedings : they desire 
that the first should induce men to render them 
services of which they stand in need, whilst the 
latter tend to weaken the natural disposition which 
is felt to render these same services. At the 
threshold of the tribunal of justice are placed a bait 
and a bugbear — the bait operates upon the few, the 
bugbear upon the multitude. 

10. There are cases in which to avoid a greater 
inconvenience, it has been found necessary to dis- 
pose of the matter of reward in such manner as 
that it shall operate as a reward for the most atro- 
cious crime ; yet, in spite of the force of the 
temptation, this crime is almost unexampled. I 
allude to the rule established with respect to suc- 
cessions. Happily, whatever may be the force of 
the seductive motives in this case, the tutelary 
motives act in full concert with all their energy. 



b;i. ch.viii.— remuneration— where hurtful. 65 

There are many men who for a trifling personal 
benefit, for an advance in rank, or even to gratify 
their spleen, would, without scruple, use their 
utmost exertions to produce a war that would cost 
the lives of two or three hundred thousand of their 
fellow creatures ; while among these men there 
would not be found perhaps one, who, though he 
were set free from the dread of legal punishment, 
could be induced for a much greater advantage, to 
attempt the life of a single individual, and still less, 
the life of a parent whose death would put him 
in possession of a fortune or a title. 

But though laws cannot be framed for its com- 
plete removal, nothing which can be done without 
inconvenience ought to be left undone towards the 
diminution of this danger. The persons most ex- 
posed to become its victims, are those who are ne- 
cessarily placed under the control of others, such 
as infants and women. It is under the guidance of 
this principle, that our laws in some cases have 
selected as guardians those persons upon whom no 
interest can devolve in the way of succession. ' 
Under the laws of Sweden, precautions of the same 
description are observed; and it has been else- 
where shown that this consideration furnishes one 
of the arguments in favour of the liberty of 
divorce.* 

"Contracts relating to insurance furnish another 
instance of the same danger* These contracts, in 
other respects so beneficial, have given birth to a 
new species of crime. A man insures a ship or 
a house at a price greatly beyond its value, with the 
intention of setting fire to the house or causing the 
ship to be lost, and then under pretence of com^ 
pe^isation for the loss of which he is the author, 

' * Trait^s de Legislation, torn. i. p. 346 (Ed. 1820). 

5 



66 B.I. Ch.VUI.— REMUNERATION— WHERE HURTFUL. 

claims the money for which the insurance is made. 
Thus one of the most beneficial inventions of civi- 
lized society is converted into a premium for dis- 
honesty, and a punishment to virtuous industry. 
Had the commission of this crime been attended 
with less risk, or been less difficult to conceal, this 
most admirable contrivance for softening inevitable 
calamities must have been abandoned. 



[ 67 ] 



CHAPTER IX. 

REMUNERATION— "WHERE NEEDLESS. 

Factitious reward is superfluous, whenever 
natural reward is adequate to produce the desired 
eflFect. 

Under this head may be classed all inventions 
in the arts which are useful to individuals, and 
whose products may become articles of commerce. 
In the ordinary co urse o f commerce the inventor 
will meeTwTnrTTiatural^ 
t i omt^t^^is^^u^ discavjeiy , and which 

wfli unite within itself all ithe qualities whicli can 
be desired in a factitious reward. After the most 
mature consideration, no sovereign can find ano- 
ther measure so exact as is thus afforded by the 
free operations of trade. All that the govern- 
ment has to do is to secure for a time, to the in- 
ventor, whatever benefit his discovery may yield. 
This is generally done by the grant of an exclusive 
privilege, or patent. Of this we shall elsewhere 
speak more in detail. 

Not many years ago a grant of 3000/. was made 
by Parliament to a physician for the discovery 
of a yellow dye. That money might, without 
doubt, have been worse employed : but the re- 
ward was unnecessary: — for this discovery, as for 
all others in the arts, the proper test of its utility 
would have been its use in manufactures and 

m 

commerce. The grant of a determinate sum was 
a loss either to the inventor or to the public: to 
the inventor, if it were less than he would have 
gained under a patent : to the public, if it were 
more. In a word, wherever patents for inventions 

5. 



68 B.I. Ch.IX.—REMUNERATIOK— WHERE NEEDLESS. 

are in use, factitious reward is either groundless or 
superfluous.* 

I shall elsewhere treat of the encouragements to 
be given to the arts and sciences. Upon the pre- 
sent occasion all that I shall observe is, that the 
greater the progress they have made, the less ne- 
cessary is it to tax the public for their support. In 
this country, for example, if the exclusive pro-' 
perty in his work be secured to an author, a 
reward is at the same time secured to him pro- 
portionate to the service he has performed ; at 
least in every branch of amusement or instruction 
that yields a sufficient class of readers. There is 
I no patron to be compared with the public; and 
\by the honour with its other rewards which it be- 
stows, this patronage has a decided advantage over 
any that can be received from any other source. 

With respect to the rewards, that in some Euro- 
pean states have been bestowed upon poets, the 
amount of them is so insignificant as to save them 
from the severe scrutiny to which they might, 
under other circumstances, have found themselves 

* Parliament has granted^ in two several suix)s> M>000Z. 
to Dr. Jenner^ so celebrated by his invention or introduction 
of the system of vaccination. This may be considered^ per- 
haps, rather as an indemnification than a reward, at least than 
a reward proportionate to the service : I say indemnification, 
because the labour, the researches, the correspondence, the 
time employed in committing to writing, in teaching and in 
establishing, his new system, were so many sacrifices of the 
profits of his profession. As to the natural reward that he 
gained by his discovery it was nothing : it impoverished instead 
of enriching him. The liberality with which the physicians 
throughout Europe, have encouraged a discovery that has 
lopped off one of the most lucrative branches of their profes- 
sion, is a most honourable feature in the annals of medicine. 
When shall we see the lawyers entering into rivalship with 
them, by the discovery and propagation of the most simple 
and expeditious mode of legal jprocedure ? 



B. I. ch. ix.~remuneration-.where needless. 69 

exposed. There are some countries in which the 
relish for literature is confined to such small num- 
bers, that it may, upon the whole, be beneficial to 
encourage it by factitious rewards. But if wq 
consider how intense are the enjoyments of the' 
man born with poetic talents, the sudden reputa- 
tion that it produces, and the ample profit that/ 
it often yields, especially in the dramatic line, ii 
will be found, that the natural rewards attached U 
it are far from being inconsiderable ; and that, at 
least, our attention ought, in the first place, to be\ 
directed to the department of the sciences, the \ 
approaches to which are repulsive and the utility 
of which are indisputable. Happiness depends 
upon the correctness of the facts with which 
our mind is furnished, and the rectitude of our^ 
judgment ; but poetry has no very direct ten- 
dency to produce either correctness of know- 
ledge, or rectitude of judgment. For one instance 
in which it has been employed to combat mis- 
chievous prejudices, a thousand might be cited in 
which they have been fostered and propagated by 
it. Homer is the greatest of poets : where shall 
we place him among moralists? Can any great 
advantage be derived from the imitation of his 
gods and heroes ? I do not condemn prizes for 
poetry where the object is to excite youthful emu- 
lation : I only desire that serious and truly useful 
pursuits may receive a proportionate encourage- 
ment. 



[ 70 ] 



CHAPTER X. 

PROPORTION AS TO REWARDS. 

In confgfripg reward^ the observansejef^exact 
'•"kso^p^r^portiftn if^JigMi^flj[j^ import- 

ODce. as in the inflictioD 6t plTmsIb^ These 
rules cannot, however, be negTected with impunity. 
If too great a reward be held out for a given service, 
competitors will be attracted from more useful pur- 
suits. If too little, the desired service will either 
not be rendered or will not be rendered in perfec- 
tion. 

Rule I. The aggregate value of the natural and 
factitious reward, ought not to be less than suffi- 
cient to outweigh the burthen of the service. 

Rule II. Factitious rewards may be diminished 
in proportion, as natural rewards are increased. 

These two rules present three subjects to our 
observation — 1. The natural burthens attached to 
the service, 2. The natural rewards which either 
do or do not require factitious reward to supply 
their deficiency. 3. The drawback, more or less 
hidden, which in a variety of cases alters the ap- 
parent value of the reward. 

The natural burthens of any particular service, 
may be comprised linder the following heads : the 
intensity of labour required in its performance, 
— the ulterior uneasiness which may arise from 
its particular character, — the physical danger at- 
tending it, — the expenses or other sacrifices neces- 
sarily made previously to its exercise, — the discredit 
attached to it, — the peculiar enmities it produces. 
The wages of labour in diflferent branches of trade, 
are regulated in exact proportion to the combina- 
ti6n of these several circumstances. To the legis- 



B. I. Cu. X«— PROPORTION AS TO REWARDS. 71 

lator, however, except in cases where it may be 
necessary to add factitious to natural reward, con* 
siderations of this sort are in general subjects only 
of speculation.* 

That any particular service is more or less highly 
priced, is of little importance : it affects the indivi- 
duals only who stand in need of it. The competi- 
tion between those who want and th9se who caa 
supply, fixes the price of all services in the most 
fitting manner, it is sufficient that the demand 
be public and free. To assist, if necessary, in giving 
publicity to the demand and in maintaining reci** 
procat liberty in such transactions, is all that the 
legislator ought to do, 

3. Natural rewards are liable to be insufficient 
in relatiojpi to services, whdse utility extends to the 
whole community, without producing particular 
advantage to any one individual more than another. 
Of this nature are public employments. It is true, 
many public employments are attended by natural 
rewards in the shape of honour, power, the means 
of serving ones connections, and deserving the 
public gratitude, and when these rewards are suffi** 
cient, factitious rewards are superfluous. To their 
ambassadors and many others of their great officers 
of state, the Venetians never gave any pecuniary 
reward. In England, the public functions of she- 
riffs and justices of the peace, are generally dis- 
charged by opulent and independent individuals, 
whose only reward consists in the respect and 
power attached to those offices. 

3. There are many circumstances which may 
diminish the value ofa reward without being gene^ 
rally known beforehand, but against all of which 

♦ In The Wealth of Nations, b. i. ch. 10. The circumstancei 
which cause the rate of wages to vary in diflferent employ- 
ments^ are analysed with the sagacity which characterizes the 
father of political economy. 



72 B. I. Ch. X.— PROPORTION AS TO REWARDS. 

it is proper to guard. Does the reward consist of 
money, its value may be diminished by a burthen 
of the same nature, or by a burthen in the shape of 
honour. (^Honour and money may even be seen at 
strife with one another, as well as with themselves. ) 
By these means the value of a reward may some-" 
times be reduced to nothing and even become 
negative. 

In this country where, properly speaking, there 
is no public prosecutor, many offences, which no 
individual has any peculiar interest in prosecuting, 
are liable to remain unpunished. In the way of 
remedy, the law offers from 10/. to 20/. to be levied 
upon the goods of the offender, to whoever will 
successfully undertake this function : sometimes it 
is added, that the expenses will be repaid in case 
of conviction : sometimes this is not promised. 
These expenses may amount to thirty, fifty and 
even one hundred pounds ; it is seldom they are 
so little as twenty pounds. After this, can we be 
surprised that the laws are imperfectly obeyed ? 

It maybe added, that it is considered dishonour- 
able to attend to this summons of the laws. An in- . 
dividual who, in this manner, endeavours to serve 
his country is called an informer, and lest public 
opinion should not be sufficient to brand him with 
infamy, the servants of the law and even the laws 
themselves have, on some occasions, endeavoured 
to fix the stain. The number of private prosecu- 
tors would be much more numerous if, instead of 
the insidious offer of a reivard, an indemnification 
were substituted. The dishonourable offer being 
suppressed, the dishonour itself would cease. And 
who can say, when, by such an arrangement, the 
circumstance which offends it is removed, whether 
honour itself may not be pressed into the service 
of the laws ? 

There is another case in which, by the negli- 



fi.]. Ch.X.— PROPORTION AS TO REWARDS. 73 

gence of legal and official arrangements, a consider- 
able and certain expense is attached to and made 
to precede a variable and uncertain reward. A 
new idea presents itself to some workman or artist. 
Knowing that the laws grant to every inventor a 
privilege to enable him exclusively to r^ap the 
profits of his invention, he enjoys by anticipation 
his success, and labours to perfect his invention. 
Having in the prosecution of his discovery con- 
sumed, perhaps, the greater part of his property 
and his life, his invention is complete. He goes, 
with a joyful heart, to the public office to ask for 
his patents But what does he encounter ? Clerks, 
lawyers, and officers of state, who reap beforehand 
the fruits of his industry. This privilege is not 
given, but is, in fact, sold for from 100/. to 900/.: 
sums greater perhaps than he ever possessed in his 
life. He finds himself caught in a snare, which 
the law, or rather extortion, which has obtained 
the force of law, has spread for the industrious 
inventor. It is a tax levied upon ingenuity, and no 
man can set bounds to the value of the services ; 
it may have lost to the nation. 

Rule HI. Reward should be adjusted in such a / 
manner to each particular service, that for every 
part of the benefit there maybe a motive to induce 
a man to give birth to it. 

In other words, the v alue of the reward ought 
to advatfice,>4Uep^by st§p,. with. the value of the 
service. This rule TT more accurately followed 
in respect of rewards than of punishments. If a 
man steals a quantity of corn, the punishment is 
the same whether he steal one bushel or ten ; but 
when a premium is given for the exportation of 
corn, the amount of the premium bears an exact 
proportion to the amount exported. To be con- 



74 IB. L Cu. X.-^FRaPORTION AS TX> lUSWARDSw 

sistent in matters of legislation, the scale ought 
to be as regular in the one case as in the other. 

The utility of this rule is put beyond doubt, by 
the difference that may be observed between the 
quantity of work performed by men employed by 
the day and men employed by the pjece. When a 
ditch is to be dug, and the work is divided between 
one set of men working by the day, and another 
set working by the piece, there is no difficulty in 
predicting which set will have finished first, 

Hope and, perhaps, emulation are the motives 
which actuate the labourer by the piece : the motive 
which actuates the labourer by the day is fear: fear 
of being discharged in case of manifest and extra- 
ordinary idleness. 

It must not however be forgotten, that there are 
many sorts of work, in respect of which it is im- 
proper to adopt this mode of payment; which 
tends indeed to produce the greatest quantity of 
labour, but at the same time is calculated to give 
birthjtOHajegligence and precipitation. "This method 
f ought only to be employed in cases where the 
] quality of the work can easily be discerned, and 
' its imperfections (if any) detected. 

The value of a reward may be increased or 
diminished, in respect of certainty as well as 
amount: when, therefore, any services require 
frequently renewed efforts, it is desirable that 
each effort should render the probability of its 
attainment more certain. 

Arrangements should be made for connecting 
serviciaa^with reward, in such manner that the at- 
tainment of the reward shall remain iinceft^^^^ 
out however ceasing to be more probable than the 
contrary event. The faculties of the individual 
employed will thus naturally be kept upon the 



B.I. Ch. X.— PROPORTION AS TO REWARDS. 76 

Hill Stretch. This is accomplished when a com* 
pe tit ion is established between two or more per* 
sons, and a reward is promised to that one who 
shall render service in the most eminent degree^ 
whether it respect the quantity or the quality of 
the service proposed. 

Rule IV. When twojtervices com e in com peti^ 
tion, of which aj&an cSnToFWind^ucedT^ 
both, the reward for the greater sex^a^ce-jOJU^Ja 
be stifficfeiit toTfidDtfe him to prefer it to the less. 

In a certain country matters are so arranged, 
that more is to be gained by building ships on the 
old plan than by inventing better ; by taking one 
ship than by blockading a hundred; by plundering 
at sea than by fighting; by distorting the established 
laws than by executing them ; by clamouring for 
or against ministers, than by showing in what 
manner the laws may be improved. It must how* 
ever be admitted, that in respect of some of these 
abuses, it would be difficult to prescribe the proper 
remedy. 

By what method can competition between two 
services be established ? Theindividual from whom 
they are required must, either from personal quali^ 
fications or external circumstances, have it in his 
power to render either the one or the other. It is 
proper to distinguish the cases in which this posi« 
tion is transient from those in which it is permanent. 
It is in the first that the fault committed, by suffer^ 
ing disproportion to subsist, is most irreparable. 

During the American war, upwards of an hun- 
dred ships were, at one time, in one of the har- 
bours of the revolted colonies. It was of great 
importance that they should be kept in a state of 
blockade, since many of them were loaded with 
military stores. An English captain received 



76 B. L Ch. X.--PROPORTION AS TO REWARDS. 

orders to blockade them. Sufficiently skilled in 
arithmetic, and in proverbs, to know that two or 
three birds in his cage were worth a hundred in the 
bush, he acted as the greater number of men would 
have acted in his place. He stood off to a suffi* 
cient distance to give the enemy hopes of escaping : 
as soon as they had quitted the harbour, he re- 
turned, captured half-a-dozen, and the rest pro- 
ceeded to their destination. I do not answer for 
the truth of this anecdote ; but true or not true, it 
is equally good as an apologue. It exhibits one 
of the fruits of that inconsiderate prodigality, 
which grants, without discrimination, the produce 
of their captures to the captors. 

Another example. A man who has influence 
obtains the command of a frigate, with orders to 
go upon a cruise. The command of a first-rate is 
accepted by those only who cannot obtain a frigate. 
It is thus that interest is put in competition with 
duty: cupidity with glory. There are doubtless 
not wanting noble minds by whom the seductions 
of sinister interest are resisted : but wherefore 
should they be so much exposed to what it is so 
difficult to resist ? 

It is true, that their ears may not be altogether 
insensible to the call of honour; the law has be- 
stowed pecuniary rewards upon the captors of 
armed vessels, — another example, where one in- 
stance of profusion has created the necessity of a 
second, — but these rewards are still unequal : the 
chase of doves is more advantageous than the pur- 
suit of eagles. 

The remedy would be to tax, and tax heavily, 
the profits of lucrative cruises, to form a fund of 
reward in favour of dangerous, or merely useful 
expeditions. By this arrangement, the country 



B. I. Cil. X.— PROPORTION AS TO REWARDS. 77 

would be doubly benefited, the service would bef 
rendered more attractive, and conducted with more 
economy. It may be true, that if this tax were 
deducted from the share of the seamen, their 
ardour might be cooled. Neither in value or in 
number are their prizes in this lottery susceptible 
of diminution ; but though this be true with 
respect to the lower ranks of the profession, ought 
we to judge in the same manner of the superior 
officers, whose minds are elevated as their rank, 
and on whose conduct the performance of the duty 
has the most immediate dependence ? 

In the judicial department, the service which 
belongs to the profession of an advocate, and the 
service which belongs to the office of a judge, are 
in a state of rivalry. They constitute the elements 
of two permanent conditions, of which the first 
among most nations is the preliminary route to the 
second. In England, the judges are uniformly 
selected from among the class of advocates. Now 
the interest of the country requires that the choice 
should fall upon thd men of highest attainments 
in their profession, since upon the reputation of 
the judges depends the opinion which every man 
forms of his security. It is not of the same im- 
portance to the public that advocates should be 
supereminently skilful ; their occupation is not to 
seek out what is agreeable to justice, but what 
agrees with the interest of the party to which 
chance has engaged them. On the contrary, the 
more decidedly any advocate is exalted in point 
of talents above his colleagues, the more desirable 
is it that he should no longer continue an advo- 
cate. In proportion to his pre-eminence, is the 
probability that he will be opposed to the distri- 
bution of justice. The worse the cause of the 



78 B.L CK.X.— PROPORTION AS TO li£WARD9. 

suitor, the more pressidg is his need of an able 
advocate to remedy his weakness. 

Per Annum. 
In England, the emoluments of the Lord Chan* 

cellor are reckoned at - - - £20,000 

Thoae of the Vice-Chancellor . - - 5,00O 

Those of the Master of the Rolls - - 4,00O 

Those of the Chief Justice of the King's Bench - 6,500 

Those of the Chief Justice of the Common Fleas - 5,000 

Those of the Chief Baron of the Exchequer - 5,000 

Those of the Nine Puisne Judges - - 4,000 

Now amongst the class of advocates, there are 
always to be found about half a dozen whose an- 
nual emoluments average from eight to twelve 
thousand pounds. Of this number there is not one 
who would not disdain the office of puisne judge, 
since bis profits are actually two or three times 
as great as theirs. To these advocates of the first 
class may be added as many more, who would 
equally disdain these subordinate situations, in the 
hope every day of succeeding to the advocates 
who shall succeed to the principal situations* 
There are two methods of obviating this inconve- 
nience : the one by increasing the emoluments of 
the judges. (This course has been adopted upon 
many occasions, and they have been raised to their 
present amount, without success.) The other con- 
sists in lowering the profits of the advocates : a 
desirable object in more respects than one, but 
which can result only from rendering the whole 
system of the laws more simple and intelligible. 

In the department of education, there is a nearly 
similar rivalry between the profession of the 
clergy and the office of professor, as between the 
profession of advocate and the office of judge, in 
the department of the laws. In proportion as he 
is what he ought to be, in order to be useful, a 



8. L Ch. X^-PROPORTION AS TO REWARI>S. 79 

clergyman is a professor of morality, having for 
his pupils a larger or smaller number of persons of 
every class, during the whole course of their lives. 
On the other hand, a professor (as he is called) 
has for his pupils a number of select individuals, 
whose character is calculated to exercise the 
greatest influence upon the general mass of the 
people, and among their number the clergy are 
generally to be found. The period during which 
these individuals attend the lecturer of the pro- 
fessor, is the most critical period of life ; the only 
period during which they are under obligation to 
pay attention to what they hear, or to receive the 
instruction presented to them. Such being the 
relation between the services of the two classes, 
let us see what is the proportion between the 
amount of reward respectively allotted to each. 

In England, the emoluments of the clergy vary 
from 20/. to 10,000/. a-year, while those of the 
professors in the chief seats of education — the 
universities, are between the twentieth and the 
hundredth part of the latter sum. In Scotland, the 
emoluments of the professors differ but little from 
what they are in England, but the richest ecclesi- 
astical benefice is scarcely equal to the least pro- 
ductive professorship. It is thus, says Adam 
Smith, that '^ in England the church is continually 
draining the universities of all their best and 
ablest members ; and an old college tutor, who is 
known and distinguished as an eminentjnan of 
letters, is rarely to be found,^^ whilst in Scotland 
the case is exactly the reverse. It is by the in- 
influence of this circumstance that he explains 
how academical education is so excellent in the 
Scottish universities, and, according to him, so 
defective in those of England. 



80 B. L ch. X.— proportion as to rewards. 

Between two profession? which do not enter 
into competition with each other (for example, 
those of opera-dancers and clergymen) a dispro- 
portion between their emoluments is not attended 
with such palpable inconveniences ; but when by 
any circumstance two professions are brought into 
comparison with each other, the least advantage- 
ous loses its value by the comparison, and the 
disproportion presents to the eye of the observer 
the idea of injustice. 



C 81 ] 



CHAPTER XL 



CHOICE AS TO REWARDS. 



In making a proper selection of punishments, 
much skill is required : comparatively, much less 
is requisite in the proper selection of rewards. 
Not only are the species of rewards more limited 
in number than those of punishments, but the 
grounds of preference are more easily discover- 
able, and there are not, as in the case of punish- 
ments, any passions which tend to mislead the 
judgment. 

The qualities desirable in rewards are the same 
as in the case of punishments : we shall enumerate 
them, and then proceed to point out in what 
degree they are united in certain modes of remu- 
neration. 

A reward is best adapted to fulfil the purpose 
for which it may be designed, when it is — 

1. Variable^ susceptible of increase or diminu- 
tion in respect of amount, that it may be propor- 
tioned to the different degrees of service. 

S. Equable, that equal portions may at all times 
operate with equal force upon all individuals. 
1 3. Commensurable, with respect to other spe- 
cies of rewards attached to other services. 

4. Exemplary: its apparent ought not to dif- 
fer from its real value. Thia quality is wanting 
when a large expense is incurred for the pur- 
pose of reward, without its becoming matter of 
notoriety. The object aimed at ought to be to 

6 



82 B. I. Ch.XI.— CHOICE AS TO REWARDS. 

Strike the attention, and produce a durable im- 
pression. 

6. Economical. More ought not to be paid for a 
service than it is worth. This is the rule in every 
market. 

6. Characteristic : as far as possible analogous to 
the service. It becomes by this means the more 
exemplary. 

7. Popular. It ought not to oppose established 
prejudices. In vain did the Roman emperors 
bestow honours upon the most odious informers; 
they degraded the honours, but the informers were 
not the less infamous. But it is not enough that 
it does not oppose the prejudices, it is desirable 
that every reward should obtain the approbation 
of the public. 

8. Fmctifying : calculated to excite the per- 
severance of the individual in the career of service, 
and to supply him with new resburces. 

In the selection from among the variety of 
rewards, of that particular one which most cer- 
tainly will produce any desired effect, attention 
must not only be paid to the nature of the service, 
but also to the particular disposition and character 
of the individual upon whom it is to operate.* 
In this respect, public regulations can never attain 
the perfection of which domestic discipline is sus- 
ceptible. No sovereign can ever in the same 
degree be acquainted with the dispositions of his 
subjects as a father may be with those of his chil- 
dren ; this disadvantage is however compensated 
by the larger number of competitors. In a king- 
dom, every diversity of temperament, and every 

* See Traites de Legislation^ torn. 1. ch. ix. Des dr- 
constances qui influent sur la sensibilitS. Or, Theory of Morals 
and Legislation, vol. 1, ch. vi. 



B.I. Ch. XI*— CHOICE AS TO REWARDS. 83 

degree of aptitude may be found united together, 
and provided the reward he proportionate to the 
service, it will be of little importance what may be 
its nature : like the magnet, which out of a hete-* 
rogenous mass attracts and separates the most 
hidden particles of iron, it will detect the indi- 
vidual susceptible of its attraction. Besides, the 
nature of pecuniary reward, which is adapted to 
the greater proportion of services, is such that 
every individual may convert it into the species 
of pleasure which he most prefers. 

To form a judgment of the merits and demerits 
of pecuniary reward, a glance at the list of desira- 
ble qualities will suffice. It will at once be seen 
which of them it possesses and of which it is 
deficient : it is variable^ equable, and comme^isura^ 
hie; it ought to be added, that it is frequently 
indispensably necessary ; there are many cases in 
which every other reward separated from this 
would not only be a burthen, but even ft mockery, 
especially if the perforniance of the service has 
been attended with an expense or loss greater than 
the individual can easily support. 

On the other hand, pecuniary reward is' not 
exempt from disadvantages : speaking generally 
(for there are many exceptions) it is neither exem- 
plary, nor characteristic, nor even popular J^ When 

* ^^ An defaut de n*etre pas dignesde la vertu, les recom- 
penses pecuniaires joignent celiii de n*6tre pas assez publiques, 
de ne pas parler sans cesse aux yeux et aux coeurs^ de dispa- 
roitre aussit6t qu'elles sont accordees^ et de ne laisser aucune 
trace visible qui excite Temulation en perp^tuant Thonneur 
qui doit les accompagner.** — ^Rousseau : Gouvemment de Po- 
logne, ch. xi. The phrase in italics is one of the too common 
exaggerations in the writings of Rousseau. It 13 more striking 
than just. 

In his letter to the Duke of Wirtemberg upon education, in 

6. 



84 B. I. ch. XL— choice as to rewards. 

allowed to exceed a certain amount, it tends to 
diminish the activity of the receiver : instead of 
adding to his inclination to persevere in his ser- 
vices, it may furnish him with a temptation to 
discontinue them. JThe enriched man will be apt 
to think like the soldier of Lucullus, who became 
timid so soon as he possessed property to preserve. 



t 

Ibit e5^ quo vis^ qui zonam perdidit^ inquit. 

HoR. Epist. II. Lib. 2. 

There are also cases in which money, instead 
of an attractive, may have a repulsive effect; in- 
stead of operating as a reward, may be considered 
as an insult, at least by persons who possess any 
delicacy in their sentiments of honour. A certain 
degree of skill is therefore required in the applica- 
tion of money as a reward : it is oftentimes desira- 
ble that the pecuniary should appear only as an 
accessary tyf the honorary, which should be made 
to constitute the principal part of the reward.* 

Every pecuniary reward maybe, as it were, anni- 
hilated by its relative smallness. A man of inde- 
pendent fortune, and of a certain rank iii society, 
would be considered as degraded by accepting a 
sum that would not degrade a mechanic. There 
is no rule for determining what is permitted or 
prohibited in this respect: custom has established 
the prejudice. But the difficulty it presents is 

which he shows that he had reflected much upon the unioa 
of interest with duty> he says, '^ L*argent est un ressort dans 
la mechanique morale, mais il repousse toujours la main qui le 
&it agir." Toujours is an exaggeration. 

* Tel donne i pl^ines mains qui n'oblige personne^ 
Jjbl fa9on de Conner vaut mieux que ce qu*on donne. 

X>e Menteur, Schne 1. 



B.I. Cti.XL-X;HOXG£ AS TO REWARDS. 85 

not insurmountable. By combining together 
money and honour, a compound is formed which 
is universally pleasing: medals, for example, 
possess this double advantage* By a little art and 
precaution, a solid peace is established between 
pride and cupidity; and thus united, they have both 
been ranged under the banners of merit. Pride 
proclaims aloud, — " It is not the intrinsic value of 
the metal which possesses attractions for me ; it is 
the circle of glory alone with which it is sur- 
rounded.^^ Cupidity makes its calculation in si- 
lence, and accurately estimates the value of the 
material of the prize. 

By the Society of Arts a still higher degree of 
perfection has been attained. A choioe is com- 
monly allowed between a sum of money and a 
medal. Thus all conditions and tastes are satis- 
fied. The mechanic or peasant pockets the money. 
The peer or gentleman ornaments his cabinet with 
a medal. 

The apparent value of medals is in some cases 
augmented, by rendering the design upon them 
characteristic of the service on account of which 
they are bestowed. By the addition of the name 
of the individual rewarded, an exclusive certificate 
is made in his favour. The ingenuity displayed 
in the choice of the design has sometimes been 
extremely happy. 

A British statute gives to the person who ap- 
prehends and convicts a highwayman, amongst 
other rewards, the horse on which the offender 
was mounted when he committed the* offence. 
Possibly the framer of this law may have taken 
the hint from the passage in Virgil, in which the 
son of £neas promises to Nisus, in case of the 
success of the expedition he was meditating, the / 
very horse and accoutrements which Turn us had 



86 B. I. ch. xi.-*choic£ as to rewards. 

been seen to use.* It is equally possible, that 
the same knowledge of human nature, which sug- 
gested to the Latin poet the efficacy of such a 
reward, suggested it at once to the English law- 
giver. Be this as it may, this provision is com- 
mendable on three several accounts. In the lis- 
signment of the prize, it pitches upon an object, 
which, from the nature of the transaction, is likely 
to make a particular impression on the mind of the 
.person whose assistance is required; acting in this 
jrespect in conformity to the rule above laid down, 
which recommends an attention to the circum- 
stances influencing the sensibility of the person on 
whom impression is to be made. It also has the 
advantage of being characteristic as well as exem- 
plary. The animal, when thus transferred, be- 
comes a voucher for the activity and prowess of 
its owner, as well as a trophy of his victory. 

An arrangement like this, simple as it is, or 
rather because it is so simple, was an extraordinary 
stretch in British policy; in which, though there 
is generally a great mixture of good sense, there 
reigns throughout a kind of littleness and mauvaise 
honte, which avoids, with timid caution, everything 
that is bold, striking, and eccentric, scarce ever 
hazarding any of those strong and masterly touches, 
which strike the imagination, and fill the mind with 
the idea of the sublime. 

Examples of rewards of this nature abound in 



« 



Vidisti quo Turnus equo^ quibus Ibat in armis 
Aureus 5 ipsum ilium clypeum, cristasque rubentes 
Excipiam sorti, jam nunc tua premia^ Nise. 

JEn. ix. 269. 

Thou saw'st the courser by proud Turnus prest 

That Nisus^ and his arms and nodding crest 

And shield^ from chance exempt^ shall be thy share. 

Dryden's Translation. 



^. I. Cu. XI.— CHOICE AS TO REWARDS. 87 

the Roman system of remuneration. For every 
species of merit appropriate symbolic crowns werp 
provided. This branch of their administration 
preserved the ancient simplicity of Rome in its 
cradle; and the wreath of parsley long eclipsed the 
splendour of the crowns of gold. I was about 
to speak of their triumphs, but here I am com- 
pelled to stop : humanity shudders at that pride 
of conquest, which treads under its feet the van- 
quished nations. The system of legislation ought 
no doubt to be adapted to the encouragement of 
military ardour, but it ought not to fan it into 
such a flame as to make it th^ predominant pas- 
sion of the people, and to prostrate everything 
before it. * 

Honorary rewards are eminently exemplary: 
they are standing monuments of the service for 
which they have been bestowed : they also pos- 
sess the desirable property of operating as a per- 
petual encouragement to fresh exertions. Tg dis- 
grace an honorary reward is to be a traitor to one's 
self; he that has once been pronounced brave 
should perpetually merit that commendation. 

To create a reward of this nature is not very 
difficult. The symbolical language of esteem is, 
like written language, matter of convention. 
Every mode of dress, every ceremony, so soon as 
it is made a mark of pre-eminence, becomes ho- 
nourable. A branch of laurel, a ribband, a garter, 
everything possesses the value which is assigned 
to it. It is however desirable, that these ensigns 
should possess some emblematic character expres- 
sive of the nature of the service for which they 
are bestowed. With reference to this principle, the 
blazonry of heraldry appears rude and unmeaning. 
The decorations of the various orders of knight- 
hood, though not deficient in splendour, are highly 



88 B. I. cb. XI.— choice as to rewards. 

deficient in respect of character: they strike the 
eye, but they convey no instruction to the mind. 
A ribband appears more like the finery of a woman 
than the distinctive decoration of a hero. 

Honorary titles have frequently derived a jjart 
of their glory from being characteristic. The 
place which has been the theatre of his exploits 
has often furnished a title for a victorious general, 
well calculated to perpetuate the memory of his 
services and, his glory. At a very early period of 
their history, the Romans employed this expe- 
dient in addition to the other rewards which they 
conferred upon the general who completed a con- 
quest. Hence the surnames of Africanus^ Nu^ 
7nidicu8j Asiaticus^ Germanicus, and so many others. 
This custom has frequently been imitated. Cathe- 
rine n. revived it in favour of the Romanoffs and 
Orloffs. Mahon, twice in the eighteenth century, 
furnished titles to its conquerors. The mansion 
of Bienheim unites to the eclat of the name a 
more substantial proof of national gratitude.^ 

The Romans occasionally applied the same 
mode of reward to services of a different descrip- 
tion. The Appian way perpetually recalled, to 
the memory of those who journied on- it, the libe- 
rality of Appius.f 

* When after a great naval victory^ as an acknowledgment 
of his services, the freedom of the City of London was pre- 
sented to Admiral Keppel, in a box of heart of oak of curious 
workmanship, and enriched with gold, the present was characterise 
tic 2aid popular 'j allusion being evidently made to the song, which, 
whoever may have been the TyrtcBus, has doubtless had, at 
times, no inconsiderable share in rousing British courage. 

t One of the noblest charitable institutions in London, Guy^s 
Hospital, bears the name of its founder. It is true, it is not 
done with the intention of conferring a reward } but thei'e are 
few who, of late years, have travelled in Great Britain, who 
have not spoken in praise of Mac AdanCs system of constructing 
roads. 



B. I. Ch. XL— CHOICE AS TO REWARDS. 89 

The career of legislation may also furnish some 
instances of honours which possess this character 
of analogy. In the Digest of the Sardinian Laws, 
very praiseworthy care was taken to inform the 
people to which of their sovereigns they were in- 
debted for each particular law. It is an example 
worthy of imitation. It may have been intended 
as a mark of respect, as well for convenience of 
reference, that it has been customary to designate, 
by the title of The Grenville Act^ the admirable 
law which this representative of the people pro- 
cured to be enacted for the impartial decision of 
questions relative to contested elections. 

Had the statue of this legislator been placed in 
the House of Commons, from which he banished 
a scandalous disorder, it would both have been a 
monument of gratitude, and a noble lesson. It 
might have for its companion a statue of his noble 
rival, the Author of Economical Reform ; it is thus 
that the impartial judgment of posterity, forgetting 
the diflFerences which separated them, delights to 
recollect the excellences which assimilated them. 
to each other. It is thus that it has placed, side 
by side each other, Eschines and Demosthenes. 
The more men become enlightened, the more 
clearly will they perceive the necessity, at least, 
of dividing honour between those who cause 
nations to flourish by means of good laws, and 
those who defend them by their valour. 

Among the most obvious and efficacious means 
of conferring honorary rewards, are pictures, busts, 
statues, and other imitative representations of the 
person meant to be rewarded. These spread his 
fame to posterity, and, in conjunction with the 
history of the service, hand down the idea of the 
person by whom it was rendered. They are 
naturally accompanied with inscriptions expla- 



90 B. I. Cm. XL— choice AS TO REWARDS. 

natory of the cause for which the honour was 
decreed. When the art of writing has become 
common, these inscriptions will frequently give 
disgust, by the length or extravagance of the elo« 
gium : and it will then become an object of good 
taste to say as much in as few words as possible. 
Perhaps the happiest specimens of the kind that 
were, or ever will be produced, are the two inscrip- 
tions placed under the statues of Louis XIV. and 
Voltaire : the one erected by the town of Mont- 
pellier, the latter by a society of men of letters, 
of whom Frederic III. king of Prussia was one. . 
A Louis XIV. apres sa mort. A Voltaire pendant 
9a vie: to the king, though no k)nger the object of 
hope and fear: to the poet and philosopher, though 
still the butt of envy. The business on occasions 
like these is not to inform but to remind : history 
and the art of printing does the rest. 

The greater number of the rewards of which 
we have spoken above, are occasional^ that is, ap- 
plied to a particular action. There are others 
which are more permanent in their character, such 
as the Hospitals of Chelsea and Greenwich, in 
England, and L^hSiel des Invalides at Paris. 

Doubts have often been entertained of the utility 
of these establishments. Rewards, it has been 
said, might be extended to a much greater number 
of individuals, if the annual amount of the expenses 
of these places were distributed in the shape of 
pensions, and that the individuals would thus be 
rendered much happier; since men who have 
passed their days of activity, united in a place 
where they are no longer subject to the cares and 
labours of life, are exposed to the most ceaseless 
listlessness. I shall not dispute the truth of these 
observations, but on the other hand shall examine 
the effect of these establishments upon the minds 



B. I. Ch. XL— choice as TO REWARDS. 91 

of soldiers and sailors. Their imaginations are 
flattered by the magnificence of these retreats ; it 
is a brilliant prospect opened to them all ; an asy- 
lum is provided for those who, having quitted their 
country and their families in their youth, have fre- 
quently in their days of decrepitude and age no 
other home in the world. Those who are muti- 
lated or disfigured with wounds, are consoled by 
the renown which awaits them in the hospital, 
where every thing reminds them of their exploits. 
It may also be for the benefit of the service more 
prudent thus to unite than to disperse them. It is 
a luxury, but it is rational, exemplary, and pos- 
sesses a character of justice and magnificence. 

These establishments being necessarily limited 

in respect to the number which can be admitted 

into them, may be considered upon the footing of 

extraordinary rewards, applicable to distinguished 

services. They would thus constitute a species of 

nobility for the soldiers and sailors. They would 

acquire an additional degree of splendour were 

their walls adorned by the trophies taken in war, 

which would there appear much more appropriately 

placedthan when deposited in the temples of peace. 

The decorations of the chapel of L^ hotel des Im)a^ 

tides are admirable. The flags suspended in the 

cathedral of St. Paul only awaken thoughts at 

variance with those of religious worship ; removed 

to Chelsea or Greenwich, they would be connected 

with natural associations, and would furnish a text 

to the commentaries of those who acquired them 

by their valour. 

It is not often that every desirable quality is seen 
to be united in one and the same reward; this 
union however frequently takes place in an almost 
imperceptible manner. 



92 B.I, Cu. XL— CHOICE AS TO REWARDS. 

An instance of a reward particularly well adapted 
to the nature of the service, is that of the monopoly 
which it is almost universally the custom to create 
in favour of inventors. From the very nature of 
the thing, it adapts itself with the utmost nicety to 
those rules of proportion to which it is most diffi- 
cult for reward artificially instituted by the legis- 
lator to conform. It adapts itself with the utmost 
nicety to the value of the service. If confined, as 
it ought to be, to the precise point in which the 
originality of the invention consists, it is conferred 
with the least possible waste of expense. It causes 
a service to be rendered, which without it a man 
would not have a motive for rendering ; and that 
only by forbidding others from doing that which 
were it not for that service it would not have been 
possible for them to have dpne. Even with regard 
to such inventions, for such there will be, where 
others, besides him who possesses himself of the 
reward, have scent of the invention, it is still of 
use, by stimulating all parties, and setting them to 
strive which shall first bring his discovery to bear. 
With all this it unites every property which can be 
wished for in a reward. It is variable, equable, 
commensurable, characteristic, exemplary, frugal, 
promotive of perseverance, subse^rvient to com- 
pensation, popular, and revocable. 



^• 



[ 93 ] 



CHAPTER XII. 

PROCEDURE AS TO REWARDS. 

The province of reward is the last aslyum of ar- 
bitrary power. In the early stages of society, pu- 
nishments, pardons, and rewards were equally 
lavished without measure and without necessity. 
The infliction of punishment has already in mea- 
sure been subject to regulation ; at some future time 
rules will be laid down for the granting of pairdons, 
and last of all for the bestowment of rewards. . If 
punishment ought not to be inflicted without for- 
mal proof of the commission of crime, neither 
ought reward to be conferred without equally for- 
mal proof of desert. 

It may be allowed that in point of importance, 
the difference between the two cases is great: 
that punishment inflicted without trial excites 
universal alarm, whilst reward conferred without 
desert excites no such feelings ; but these conside- 
rations only prove that the advantage of formal 
procedure in the distribution of reward is limited 
to the prevention of prodigality, and of the other 
abuses by which the value of reward is diminished. 

At Rome, if certain travellers may be believed, 
it is the custom when a saint is about to be ca- 
nonized, to allow an advocate, who in familiar 
language is called the advocate of the devily to plead 
against his admission. If this advocate had always 
b(een faithful to his client, the calendar might not 
have been so full as at present.* Be this as it may, 



* <s 



Pope Urban VIII. having suffered some ill treatment 






94 B. I. ch. XII.— procedure as to rewards. 

the idea itself is excellent, and might advantageously 
be borrowed by politics from religion. Ultalico 
valor non e ancor morto : there are yet some lessons 
to be learned in the capital of the world. 

It is reported of Peter the Great, that when he 
condescended to pass through every gradation of 
military, rank from the lowest to the highest in his 
empire, he took no step without producing regu- 
lar, certificates of his qualifications. We may be 
. allowed to suppose, that even with inferior recom- 
mendations to those produced by this great prince 
he would have succeeded. There was no advocate 
for the devil to contest the point, and even had 
there been one, his fidelity would have been doubt- 
ful : but had the qualifications of the Czar been as 
imperfect as, according to the history, they were 
complete, his submitting to produce them would 
have ofiTered a noble lesson. ^ 

In England, when a dormant peerage is claimed 
by ahy individual, the Attorney-general is consti- 
tuted the advocate for the devil, and charged to 
examine into and produce every thing which can 
invalidate his title. Wherefore is he not thus em- 
ployed when it is proposed to create new peers ? 
Why should he not be allowed to urge every thing 
which can be said against the measure ? Is it feared 
that he would be too often successful ?* 

from a certain noble Roman family^ said tp his friends^ Questa 
genteemolto ingrata, lo ho heatificatouno de laroparenti, che nan 
lo meritava." — JortWs Miscellanies, 

* If the peers are interested in not suffering the value of 
their office to be lessened by sharing it with unintitled persons, 
the public have a more important interest in preventing pro- 
fusion, with respect to this modification of the matter of re- 
ward — in preventing the bestowment of - a portion of the 
sovereign power upon persons who have not purchased such a 
trust by any service. But if merit is not to be regarded, and 
there are political reasons for preserving this prerogative un- 



B.I.CH. XII.— PROCEDURE AS TO REWARDS. 95 

In the distribution of rewards, were it always 
necessary publicly to assign the reason for their 
bestowment, a restraint would be imposed upon 
princes and their ministers, to which they are 
unwilling to submit. There formerly existed in 
Sweden a custom or positive law, obliging the king 
to insert in the patent conferring a pension or title, 
the reason for the grant. In 1774 this custom 
was abolished by an express law inserted in the 
Gazette of that court, declaring that the individuals 
honoured by tfie bounty of the king, should be con,, 
sidered as ipdebted to his favour alone. Did this 
monarch think that he stood in need of services 
which he would not dare publicly to acknowi- 
ledge?* ,.,^ 

In Englaiidj : the remuneratory branch of arbi- 



controuled, the subject assuimes another aspect^ and its exa- 
mination here would be out of place. 

* Extract from the Courier of the Lower Rhine> 5th March 
1774.—'' Stockholm^ 11th February. — It was formerly the 
custom when the king elevated any one to the rank of nobility, 
or conferred on him the title of baron, to insert in the diploma 
the circumstances by which he had merited this distinction. 
But upon a late occasion^ when his majesty ennobled M. de 
Geer, chamberlain of the court, he requested that the kind- 
ness and good pleasure of the king migiit be inserted in his di- 
ploma as the only reason for his elevation.' His majesty not 
only complied, but directed that the Chancery should thence- 
forward follow this rule, as was anciently the practice under 
the sovereigns of the family of Vasa, till the reign of Christina.'* 

I have not seen any of these ancient diplomas of Swedish 
nobility, and I know not whether the facts they exhibited as 
the reasons operating upon the Sovereign were specific and 
detailed 5 but whatever was the nature of this certificate, it 
served as a token of respect to public opinion, aad a iheans of 
preserving undiminished the value of title.s of nobility. This 
usurpation was scarcely noticed amidst the great revolution 
which the king had just accomplished. In the career of arbi- 
trary power, there are oj^fen':ConqufeiBt8 and clandestine acquisi- 
tions. ■ ^.5■■•.••^y 



96 ' B.I. ch. XII.— procedure as to rewards. 

trary power has begun to be pruned. Except in 
particular cases, the king is not allowed to grant a 
pension exceeding 300/. per annum; without the 
consent of parliament. Since the passing of the 
act containing this restriction, the candidates for 
pensions have been but few. 

When M. Necker undertook the administration 
of the finances in France, the total of the acknow- 
ledged pensions, without reckoning the secret gra- 
tuities, which were very considerable, amounted 
to 27 millions of livres. In England, where the 
national wealth was not less than in France, the 
pensions did not amount to the tenth part of this 
sum. It is thus that the difference between a li- 
mited and an absolute monarchy may be exhibited, 
even in figures. 

In Ireland, the king upon his sole authority, in 
1783, created an order of knighthood ; thus pro- 
fiting by what remained of the fragments of arbitrary 
power. No blame was imputed to him for esta- 
blishing this tax upon honour: had he levied a tax 
upon property the nation might not have been so 
tractable. Those who hoped to share in the new 
treasure were careful not to raise an outcry against its 
establishment; those at whose expense this treasure 
was established, did not understand this piece of 
finesse ; they opened their eyes widely, but com- 
prehended nothing. The measure could not have 
been better justified by circumstances. Every day 
the crown found itself stripped of some prerogative, 
justly or unjustly the subject of envy. It was 
therefore high time to avail itselfof the small num- 
ber of those, in the exercise of which it was still 
tolerated. Become independent of Great Britain, 
the honour of the Irish nation seemed to require 
a decoration of this kind. For what is a kingdom 
without an order of knighthood ? 



b. I. C«. X1I.--PR0CEDURE AS TO REWARDS. 9? 

To enter into the consideration of the details re- 
quisite for the establishment of a system of remu* 
neratory procedure, comes not within the present 
part of our design : a very slight sketch of the lead-^ 
ing principles on which it might be grounded, is 
the utmost that can here be given. The general 
idea would of course be taken from the system es- 
tablished in penal and civil cases. Between these 
systems, the most striking difference would, how- 
ever, arise from the interest and wishes of the agent 
whose act might be the subject of investigation, 
with respect to the publicity of the act. In the 
one case the consequences of such his act, in case 
it were proved, being pernicious to him, all his 
endeavour would be to keep it concealed : in the 
other, these consequences being beneficial, his en- 
deavour would be to place it in the most conspi-> 
cuous light imaginable. In the first case, his en- 
deavours would be to delay the process and, if pos- 
sible, make it void: in the latter, to expedite itaqd 
keep it valid. 

The most striking point of co-incidence is the, 
occasion there is in both cases for two parties. In 
the civil branch, there can hardly be a deficiency 
in this respect ; there being commonly two indivi- 
duals whose interests are opposite, and known and 
felt to be so. But in the penal branch, in one very 
large division of it, there is naturally no such 
opposition ; I mean in that which concerns of- 
fences against the public only : here, therefore, the 
law has been obliged to create such an opposition, 
and has accordingly created it by the establishment 
of a public prosecutor. In the remuneratory branch 
of procedure, there is a similar absence of natural 
opposition, and accordingly the grand desideratum 
is the appointment of an officer whose business it 
should be to contest on the part of the pviblic, the 
title to whatever reward is proposed to be granted in 

7 



98 B. I. Ch. XII.— PROCEDURE AS TO REWARDS. 

this way. He miglit be entitled, for shortness, by 
some such name as that of Contestor-generaL 
Without a Prosecutor-general, in the large and 
important division of cases above mentioned, there 
would not, unless by accident — I mean, when an 
individual is engaged in the task of prosecution 
by public spirit, or what is much more natural, 
by private pique — be any suit instituted, any 
punishment inflicted. For wint of a Contestor- 
general there is not, unless by a similar accident,* 
any check given to the injustice of unmerited 
remuneration. 

Upon the whole then, the penal and civil 
branches of procedure, but particularly the penal, 
may in all cas^s serve either as the models, or if 
the term may be admitted, as the aniumodels of 
the remuneratory branch of procedure. 

* I say by accident : for as in the case of offences against the 
public merely> accident will sometimes raise up a private pro^ 
secutor in the person of a chance individual, so in matters of 
remunerative procedure, will accident sometimes raise up a 
• contestor in the person of some member of the body by whose 
appointment the reward is bestowed. This supposes that the 
reward is to be in the appointment of a body ; so that if it be 
at the appointment of a single person, « the chance of contesta- 
tion is adtogether wanting. This chance will of course be the 
greater, the more numerous that body: but if the body be very 
small, especially if it be composed without any mixture of dif- 
ferent interests and partialities, and its deliberations held in 
secret, it will amount to nothing. If the business be confined 
to three, or four, or half a dozen who are intimately connected, 
the bargain is soon made : '' you serve my friend, I serve 
yours.*' Even be the assembly ever so numerous, the chance 
of contestation is but a precarious one. The task is at any 
rate an invidious task : he must be a man of more than com- 
mon public spirit, added to more than common courage, who 
unprompted by party jealousy and uncompelled by office, will 
undertake it : nor have instances been wanting when the most 
numerous and discordant assemblies have concurred unani* 
mously in the vote of rewards, Avhich the majority have been 
known individually to disapprove. 



[ 99 ] 



CHAPTER XIII. 

REWARDS TO INFORMERS. 

r 

The execution of a law cannot be enforced, 
unless the violation of it be denounced ; the 
assistance of the informer is, therefore, altogethei? 
as necessary and as meritorious as that of the 
judge. 

We have already had occasion to remark, that 
with respect to public offences, where no one 
individual more than another is interested in their 
prosecution, it has been found necessary to create 
a sort of magistrate, an accuser-general, to carry 
on such prosecutions in virtue of his office ; but 
it is indispensably necessary that offences should 
be denounced to him before he can begin to act* 

In a well-ordered community, it would be the 
duty of* every individual possessing evidence of 
the commission of a crime, to denounce the cri-» 
minal to the tribunals, and such individual would 
be disposed so to do. In most countries, however, 
men in general are desirous of withdrawing from 
the performance of this duty. Some refuse to 
perform !t frona mistaken notions of pity towards 
the delinquent ; others because they disapprove of 
some part of the law ; others from the fear of 
making enemies ; many from indolence ; almost al! 
from a disinclination to submit to that loss which 
would arise from the interruption of their ordinary 
occupations. 

In these countries, therefore, it has been found 
necessary to offer pecuniary rewards to informers. 

So far as my knowledge' extends, governments 

7. 



100 B. I. ch. XIII.— rewards to informers. 

have never been advised to discontinue this 
tice. It is supported by authority, but it is 
condemned by public opinion : mercenary infor- 
mations are considered disgraceful; salaried in- 
formers, odious. From hence it results, that the 
reward offered by the law does not possess all its 
nominal value ; the disgrace attached to the ser- 
vice is a drawback upon its amount. The indi- 
vidual is rewarded by the state, and punished by 
the moral sanction. 

Let us examine the usual objections made 
against mercenary informations. 

1. It is odious^ it is said, to profit bi/ the evil we 
have caused to others. 

This objection is founded upon a feeling of im- 
proper commiseration for the offender; since pity 
towards the guilty is cruelty towards the innocent. 
The reward paid to the informer has for its object, 
the service he has performed ; in this respect he is 
upon a level with the judge who is paid for passing 
sentence. The informer is a servant of the govern- 
ment, employed in opposing the internal enemies 
of the state, as the soldier is a servant employed in 
opposing its external foes. ^ 

S. // introduces into society a system of espionage. 

To the word espionage a stigma is attached : let 
us substitute the word inspection, which is uncon- 
nected with the same prejudices. If this inspec- 
tion consist in the maintenance of an oppressive 
system of police, which subjects innocent actions 
to punishment, which condemns secretly and arbi- 
trarily, it is natural that such a system and its 
agents should become odious. But if this inspec- 
tion consist in the maintenance of a system of 
police, for the preservation of the public tranquil- 
lity, and the execution of good laws, all its inspec- 
tors, and all its guardians, act a useful and salu- 



B.I. Ch. XIII.— rewards to INFORMERS. 101 

tary part; it is the vicious only who will have 
reason to complain ; it will be formidable to them 
alone. 

3. Pecuniary rewards may induce false witnesses 
to conspire against the innocent. 

If we suppose a public and well-organised sys- 
.tem of procedure, in which the innocent are not 
deprived of any means of defence, the danger 
resulting from conspiracy will appear but small. 
Besides the prodigious difficulty of inventing a 
coherent tale capable of enduring a rigorous exa- 
mination, there is no comparison between the 
reward offered by the law, and the. risk to 
which false witnesses are exposed. Mercenary 
witnesses also are exactly those who excite the 
greatest distrust in the mind of a judge, and if 
they are the only witnesses, a suspicion of con- 
spiracy instantly presents itself, and becomes a 
protection to the accused. 

These objections are urged in justification of the 
prejudice which exists; but the prejudice itself 
has been produced by other causes, and those 
causes are specious. The first, with respect to 
the educated classes of society, is a prejudice 
drawn from history, especially from that of the 
Roman emperors. The word informer at once 
recals to the mind those detestable miscreants, the 
horror of all ages, whom even the pencil of Tacitus 
has failed to cover with all the ignominy they 
deserve : but these informers were not the execu- 
tors of the law: they were the executors of the 
personal and lawless vengeance of the sovereign. 

The second and most general cause of this pre- 
judice is founded upon the employment given to 
informers by religions intolerance. In the ages of 
ignorance and bigotry, barbarous laws having been 
enacted against those who did not profess the do- 



102 B.I. CH.XllI.— REWARDS TO INFORMERS. 

minant religion, informers were then considered as 
zealous and orthodox believers ; but in proportion 
to the increase of knowledge, the manners of men 
have been softened, and these laws having become 
odious, the informers, without whose services they 
would have fallen into disuse, partook of the hatred 
which the laws themselves inspired. It was an 
injustice in respect to them, but a salutary effect 
resulted from it, to the classes exposed to op- 
pression. 

These cases of tyranny excepted, the prejudice 
which condemns mercenary informers is an evil. 
It is a consequence of the inattention of the public 
to their true interests, and of the general ignorance 
in matters of legislation. Instead of acting in con- 
sonance with the dictates of the principle of utility, 
people in general have blindly abandoned them- 
selves to the guidance of sympathy and antipathy : 
of sympathy in favour of those who injure ; of an- 
tipathy to those who render them essential service. 
If an informer deserves to be hated, a judge de- 
serves to be abhorred. 

This prejudice also partly springs from a confu- 
sion of ideas : no distinction is made between the 
judicial and the private informer, between the man 
who denounces a crime in a court of justice,, and he 
who secretly insinuates accusations against his 
enemies ; between the man who affords to the ac- 
cused an opportunity of defending himself, and he 
who imposes the condition of silence with respect 
to his perfidious reports. Clandestine accusations 
are justly considered as the bane of society ; they 
destroy confidence, and produce irremediable evils; 
but they have nothing in common with judicial 
accusations. • 

It is extremely difficult to eradicate prejudices 
so deeply rooted and natural. From necessity, the 



B.I. Cii.XlIJ.— REWARDS TO INFORMERS. 103 

practice of paying public informers continues to be 
in use ; but tiie character of an informer is still re- 
garded as disgraceful, and by some strange fatality 
the judges make no efforts to enlighten the public 
mind on this subject, and to protect this useful and 
even necessary class of men fropoi the rigour of 
public opinion ; they ought not to suffer the elo- 
quence of the bar to insult before their faces these 
necessary assistants in the administration of justice. 
The conduct of the English law towards informers 
furnishes a curious but deplorable instance of hu- 
man frailty. It employs them, oftentimes deceives 
them, and always holds them up to contempt, s 
It is time for lawgivers at least, to wean them- 
selves from these school-boy prejudices, which 
can consist only with a gross inattention to the in- 
terests of the public, joined to a gross ignorance of 
the principles of human nature. They should 
settle with themselves once for all what it is they 
would have : they should strike, somehow or other, 
a balance between the benefit expected from the 
effects of a law,, and the inconveniences, or sup- 
posed inconveniences, inseparable from its execu- 
tion. If the inconveniences preponderate, let there 
be an end of the law ; if the benefits, let there be 
an end of all obstacles which an aversion to the 
necessary instruments on which its efficacy de- 
pends would oppose to its execution. 



[ 104 J 



CHAP. XIV. 

REWARDS TO ACCOMPLICES. 

Among informers, criminals who denounce their 
accomplices have been distinguished from others, 
and the offer of pardon or rewards to induce them 
thus to act, has been condemned as altogether im- 
proper. It must be acknowledged that, so long as 
there is any other means of obtaining the con- 
viction of a criminal, without thus rewarding an 
accomplice, this method is bad; the impunity 
necessarily accompanying it is an evil. But if 
there be no other means, this method is good ; since 
the impunity of a single criminal is a less evil than 
the impunity of many. 

In relation, however, to weighty and serious 
crimes, no such rewards can with propriety be ap- 
pointed by a general law. A general law offering 
pardon and reward to the criminal who informed 
against his accomplices, would be an invitation to 
the commission of all sorts of crimes. It would be 
as though the legislator had said, ^' Among a mul- 
titude of criminals, the most wicked shall not only 
be unpunished but rewarded.^^ A man shall lay 
plans for the commission of a crime, shall engage 
accomplices with the intention of betraying them ; 
to the natural profits of the crime, such a law 
would add the reward bestowed upon him as an 
informer. It is what has often happened under 
English law. It is one of the fruits of the maxim 
which prohibits the examination of suspected per- 
sons, respecting facts which may tend to criminate 
themselves. It is, however, criminals who can 



B. I. Ch. XlV.--RE\yARDS TO ACCOMPLICES. 105 

always furnish, and who often can alone furnish, the 
light necessary for the guidance of Justice. But 
the examination of suspected persons being forbid- 
den as a means of obtaining intelligence, there re- 
mains only the method of reward. 

But when the reward, instead of being bestowed 
in virtue of a general law, is left to the discretion 
of the judge, and offered only when necessary, this 
inconvenience does not exist. Advantageous crimes 
can no longer be committed with security. Re- 
course being had to this costly method only when 
all other methods fail, there will always be a longer 
or shorter interval, during which every criminal 
will feel himself exposed to the. punishment de- 
nounced against his crimes. The employment of 
reward in this manner having become usual, will 
exercise upon the security of criminals the effect 
of a general law : it might even be prescribed by 
such a law. This method would then possess all 
the advantages of an unconditional law without its 
inconveniences. 

Beccaria has condemned, without exception, 
every reward offered to accomplices. As the foun- 
dation of his opinion, he produces only a confused 
sentiment of disapprobation attached to the words 
^^ treason ^nd faithlessness.^' 

Voluntary conventions among men are generally 
useful to society. It would be in most cases pro- 
ductive of evil were they not considered bind- 
ing. Infamy has therefore become constantly at* 
tached to the terms treason and faithlessness. The 
acts, however, to which these terms are applied are 
only pernicious in as far as the contracts of which 
they are violations are at least innocent. To render 
the security of society (which crimes, were they to 
remain unpunished, would destroy) subordinate to 
the accomplishment of all manner of engagements. 



106 B. I. Ch. XIV.— rewards to accomplices. 

would be to render the end subordinate to the 
means. What would become of society, were, it 
once established as a principle, that the commis- 
sion of a crime became a duty if once it had been 
promised ? That promises ought to be performed, 
is a maxim which without a limitation, excepting 
those the perfornattnce of which would be pernici- 
ous to society, ought to have place neither inlaws 
nor in morals : it is doubtful which would be most 
injurious ; the non-performance of every promise, 
or the performance of all. Far from beinga greater 
evil than that to which it is opposed, it would be 
difficult to shew that the non-performance of cri- 
minal engagements is productive of any evil. From 
the performance of such an engagement, an un- 
favourable judgment only can be formed of the 
character of the party : how can a similar judgment 
be formed from its violation? — Because he has 
repented of having committed, or been willing to 
commit, an action injurious to society, and which he 
knew to be so, does it follow that he will fail to 
perform actions which he knows to be innocent and 
useful ? 

From the violation of engagements among crimi- 
nals, what evil can be apprehended ?— rthat unani- 
mity shall be wanting among them ? — that their 
enterprizes shall be unsuccessful ? — that their asso- 
ciations shall be dissolved ? It is proverbially said 
** thdre is honour among theives.^^ The honour 
which cements their conspiracies is the pest of 
society. Why should we not seek to inspire them 
with the highest degree of distrust towards each 
other ? Why should we not arm them against each 
other, and make them fear lest they should find an 
informer in every accomplice ? Wherefore should 
we not Iseek to fill them with a desire to inforni 
against and mutually to destroy each other ? So that 



B. I.XIH. XIV.— REWARDS TO ACCOMPLICES. 107 

eaqh one uneasy and trembling in the midst of his 
fellows, should fear hi» companions as much as his 
judges, nor be able to hope for security but in the 
renunciation of his crimes. This is exactly what 
the consideration of the public welfare would lead 
us to wish ; and if we are to be turned aside from 
the care of this object by regard to the fidelity of 
thieves and murderers to their engagements, for a 
still 43tronger reason, from humanity, ought we to 
abstain from punishing their crimes. > 

Beccaria, upon just ground, condemns the sove- 
reigns and judges, who after having enticed an 
offender to become an informer, afterwards violate 
their promise and render it illusory. In this case 
we need not fear to give vent to the feelings of hor- 
ror and indignation which so mischievous a pro« 
ceeding inspires. It is mischievous in the highest 
possible degree. It destroys all future confidence 
in similar offers, and renders powerless this most 
necessary instrument. It cements, instead of weak- 
eniiig, the union of criminals among themselves ; 
and causes government itself to appear as the guar- 
dian of their society, by adding mockery to the 
rigour of the law^ by punishing the individual who 
has confided in its promises. 

But, says Beccaria, ^^ Society authorizes treason^ 
detested even hy criminals among themselves.^^ We 
have already seen what is to be understood by this 
treason. It is natural to criminals to detest it — it 
is their ruin : it ought to be approved by honest 
men — it is their safeguard. It will introduce crimes 
of cowardice and baseness. No, it will introduce 
acts of prudence, of penitence, and of public util- 
ity ; it will operate as an antidote to all crimes. 
These pretended crimes of cowardice are more in^^ 
Jurious to a nation than the crimes of courage. The 



108 B. I. cb. xiv.^rewards to accompuces. 

truth is exactly the reverse : which produce most 
alarm in society, privately stealing and swindling 
on the one side, or highway robbery and murder 
on the other ? The tribunal which employs this ex- 
pedient^ discovers its uncertainty. It discovers that 
it can know nothing without having learnt it. By 
what means can a judge attain to certainty without 
witnesses ? In what country is it customary for 
criminals to make the judges the confidants of their 
misdeeds and their plans? The law exhibits its 
feebleness in imploring the assistance even of him who 
has broken it. The law seeks the offender who flies 
from it: if the means employed for his discovery 
are effectual, it only exhibits its wisdom. 

But if rewards are to be bestowed upon criminals 
who denounce their accomplices, Beccaria desires 
that it may be in virtue of" a general law, which 
should promise impunity to every accomplice who 
discovers a crime, rather than by a particular de- 
claration in each particular case/^ The reason he 
assigns is, that "such a law would prevent the 
combination of malefactors, by inspiring each of 
them with the fear of exposing himself alone to 
danger, and that it would not serve to give that 
boldness to the wicked who see that there are some 
cases in which their services are required/^ But 
we have already observed that the particular decla- 
ration equally serves to prevent this combination, 
and that it is the general law which tends to give 
boldness to the wicked, and even creates the' belief 
that justice cannot be executed without them. 

" A law of this nature,^' adds Beccaria^ " ought 
to join to impunity the banishment of the infor- 
mer." A condition of this nature could only serve 
to render the law inefficacious in a variety of cases, 
and also contains a contradiction in terms. A law 



B. I. Ch. XIV.— rewards to ACCOMPLICES. 



109 



joining banishment to ioipunity ! Is not banish* 
ment a punishment }* 

* To the edition of Beccaria published at Paris in 1797> are 
added some notes by Diderot, unfortunately they are short and 
few. I translate those which relate to the present chapters 

'^ The errors of courts of justice and the feebleness of the 
law, even when crimes are known to have been committed, are 
matters of public notoriety. It is in vain to endeavour to con- 
ceal them, there is nothing therefore to counterbalance the 
advantage of disseminating distrust among malefactors, and 
rendering them suspected and formidable to one anbther, and 
the causing them without ceasing to dread in their accomplices 
so many accusers. This can only tend to make the wicked 
cowards, and every thing which renders them less daring is 
useful.*' 

'^ The delicacy of the author exhibits a noble and generous 
heart : but human morality, of which laws form the basis, is 
directed to the maintenance of public order, and cannot adnlit 
among the number of its virtues the fidelity of malefactors 
among themselves, that they may disturb that order, and violate 
the laws with greater security. In open war, deserters are re- 
ceived, with greater reason ought they to be received in a war 
carried on amidst silence and darkness^ and whose operations 
consist of snares and treachery.*' 



[ 110 ] 



CHAPTER XV. 

COMPETITION AS TO REWARDS. 

When a portion of the matter of reward is 
allotted for the purchase of services, ought the 
liberty of competition to be admitted ? In any and 
what cases ? What is the general rule, and what 
are the exceptions ? In the case of what species 
of service ? For what species of reward ? 

If popular opinion is to determine, the question 
concerning the general rule is already answered^ 
In all cases in which no particular reason can be 
given to the contrary, the liberty of competition 
ought to be admitted upon the largest scale. Ye< 
to this decision of the public, the practice of na- 
tions, that is of those who bear the sway in nations, 
is by no means uniformly conformable ; there are 
privileges and there are exclusions : pursuits open 
to one set, closed to another set of men : all go- 
vernments have been more or less infected with 
that intermeddling disposition, which believes it 
can give perfection to particular species of service, 
by appropriating its exercise exclusively to particu- 
lar individuals. 

That there may be cases fit to be excepted out of 
the above general rule, is allowed ; but before we 
come to the consideration of the exceptions, let us 
see how the matter stands upon principle — whether 
the people are most right or their rulers. 

And in the first place, by way of illustration, let 
us stop a moment to examine the connexion there/ 
is upon this occasion between reward and punish- 
ment. Let us suppose, apprehensions are enter- 
tained of the prevalence of murder and incen- 



B. I. Ch. XV.— competition AS TO REWARDS. HI 

diarism. Against a particular person the suspicions 
are stronger than against any one else. There is 
as yet no law against either of those oflfences. The 
sovereign, intending to do his utmost to guard 
the state against those calamities, sends for the sus* 
pected person, and prohibits him from committing 
any such crimes, under such penalties as he thinks 
proper : for the suspected person, observe, and for 
him only ; there being as yet no general law pro- 
hibiting such enormities, and everybody else being 
left at perfect liberty. If it were possible that any 
such incident could have happened within time of 
history, should not we pronounce at once, that either 
the nation could not yet have emerged from a state 
of the profounde^t barbarism, or else that the 
sovereign so acting could not have been in his right 
mind ? Such however is the exact counterpart of 
the policy of him, who wanting a service to be 
performed of such a nature as that, for aught he can 
be certain, there are several competent to perform 
it, some better than others, and each man according 
to the motives that are given him better than himself, 
commits the business to one in exclusion of the rest. 

If penal laws must be applicable to all, that there 
may be a chance of preventing all ofiFences, the 
offer of reward ought to be general, that there may 
be a chance of obtaining all services, and of obtain- 
ing the best. 

If we enquire in detail for the reasons why com- 
petition for reward, and for everything else which 
can be bestowed in the way of producing servicej 
should be as open and as free as possible, the 
question may be considered in two points of view : 
first, ^s it concerns the interests of those for whose 
sake the service wanted is to be performed ; 
secondly, as it concerns the interests of those by 
whom the service might come to be performed. 



112 B. I. Cn. XV.— COMPETITION AS TO HEWARDlS. 

With regard to the former set of interests; it 
has already been observed,* as a reason for the em- 
ployment of reward, as a fitter instrument than pu- 
nishment, for attaining a given degree of excellence, 
the idea of which has already been conceived by 
the person who wishes it to be attained, — that the 
chance is greater when reward is employed as the 
incitement, than when use is made of punishment ; 
because, punishment can only operate upon a few 
selected individuals, and should they be unequal 
to the task, would be altogether employed in vain. 
Whatever number you select, you forego all the 
chance which you might have of the service being 
performed by any one else. The case is equally 
the same when rewards are oflTerred to a selected 
few. Allowing the liberty of competition, you 
jmay propose rewards to any number without ex- 
Ipense : you pay it but to one : you do not pay it 
till the service is performed : and the chance of its 
being performed is in proportion to the number of 
persons to whom it is proposed. 

Another advantage which reward has over pu- 
nishment, as we have seen, is, that by means of the 
former the value of the service may be brought to 
an indefinitely high degree of perfection. But this 
can only be effected by means of a free competition. 
In this way, and this only, can individuals be led to 
exert their faculties. W ere the reward proposed to 
one only, having rendered the degree of service suf- 
ficient to entitle him to the reward, he would stop 
there : to make the exertions necessary to carry it to 
any higher degree of perfection would be to trouble 
himself to no purpose. But let a reward be offered 
to that one of two competitors, for example, who 
best performs the service: unless either of them 

* Book 1, ch. vii. p. 51. 



B. I. Ch. XYw-^OMPETITION AS TO REWARDS. 1 13 

knows exactly the degree of skill possessed by the 
other, and knows it to be clearly inferior to his own ; 
each will exert himself to his utmost, since the 
more perfect he makes his work, the better chance 
has he of gaining the reward. The matter is so 
ordered, that for every part of the greatest degree of 
service he can possibly find means to render, there 
will be a motive to induce him to render it. The 
same reasoning may be applied to any other num- 
ber of competitors; and the chance of perfection 
veil] be increased, if the faculties of the competitors 
are equal in proportion to their number. 

Should he who has the disposal of the reward 
assert, '* I am acquainted with an individual more 
competent than any other, to perform the service in 
question, and with whom no one can be placed in 
competition,^^ his assertion is exposed to this 
dilemma : upon a fair trial of skill, either this 
person will stand first, or he will not ; if he stand 
first j the competition is not to his prejudice, but 
redounds to his honour; if another excel him, the 
advantage of a free competition is proved. Par- 
tiality is either mischievous or unnecessary. 

We next consider the question as it affects the 
interest of those who might be admitted as com* 
petitors. 

Reward in its own udLtuve is a good ; all com* 
peititors think so, and that a balance of good remains 
even after deducting the evil of that labour, what- 
ever it be, which is expended in the performance 
of the service, br they would not be competitors. 
He who has the disposal of the reward thinks so, 
or he would neither ofifer it, or be so anxious as he 
sometimes istosecureit for those to whom he wishes 
to give a preference. But when there is no special 
reason to* the contrary, why should not all the 
members of a state have a chance of obtaining the 



114 B. I. Ch. XV/-COMPEITriON AS TO REWARDS. 

goods to be distributed in that state ? To exclude 
aoy man from any chance he might have of better- 
ing himself, is at oest a hardship; if no special rea- 
son can be given for it, it is injustice, and one of 
those species of injustice, which, if administered on 
pretence of delinquency, would openly bear the 
name of punishment. 

It may be objected, that if a free competition 
were allowed, that " the number of competitors 
would be very great, while the reward being con- 
fined to one or to a very small number, one only 
will be paid for his labour ; the lot of the rest 
would be lost labour and disappointment ; that the 
public would be losers, by their labours being di- 
verted from services of greater utility, and that the 
service would, without this competition, be per- 
formed in a sufficient degree of perfection, or if 
performed in any higher degree would be of no 
further use/^ 

The following considerations may serve as a 
reply to these objections. Where there is nothing 
more than the mere loss of labour to those who can 
afford to lose it, or of anything else to those who 
can afford to part with it, the possible amount of 
mischief, be it what it may, can afford no sufficient 
reason for narrowing competition. If there be th^ 
pain of disappointment after trial, there has been 
the pleasure of expectation before trial; and the 
latter, there is reason to believe, is upon an average 
much greater than the former. The pleasure is of 
longer continuance ; it fills a larger space in the 
mind ; and the larger, the longer it continues. The 
pain of disappointment comes on in a moment, and 
gives place to the first dawning of a new hope, or 
is driven out by other cares. If it be true, that the 
principal part of happiness consists in hope, and 
that biit few of our hopes are completely realized. 



B. I. Ch. XV.— COMPETITION AS TO REWARDS. 116 

it would be necessary, that men might be saved 
from disappointment, to shut them out from joy. 

It may further be observed, that the liberty of 
competition seldom includes so many, as if con<» 
sidered with regard to the particular nature of the 
service it would seem to include. Where it is not 
restrained by institution, it is often restrained by 
nature, and that sometimes within very narrow 
bounds. Services depending on opportunity, are 
confined to those to whom fortune shall have given ^[^^ 
the opportunity ; services depending on science or y K 
on art, are confined to those whom education and {/* {jj 
practice have familiarised with the science or the< f 
art ; services depending on station, are confined to 
one, or to the few, if there be more than one, who 
s^t the time in question are invested with that sta- 
tion. Thus the objection derived from the too 
great number of competitors is almost always with- 
out foundation. 

It also often happens that, independently of the 
reward given to the successful candidate, the ser- 
vice even of the unsuccessful pays itself. This is 
more particularly apt to be the case with regard to 
services of indefinite excellence which depend on 
skill. Some develop their talents; others obtain 
notoriety; one discourse obtains the reward; 
twenty candidates have improved their minds in 
endeavouring to obtain it. The athletic exercises 
which on such a vast variety of occasions were ce- 
lebrated throughout ancient Greece seem to have 
been open to all comers : '' it was but one at each 
game that could obtain the prize ; but even the un- 
successful combatants found a sort of subordinate 
advantage in the reputation of having contended, 
and the advances made by them in those energies, 
which at that time of day gave distinguished >lustre 
to every one who excelled iu them. 

8. 



116 B. 1. Ch. XV.-COMPETITION AS TO REWARDS, 

It may even happen, that the service of the suc- 
cessful shall be no object, and that the services 
looked to on the part of him who institutes the re- 
ward shall be those which are performed by the 
unsuccessful. The Greciangames just mentioned 
may be taken as an example. The strength of the 
successful combatant was no sensible advantage to 
the country : the object aimed at was the encou- 
ragement of personal prowess and skill. In this 
country, the prizes given at horse races have a si- 
milar sort of object. From the few horses who win, 
the public may reap no particular advantage ; but 
the horses which are beaten or never contend for 
the prize, are improved by the emulation to which 
it has given birth. 

By the English Government, very ample reward^ 
are offered to him who shall discover the most per- 
fect and practicable mode of ascertaining ^ sbip^s 
longitudiB at sea. One effect of this reward is to 
divert from their employments a multitude of artists 
and students in various branches of physical sci- 
ence, of whom a few only can have any recom- 
pence for their expense and labour. To pay all 
that would try might probably be impracticable ; 
but the benefit of the service appears to counter- 
balance this inconvenience ; and in point of fact, 
the persons who can suppose themselves qualified 
to contend in such a race are so few, that this in- 
convenience can scarcely be very considerable. 
Were the same reward to be given for running,* 
boxing, or wrestling, the common businesses of 
life would be deserted, and all the world would 
become runners, boxers, and wrestlers. 

Amongst the Athenians, rewards not vastly^ in- 
ferior, considering the difference in the value of 
money and the common rate of living, were actu- 
ally given to such athletic exercises. But the 



.B.I. Ch, XV.— COMPETITION AS TO REWARDS. 117 

Athenians were as much in the right so to do as we 
should be in the wrong to imitate them. In those 
days when success in war depended almost entirely 
upon bodily address and vigour, encouraging the 
performance of these exercises, was disciplining 
an army; and the national wealth could suffer 
little, since the labours of agriculture were chiefly 
carried on by slaves. 

The advantages resulting from the most un- ^ 
limited freedom of competition therefore are — \ 
1. Chance of success increased according to the 
number of competitors. 2. Chance of the highest 
success increased by invigomting the increased 
efforts of each competitor. 3. Equality established. 
4. Number of works multiplied. 5. Latent talents 
developed 

APPLICATION OF THE ABOVE PRINCIPLE. 

The cases to which this principle may be applied 
are much more extensive than might at first view 
be imagined : it covers a great part of the field of 
legislation ; it may be applied to ecclesiastical, to 
fiscal, to administrative, and to constitutional lawsl 

Thii^ rule is in direct opposition to the funda- 
mental principle of Hindoo legislation.- In that 
country, every man belongs to a caste from which 
he cannot separate himself. ^ To each caste belongs 
the exercise of certain professions :. there is a caste 
of learned men, a caste of warriors, and a caste of 
labourers. Emulation is thus reduced within the 
narrowest bounds, and the energies of the people 
are stifled. 

This principle is opposed to those ecclesiastical 
regulations, by which all who refuse to sign certain 
articles of belief, or refuse to pronounce a certain, 
number of words concerning theological subjects, 



118 B. !• Cu. XV.—COMPETITION AS TO REWARDS. 

are excluded from certain professions. The greater 
the number of individuals thus excluded, the 
greater the loss sustained by the diminution of 
competition in the performance of those services. 

This principle is in direct contradiction to a mul- 
titude of fiscal and administrative laws, establishing 
exclusive privileges in favour of certain branches 
of commerce and trade ; fixing the price of com- 
modities, and the places at which they are to be 
bought and sold ; prohibiting the entry or the exit 
of various productions of agriculture or of manu- 
factures. These are so many expedients limiting 
competition, and are injurious to the national 
wealth. 

The father of political economy has from this 
principle in a manner created a new science: the 
application he has made of it to the laws relating 
to trade has nearly exhausted the subject.* 

By two opposite competitions, prices are fixed. 
Competition amoilg the purchasers secures to the 
producers a sufficient compensation for the outlay 
of their capital and labour. Competition among the 
sellers, serving as a counterpoise to the other, pro- 
duces a cheap market, and reduces the prices of 
commodities to the lowest sum for which it is worth 
while to produce them. The diflFerence between 
a low price and a high price is, a reward offered to 
the purchaser by one seller for the service he will 
render to hinx, by granting what remains to be 
gained, to him instead of to his competitor who 
requires more. 

In all trades, and in all arts, competition secures 
to the public not only the lowest price but the best 
work. Whatever degree of superiority is possessed 
by one commodity over another of the same de- 

• 

* Wealth of Nations. 



u. I. Ch. XV.— competition as to rewards. 1 19 

s^cription meets with its reward either in the quan- 
tity sold, or in the price at which it is sold. 

As to stores of every description of which the 
public stands in need, why is not the competition 
left open to ail who may choose to undertake the 
supply } It is not difficult to find the determining 
reason : it is more convenient to serve a friend, a 
dependant, or a partizan, than a person unknown, 
or perhaps an enemy. But this is not an avowable 
reason : for the public, some other must be sought. 
Open competition would, it is said, produce a 
multitude of rash contractors. The terms in ap- 
pearance most advantageous to government would 
commonly be offered by some rash adventurer, 
who, in the end, would be found unable to fulfil 
his engagements. When the time came for the' 
performance of his part of the contract, the stores 
in question would not be provided, and the service 
would suffer irreparable injury. It is important 
that the men with whom we deal should be well 
known. In some cases, these reason's may not be 
without foundation, but they are most frequently 
illusory.* 

* The foUowing is the general outline of an arrangement 
by which all the above difBcuIties would be effectually removed : 
— Unlimited competition 5 with power to the minister^ or to 
any competent authority^ to reject the offer, which ought 
according to the genersd rule to be accepted : power also to 
the offerer to caU. upon the minister, or competent authority, 
to assign their reasons for such rejection. When all this is 
done publicly, no attempt would be made to reject the offer of 
a man, who, together with his sureties, was known to be per- 
fectly responsible. 

A praise to which one of the most celebrated ministers in 
England is justly entitled, and about which there is no differ- 
ence of opinion, is the having, with more consistency than any 
of his predecessors, fdilowed this principle. Mr. Pitt divested 
himself of this source of influence, so dear to ministers, and 
opened a free competition for all contracts and all loans. It is 



V 



w 
^v 



t 



120 B.I. CH.XV.-.COMPETmON AS TO RBWARDS. 

The very nature of the reward may sometimes 

render it necessary to depart from the system of 

competition. It is not every office that can be 

K^offered to every one disposed to undertake it* 

f Ought the education of a prince to be offered to him 

J who writes the best treatise upon that education } 

No: such an office requires qualities and virtues, 

and particularly a knowledge of the world, which 

might not be possessed by the philosopher who had 

resolved the problem. 

Ought the office of master of the mint to' be 
offered to any one who produces the best diei 
No: this important duty requires a probity, an 
exactness^ a habit of regularity, which has no con- 
nexion with manual skill. This is a reason, and 
the T)tily reason, for not offering such offices to all 
the world ; but it is no reason for not attaching to 
this service another reward to which all the world 
might aspire. 

Some services, which are not directly suscepti- 
ble of open competition, are so indirectly ; that is, 
by making the competition consist in the perform- 
ance of sotne preliminary service, the execution of 
which may serve as a test of a man^s ability to per- 
form the principal service. This is what is done 
in the case of extensive architectural works, when 
artists are invited to give in their plans and their 
models : this is all that the nature of the service 
allows of.* 

unnecessary to point out the advantages resulting from this 
just^nd liberal policy -, they are known to all the world 3 and 
the example set by him has been a law to his suGcbmiA'. 

* Some years ago^ it was thought desirable to have a gene- 
ral Index made to the Journals of the House of Commons^ for 
if it be not yet desirable to have the laws themselves me- 
thodized, it has however been thought desirable to methodise 
the history of the proceedings of thk branch of the legislature. 
It was an undertaking of very considerable difficulty^ both in 



B. I. Ch. XV.-COMP£TITIdN AS TO REWARDS. 121 

When, some years ago, it was designed to erect, 
in the neighbourhood of London, at the public 
expense, a Penitentiary House, the mode of unli- 
mited competition was adopted, in order to obtain 
plans for it. The superintendants received sixty- 
five plans, from among which they had an oppor- 
tunity of making a selection, instead of the one 
which they would have received, had the system 
of favouritism been pursued. If, without reward, 
a plan superior to the best of those thus obtained, 
has since been devised, it may be attributed to the 
share which chance has in every new invention : 
the offer of a reward may accelerate the develop- 
ment of new ideas, without enabling an individual 
to complete the arrangement of his plans at a 
given moment. 

When the British Parliament offered a reward of 
20,000/. for the discovery of a mode of finding the 

consideration of its magnitude, and the variety of matter it 
embraced. How were fit persons to be selected for it } Com- 
petitiop, in the usual mode, could not have been emplo):ed. 
The legislature could not say to men of letters, — Work, and 
the best workman shall be rewarded. Who, uncertsun of being 
paid for it, would have devoted his life to so repulsive an em- 
ployment ? The course taken was this : The work was put into 
the hands of four men of letters, selected one knows not how, 
nor by whom, nor why. The work was divided amongst them 
in such sort, that each of them received to his share such and 
so many volumes, according as he was most in Beivour. The 
result has been four indexes instead of one, all of them mate- 
rially varying in method and completeness, and rendering und- 
voidable the great inconvenience of consulting four volumes 
instead of one. If a plan analogous to that employed in the 
case of architectural works had been adopted, the course taken 
would have been to advertise a premium for the best essay on 
the art of index^making, and particularly as applied to the 
work in question. As a still further security, an index to one 
volume might have been required by way of specimen } and 
to him who gave the greatest satisfietction upon both these 
point8> the conduct of the work should have been committed. 



V 



1 22 B. t ch. xy,— competition as to rewards 

longitude, they were not guilty of the absurdity of 
eon6i)ing the competition. to the professors of natu- 
ral philosophy and astronomy at Oxford and Cam- 
bridge. To resolve, the problem of the best system 
of legislation is more important and more difficult. 
Why, in mixed governments, has it been hitherto 
confined to the members of the legislative body, 
and in monarchies, to the chancellor ? The deter- 
mining;reason is abundantly clear: those who are 
in possession of the power, those to whom it be- 
longs to propose this problem, are ashamed to 
make a public avowal of their own incapacity to 
solve it ; they carefully avoid all acknowledgments 
of their own incapacity or indolence ; they are 
willing that their labours f^hould be rendered as 
little burdensome as possible, by following the 
ordinary routine, and not that they should be 
increased by the exhibition of the necessity of 
reform. In a word, they desire not to be advised, 
but to be obeyed. Whil6 subject to the influence 
of such circumstances, it can be considered no 
matter of surprise, that they should, as far as pos- 
sible, have made the science of legislation an ex- 
clusive monopoly. The interests of human nature 
cry aloud against this contemptible jealousy. The 
problem- of the best system of laws ought to be 
proposed to the whole world : it belongs to the 
whole world to solve it. 

Frederic the Great twice attempted to make a 
general reform in the Jaws of his kingdom :. both 
times he applied to a single chancellor. The 
first of them, too contented with himself to suspect 
he could stand in need of assistance from others, 
produced a work the most insignificant of any 
which has appeared.* The second, M. Von Carmer, 

4 

* Some extracts from it may be seen.— B« iv« ch. 11. 



B.I. Ch. XV.— COMPETITION AS TO REWARDS. 123 

after having completed his labours, acted very 
differehtly and much bietter: before it received 
the authority of a law, he presented it to the 
public, with an invitation to learned men to com- 
municate to him their observations upon it; se- 
conding his invitations by the offer of rewards* It 
is with regret that I am constrained to ask, why 
did not he, who had, in this respect, thus far sur- 
passed all his predecessors^ act still more nobly ? 
Why only ask for criticism upon a given work? Wliy 
not ask for the work itself? Why limit the invi- 
tation to Germans alone, a& though there were no 
genius out of Germany ? Why limit the reward 
to a sum below the price of those snuff^-boxes 
vvhich are presented to a foreign minister, for thie 
service he performs \n departing when he is re- 
called ? The richest diamond in his master^s 
crown would not have been too great a reward for 
him who should thus have given to all the others a 
new and before-unknown splendour. 

On different occasions, public-spirited indivi- 
duals and societies have endeavoured to supply, 
from their slender resources, the neglect of govern- 
ments, and have offered larger rewards than the 
Chancellor of the Great Frederic. That which 
they could not offer, and which it did not depend 
upon them to offer, was the reward which the 
minds best adapted for the accomplishment of such 
an undertaking would esteem above every other. 
I mean the assurance that their labours would be 
judged by those who could give them authority, 
who could make them useful. 

In conclusion, I do not say, that with regard 'to 
certain services, sufficient reasons may not be 
found for altogether excluding competition, but 
that in every such case these reasons ought to be 



124 B. h ch. XV.— competition as to rewards. 

ready to be rendered, otherwise it ought to be 
Jawful to conclude that they do not exist.* 



♦ With reference to Constitutional Iolw, hereditary succes- 
sion to the throne is established to prevent the competition of 
many pretenders. It is the principal exception to the principle^ 
and the most easily justified. 

Another species of inheritance^ of which the Egyptians had 
given an example, and the Indians have adopted, has found 
admirers even in our days. I refer to hereditary professions in 
•particular families, where they can neither have two nor change 
their first. " Par ce moyen,** dit Bossuet, '' tous les arts 
venoient It leur perfection : on faissoit mieux ce qu*on avoit 
toujours vu faire, et k quoi Ton s*^toit uniquement exerc^ d^s 
son enfance.*'-^Di«cottr^ sur VHistoire Universelle, 

Robertson, in his Historical Researches respecting India, 
has warmly approved th^ institution of castes, and hereditary 
professions. He allows, however, that this system may hinder 
the exertions of genius. "JBut society is formed,** says he, 
'' for ordinary men, and not for men of genius," &c. — Ap- 
' pehdix. 

, If we look at a single art of Europe, that of painting for 
instance, its history will show, that very few artists have been 
born in a painting room. Among a hundred of the most cele- 
brated painters, the father of Raphael atone handled the pencil 
"^Invito patre sidera verso was the device of the illustrious 
Bernouilli, who could only study astronomy in secret, and in 
opposition to the authority of his father. 



[ 126 ] ^ 



CHAPTER XVI. 



REWARDS FOR VIRTUE. 



Beccaria accuses modern legislators of indif- 
ference to this subject. Punishments, says he^ 
and, in many instances, unduly severe punishments, 
are provided for crimes ; for virtue there are no 
rewards. These complaints, repeated by a multi-* 1 
tude of writers, are matter of common-place decla- 
mation. 

So long as they are confined to general terms, 
the subject presents no difficulty; but when an 
attempt is mrade to remove the ground of com- 
plaint, and to frame a code of remuneratory laws 
for virtue, how great is the difference between \ 
what has been asserted to be desirable, and what is) 
possible ! 

Virtue is sometimes considered as an act, some- 
times ai^ disposition : when it is exhibited by a 
positive abt^ it confers a service ; when it is con- 
sidered as aii^sposition, it is a chance of services. 
Apart from thii notion of service, it is impossible 
to tell wherein\jrirtue consists. To fomi xJjear 
ide as conc erning it , it must altogetherJbjejefieirfidJo 
the^piiacipl£of..utU^ 
BS it s motive . 

ter having thus far considered services to be 

rewarded, that is to say acts of public notoriety, 

^which fall not within the boundary of ordinary 

actions, it remain^ to be shown in relation to 

virtue — 1. What <?annot be accomplished by gene- 

\ ral rewards. — S. What it is possible to accomplish, 



126 B. I. cb. xvf.— rewards for virtue. 

either by particular institution, or occasional re-* 
ward.* 

I. We may observe, in the first place, that those ' 
civil virtues, which are most important to the weU 
fere of society, and to the preservation of the hu- 
man race, do not consist in striking exploits, which 
carry their own proof with them ; but in a train of 
daily actions, in an uniform and steady course of 
conduct, resulting from the habitual disposition of 
the mind. Hence it is precisely because these 
viTtue5Mwej:Qnnected.w.ith the whole .coyijge. of our 
exi stenc e, that they are iQCapable. of ..being., xnade 
the objects oTthe rewards of institution. It is im- 
possible to know what particular fact to select, at 
what period to require the proof, to what particular 
circumstance to attach the distinction of reward. 

S. Add to these difficulties that of finding a 
suitable reward, which shall be agreeable to those 
for whom it is designed. The modesty, Qod-deli- 
cacy of virtue would be wounded,by the formalities 
necessary to the public proof of its existence. It 
is fostered by, and perhaps depends upon, esteem ; 
but this is a secret which it seeks to hide from 
itself, and those prizes for virtue which seem to 
suppose that conscience is bankrupt, would not be 
accepted by the rich, nor even sought after by the 
most worthy among the poor. 

3. Every virtue produces advantaiges which are 
peculiar to itself. Probity inspires confidence in 
all the relations of life. Industry leads on to inde- 
pendence and wealth. Benevolence is the source 

♦'This wiU partly form an application of the principles laid 
down in Chap. 7* Punition and Remuneration — their relations, 
Mr. Bentham, apparently not having believed it necessary to 
enter into this detail^ I have attempted^ by this chapter^ to 
supply thin omission^ if it were one. — Note by Dumont. 



B. I, Ca, XVI.— REWARDS FOR VIRTUE. 127 

of kixidly affections ;-— and though these advan- 
tages are not always reaped, they generally follow 
in the natural course of events. Their effect 
is much ihore steady and certain than that of fac- 
titious reward, which is necessarily subject to 
many imperfections. 

In the reign of Louis XIV. a treatise was pub- 
lished " On the Falsity of Human VirtUjes.^^ What 
is singular, and what the author probably never sus- 
pected is,, that by some slight alterations it would 
be easy to convert this work into a treatise on their 
reality. The author appears to have considered 
them as false^ because they were founded upon re- 
ciprocal interest; bedause their object is happiness^ 
esteem, security, and the peaceable enjoyment of 
life:; because men in their mutual intercourse settle 
with each other for their reciprocal services. But 
without these felicitous effects, what would virtue 
be ?. In what. consists its reality} What would it 
have to recommend it ? .How would it be distin^ 
guished from vice? This basis of interest, which to 
tbis: author appears to have rendered, it false^ is 
precisely;that which gives it a true and solid, and 
we may add, an immutable existence, fot no other 
source of happiness can be iniagined.* 

But. if the most important class of virtues are 
already provided with sufficient motives to lead to 
their performance, either in the sufferings they y 
prevent, dr in the advantages to which they 
give birth, isitpot superfluous to add factitious 
motives ? T4ie interference of legislators ils useful 
only in supplying the deficiency of natural motives. 

* .The writer aboye alluded ta> like all ascetics^ unskilful ia 
reasonings injures the religion it was his object to serve. 
How strong an argumient may we not derive froip this coin- 
cidence betjween practical morality and happiness^ in proof of 
design on the part of the supreme legislator ! 



138 B.I. ch.xvi^rewards for virtue. . 

4. What would be our condition were things iti 
a different state, were it necessary to invite men 
to labour, honesty, benevolence, and all the duties 
of their several conditions, by means of factitious 
reward? Pecuniary rewards, it is evident, it would 
be impossible to bestow. Honour, it is true, 
remains ; but how would it be practicable to create, 
in the shape of honour, a sufficient fund of reward 
for the generality of human actions ? The value of 
these rewards consists in their rarity. So soon as 
they are common, their value is gone. 

In this case, as in so many other cases, there is 
an analogy between rewards and punishments, jx 
is an imperfection common to both these sane-' 
tions, that they are applicable to actian^ alone, and 
exercise only a distant and indirect influence upon 
the habits and dispositions which giv^ a colour to 
the whole course of life. Thus, rewards cannot 
be instituted for parental kindness, conjugal fide- 
lity, adherence to promises, veracity, gratitude and 
pity : legal punishments cannot be assigned to in- 
gratitude, harduess of heart, violations of friendly 
confidence, malice or envy, in a word, to all those 
vicious dispositions which produce so much evil 
before they have broken out into those crimes 
which are cognizable before legal tribunals. The 
two systems are like imperfect scales, useful only 
for weighing bulky commodities ; and as an indi- 
vidual, whose life has been less guilty than that of 
a man of a hard and false heart, is punished for. a 
single theft, there is also often a necessity of re- 
warding a certain distinguished service, performed 
by a man who is otherwise little entitled to esteem. 

Thus, in regard to the moral virtues, which con- 
stitute the basis of daily conduct, there is no reward 
which can be applied to them by general institu- 
tion. All that it is possible to do, is limited to 



B. I. ch. XVI.— rewards for virtues. 129 

seizing upon those striking actions, readily suscep* 
tible of proof, which arise outof extraordinary cir- 
cumstances, as opportunities of conferring occa- 
sional rewards. 

Rewards of this nature cannot be bestowed peri- 
odically: the occasions for performing eminent 
services do not regularly recur. It is the action, 
and not the date in the almanack, which ought to 
bring down the reward. The French Academy 
annuallybestowed a prize upon theindividual who, 
among the indigent classes, had performed the 
most virtuous action. The judges had always one 
prize to bestow, and they had but one. They 
must occasionally have experienced regret at leav- 
ing unrewarded actions of equal merit, and some- 
times at being obliged to reward an action of an 
ordinary description. Besides, by the periodical 
return of the distribution, this prize would soon 
be rendered an object of routine, and cease to 
attract attention. 

The institution of La Rosiere de Salency may be 
produced in answer to the above observations: 
but it should be remembered, that a village insti- 
tution is of a diflferent nature. The more limited 
a society, the more closely may its regulations be 
made to resemble those of domestic government ; in 
which, as we have already seen, reward may be 
applied to almost every purpose. It is thus that 
annual prizes may be established for agility, skilly 
strength ; for every other quality which it may be 
desirable to encourage, and of which the rudiments 
always exist. There is not a village in Switzer- 
land which does not distribute prizes of this nature 
for military exercises : it is an expedient for con- 
verting the duties and services of the citizens into 
fetes. Geneva, whilst it was a republic, had its 
naval king ; its king of the arquebuss ; its com- 



130 B. I. ch. xvf.— rewards for virtues. 

mander of the bow ; its king of the cannon. The 
conqueror, during the year of his reign, enjoyed cer- 
tain privileges, little costly to the state; the public 
joy marked the return of these national exercises, 
which placed all the citizens under the eyes of their 
grateful country. La Rosiere de Salency^ designed 
to honour virtues, which ought to be perpetuated 
and renewed from generation to generation, might 
have a periodical return, like the roses of summer. 

The Humane Society^ established in England for 
the purpose of affording assistance to persons in 
danger of drowning, and providing the means of 
restoration in cases of suspended animation, distri- 
butes prizes to those who have saved any individual 
from death. In this case, the reward is not, as in 
the French Academy, confined to the indigent 
class alone: men of the first rank would consider 
it an honour to receive a medal commemorative of 
so noble an action. Besides, the mode of confer- 
ring these rewards has not been dramatised ; the 
retired habits of virtue have been consulted; there 
is no public exhibition to which it is dragged, to 
be confounded or humiliated. Greater eclat might, 
however, without adding to the theatrical effect, 
be given to these rewards, were an efficient report 
made of them to the king and both houses of par- 
liament. 

An institution of a similar nature, for the reward 
of services rendered in cases of fire, shipwreck, and 
all other possible accidents, would still further 
contribute to the cultivation of benevolence ; and 
these noble actions, brought ia the same manner 
under the eyes of the legislators, and inscribed in 
their journals, would acquire a publicity of much 
less importance to the honoured individual than to 
society in general. 

Indeed, though the reward applies only to one 



B.I. Ch. XVI.— rewards for VIRTUES. 131 

particular action, the principal object designed is 
the cultivation of those dispositions which such 
actions indicate : and this can only be accom- 
plished by the publicity which is given to the 
example, and the public esteem and honour in 
which it is held. 

When, upon the site of the prison which had 
been the scene of an exalted instance of filial 
piety, the Romans erected a temple, they incul- 
cated a noble lesson : they proclaimed their respect 
for one of tlie fundamental virtues of their re- 
public* 

Independently of these eminently meritorious 
and always rare actions, governments might render 
publicity subservient to the perfection of a great 
variety of services, in the performance of which 
the regular discharge of duty is more important 
than the display of extraordinary virtues. This 
project might be realized by the formation of a 
comparative table of the subordinate administra- 
tions of cities, parishes, or counties. This table 
would require to be renewed at fixed periods, and 
might be made to show which districts were most 
exact in the payment of taxes, in which the fewest 
crimes had been committed, in which useful esta- 
blishments had been formed, in which the most 
liberal exertions had been made for the .relief of 
calamity, what hospitals had been conducted with 
the greatest economy, and had been most success- 

* Humilis in plebe et ideo ignobilis puerpera^ supplidi 
t^iusd. carcere inclus^ niatre> cum impetrasset aditum> a jani- 
tore semper excussa^ ne quid inferret cibi^ deprehensa est ube- 
ribus Buis alens earn. Quo miraculo matria salus donata 
pietati est, ambaeque perpetuis alimentis^ et locus ille eidem 
consecratus deae. C. Quintio M. Acilio Coss. templo Pietatis 
extructo in illius carceris sede. — Plin, lib. vii. c. 36. , 

9. 



132 B.I. Ch. XVI.— REWARDS FOR VIRTUES. 

ful in the cure of diseases;* what tribunals had 
decided the greatest number of causes, and from 
which the smallest number of appeals had been 
made; in what instances efficacious precautions 
had been adopted for relieving any particular dis- 
trict from causes tending to render it unhealthy,-^ 
from mendicity, from smuggling, from vice, and 
from misery. 

Such official reports, independently of their poli- 
tical utility to the government, would, without 
parade, produce all the good eflfects of reward ; of 
that reward in honour which costs nothing to the 
country, and yet maintains all the moral energies 
in full activity. Every distinguished service might 
find a place in these annals; -and the people, 
always prone to exaggerate the vigilance and 
means of information possessed by their governors, 
would soon be persuaded that a perpetual inspect 
tion was kept up, not only with respect to their 
faults, but also their meritorious actions. 

This project is borrowed, neither from the Re- 
public of Plato, nor the Utopia of More. It is even 
inferior to what has in our time been carried into 
effect, in an empire composed of more than a hun- 
dred departments ; f in which tables exhibiting, in 
columns, all the results of civil, economical, rural, 
and commercial administration, were formed with 

* In the report respecting THot^l Dieu> by Bailli, a table of 
the mortality in different hospitals is given, and the process of 
his calculations. 

t I refer here to L* Analyse des Proces-verbaux des Canseils de 
Department ; a work in 4to. published in France in 1802. This 
work consisted of the answers to a series of questions, addressed 
to each department, by the minister of the interior. 

These tables have been discontinued. Such is the fact. I 
do not endeavour to ascertain the cause. 



B; I. Cli. XVI.— REWARDS FOR VIRTU ES. 133 

greater facility and promptitude than would have 
been experienced by any Russian noble, had he 
been desirous of obtaining from his superintendants 
an account of the state of his property. 

If rewards were established for virtue, when 
exhibited by the indigent classes, it would be im- 
proper to seek for striking instances of its display, 
orto suppose that they are actuated by sentiments of 
vanity, which operate feebly upon men accustomed 
to dependence, and almost constantly employed in 
making provision for their daily wants. Institu* 
tions of this nature, suited to small communities, 
ought to be adapted to local circumstances and 
popular habits. In a village or a town, for in- 
stance, it might be proper to assign a distinguished 
place in the church for the old men : this distinc- 
tion, united to a sentiment of religion, and granted 
with .discretion, need bear no appearance of flat- 
tery, but might be a mark of respect towards old 
age, rendered honourable by the blameless life 
which had preceded it. There exist in England 
many charitable institutions for decayed trades- 
men, in which their situation is much preferable 
to that of the inhabitants of poor-houses: they 
have their separate dwellings, their gardens, and a 
small pension. Those only whose conduct has 
been generally honourable being admitted to these 
asylums, the metal badge which is worn in some 
instances, so far from being considered as a dis- 
grace, is regarded as a mark of honour. 

Different agricultural societies bestow rewards 
upon servants who have lived during a certain 
number of years in the same place ; this circum- 
stance being with reason considered as a proof of 
fidelity and good conduct. 

Some of these societies also give rewards to day 
labourers, who have brought up a certain number 



134 B. I. Ch. XVI.-i.REWARDS FOR VIRTUES. 

of children without having received assistance 
from their parishes. This is an encouragement fa 
economy, and all the virtuous habits which it im- 
plies: but as a means of remedying the inconve- 
niences arising from the poor laws, its eflfectis ex- 
tremely feeble. 

In both these cases the reward generally con- 
sists of money ; but the money is connected with 
honour ; the notoriety given to the reward operates 
as a certificate in favour of the individual in his 
particular district. 

By examining every thing which has been done 
in this respect in Holland, Switzerland, England, 
and elsewhere, we should become possessed of an 
assortment of remuneratory expedients, applicable 
to almost every class in society. Every thing 
depends, however, upon the mode of application. 
For this duty governments are entirely unfit. It 
is local inspection alone which can gain a know- 
ledge of circumstances and superintend the details. 

After all, just and discriminating public esteem, 
that is to say public esteem founded upon the 
principle of utility, is the most potent, the most 
universally applicable, of all the species of reward. 
If virtue be held in public estimation, virtue will 
flourish: let it cease to be held in such estimation, 
it will decline in the same proportion. The cha- 
racter of a people is the moral climate which kills 
or vivifies the seeds of excellence. 

An inquiry into the causes of the high respect in 
which, under certain governments, particular vir- 
tues were held ; why the virtues of a Curtius^ of a 
Fabricius^o(^ Scipioy were nourished and developed 
at Rome ; why other countries and other times 
have produced only courtiers, parasites, fine gen- 
tlemen and wits, men without energy and-^ithout 
patriotisno, would require a moral and histpricai 



B. I. ch. XVI.— rewards for virtues, 135: 

analysis, only to be completed by means of a pro- 
found study of the political. lihastitutions, and 
particular circumstances of each people. The re- 
sult would, however, prove, that the qualities most 
successfully cultivated were those held in most 
general esteem. 

But public esteem, it may be said, is free, essen- 
tially free, independent of the authority of govern- 
ments.. This copious fund of rewards is therefor^ 
withdrawnfromthehandsof the supreme authority I 
This, however, is not the case : governments may 
easily obtain the disposal of this treasure. Public 
esteem cannot be compelled, but it may be con- 
ducted. It requires but little skill on the part of 
a virtuous sovereign to enable him to apply the 
high reward of public esteem to any service which 
his occasions may require. 

There already exists a degree of respect for riches, 
honour, and power: if the dispenser of these gifts 
bestow them only upon useful qualities, if he unite 
what is already esteemed to what ought to be esti- 
mable, his success is certain. Reward would serve 
as a proclamation of his opinion, and would mark 
out a particular line of conduct as meritorious in his 
eyes. Its first effect would be that of a lesson in 
morality. 

Unrewarded, the same service would not ac- 
quire the same degree of notoriety. It would be 
lost among the multitude of objects soliciting 
public attention, and remain undistinguished from 
the pretensions, well or ill founded, respecting 
which public opinion is undecided. Furnished 
with this patent from the sovereign, it becomes au- 
thentic and manifest : those who were ignorant 
are instructed, those who were doubtful become 
decided : the inimical and the envious are rendered 
less bold, reputation is acc]uired, and becomes per- 



136 [B. I. ch. xvj.— rewards for virtues. 

nianent. The second effect of the reward consists 
in the increase #^ intensity and duration given to 
public esteem. 

Immediately, all those who are governed by 
views of interest, who aspire to honour or fortune ; 
those who seek the public good, but who seek it 
like ordinary men, not as heroes or martyrs, eagerly 
press into that career in which the sovereign has 
united private and public interest. In this manner 
a proper dispensation of favours directs the passions 
of individuals to the promotion of the public wel- 
fare, and induces even those who were indifferent 
to virtue or vice, to rank themselves upon that 
side which promises them the greatest advantage. 

Such being the power of sovereigns, he must 
be extremely inexpert in the distribution of ho- 
nours, who separates them from that public esteem 
which has so decided a tendency to unite with 
them. Nothing, however, is riiore common. In- 
istances may be found, in most courts, of splendid 
decorations of stars and garters in double and 
triple range, which do not even give a favourable 
turn to public opinion. They are considered as 
proofs of favour , but not as signs of merit. 

" Honours in the hands of princes resemble 
those talismans with which the fairies, according 
to the fables, were wont to present their favourites ; 
they lose their virtue whenever they are improperly 
employed.''* 

* Helvetius. 



[ 137 ] 



CHAPTER XVII. 

ACCOMPANIMENTS TO REMUNERATION. 

After having exhibited in what manner the 
matter of wealth is applicable to the purposes of 
reward, we proceed to show other uses derivable 
from it for the public service, which are not re- 
muneratory. 

The idea of reward will be much clearer when 
it shall have been distinguished and separated from 
these accessory uses, which have certain relations 
with it. , . 

1. Wages necessary firr the support of life. Ser- 
vants must be fed whilst they are employed, and 
there are cases in which it is necessary to feed them 
even before they begin to work. If the wages paid 
do not exceed what is necessary for this purpose, 
as is sometimes the case among the soldiery, and 
especially if the enrolments are involuntary, such 
wages, being absolutely necessary, are not reward. 

2. The Instruction of Servants. Certain kinds 
of service require advances from Government for 
this object. If this instruction require much time, 
it is naturally begun ^t an early age, and is then 
called education. This employment of the matter 
of reward is sufficiently distinct from that which 
regards subsistence, with which however it is very 
frequently combined and confounded. If there 
are a sufficient number of individuals willing to 
bear this expense, so much the better ; otherwise 

, it is necessary that Government should bear it for 
them. This has almost everywhere been thought 
to be the case with respect to the church. It has 



138 B.I. Ch.XVII.— ACCOMPANIMENTS TO REMUNERATION. 

also generally been considered necessary in new 
countries, or countries but little advanced in the 
career of prosperity with respect to the teachers 
and professors in most branches of science. In 
the war department, the corps of cadets is a nur- 
sery for young officers. The foundations of public 
schools are nurseries for the church. The greater 
number however of these foundations are owing 
rather to the good intentions of individuals than 
to the cafes of governments. 

3. Equipment. That an individual may be in 
a condition to render service, he must be furnished 
with the necessary equipments. The warrior wants 
his accoutrements ; the astronomer his observa- 
tory ; the chemist his laboratory ; the mechanic 
his machines; the naturalist his ^collections of 
natural history ; the botanist his garden ; the 
experimental farmer a plot of ground, and funds to 
enable him to improve it. 

4. Indemnity. When an individual is only in- 
demnified, he is not rewarded : reward, properly 
speaking, only begins when indemnity is complete 
— Do we wish for services ? we ought to recollect 
that by the person from whom we seek to obtain 
them, the inconveniences of every sort which 
compose the burthen of the service will be put 
into one scale, the advantages he finds attached to 
it into the other. To the head of indemnity be- 
longs everything necessary to produce an equili- 
brium between the two ; it is only the excess 
which is thrown into the scale of advantages which 
strictly belongs to the head of reward. 

5. The assuring responsibility. In so far as the 
matter of reward is employed for this purpose, it 
is employed in laying a foundation for the inflic- 
tion of punishment. The stock of punishment is 
in itself inexhaustible; but when the body is 



B. I. ch. xvil— accompaniments to remuneration . 139 

withdrawn from the hands of the ministers of 
justice, corporal punishment cannot be inflicted, 
and all other punishments can be compensated. 
If a servant possess property of his own, so much 
the better; if he possess none, and a sala^ be 
given to him, he will always have so much to 
lose ; the loss of this salary will be a punishnient 
he will always be liable to undergo, whatever may 
become of him. 

The principal use of this employment of the 
matter of reward, is in the case of offices which 
place property in the hands of those who fill 
them. If there are no other means of securing 
their probity, it would not be bad economy to 
make their appointments amount in value to but 
little less than the highest interest they could reap 
from the largest sum they ever have in their hands. 
This would be to make them assure against their 
own dishonesty. The difference between the 
actual salary and the least salary they could be 
induced to accept, would constitute the premium. 
It is rarely that a distinct sum is appropriated to 
this purpose ; on the one hand, this end is partly 
effected by suretyship, and on the other, the sum 
considered requisite for the purposes of indem- 
nity and reward equals or surpasses what could 

* be proposed to be allowed for it ; but this function 
is not the less distinct from all the rest. 

6. A guarantee against temptations. Money, 
^ like the most valuable articles of the medical 
pharmacopeia, may serve either as a poison or an 
antidote, according as it is applied. This employ- 
ment of the matter of reward resembles that last 
mentioned, without being confounded with it. 
Money employed for assuring responsibility will 
produce its effect, though the individual be 

• already corrupted. The use of money employed 



140 B. L CH. XVII.— ACCOMPANIMENTS TO REMUNERATION; 

as a guarantee against tempitation, is to pi'event 
corruption. A less suoi may suffice in this case 
than in the former ; in that, it was necessary that 
thejevenue granted should preserve some propor- 
tioAo.thesum confided ; in this, such proportion 
is not required : the measure to be observed is 
only that of the wants of the individual placed in 
the rank that the office he occupies confers. In a 
word, salary, considered as a pledge, is only useful 
in the prevention of theft; money, employed as 
an antiseptic, is equally useful in the prevention 
of peculation in all its forms, in the prevention of 
all improper conduct which can have for its 
motive the desire of money, and for its means the 
situation in which the individual is placed by 
his office. 

7. The support of dignity. Public opinion ex- 
acts, it matters not by what reason, from every 
individual possessed of a certain rank,, a certain 
expenditure ; his wants are thus increased in pro- 
portion to his dignity. Dignity, deprived of the 
wealth necessary for its support, furnishes in pro- 
portion to its extent an incentive to malversation, 
and at the same time generally furnishes the 
opportunity ; as an antidote to such temptations, 
money may therefore sometimes be bestowed for 
the support of dignity. The good of the service 
may also require the same thing. .: It is incontesti- 
bly true that between wealth and power there 
subsists an intimate and natural union. Wealth 
itself is power, it may be proper therefore that the 
support of the respect which it commands be not 
refused in favour of certain employments, in 
which much depends upon the place they hold in 
public opinion. 

8. Another use of the matter of reward consists 
in the excitement of alacrity ; I mean the produc- 



B. I.Xh. XVIL—ACCOMPANIMENTS TO REMUNERATION. 141 

tion of an habitual disposition to do what id 
required with pleasure. The greater the degree 
of mental enjoyment, the quicker and more lively 
are one's ideas, and the larger the quantity of 
work which can be performed in a given time. 
The mind, in a happy mood, acts with incompara«- 
bly more ease than when agitated by grief; or 
even in its ordinary condition, when it is moved 
only by haWf. It is the same with the bodiljr 
powers; who knows not how much the powers 
of the muscles depend upon the energy of the 
mind ? What comparison is there between the 
labour of slaves and of free men ? It is upon thig 
that the superiority of hired soldiers over unpaid 
and arbitrary levies depends. In the one case, as 
in the other, the motive which leads to exertioli 
consists in the expectation of being treated ac- 
cording to their behaviour ; the motive is nothing 
else but the fear of pain. But in the first cade 
there is the gratification of reward to sustain the 
alacrity; in the other, the labour has no other 
accompaniment but grief. 

The simple expectation of a reward, how large 
soever it may be, will not always produce the 
same effect as a reward previously bestowed. 
The <:oiidition of expectancy in which the indi- 
vidual finds himself in such a case, is a mixed and 
uncertain state, in which despair and hope may 
alternately predominate. 

The danger to be guarded against is, lest rewards 
previously bestowed should produce diversions 
little favourable to labour, either by suggesting 
the idea of some more favourite occupation, or by 
supplying the means of its pursuit. The progress 
of the thoughts may be accelerated, but the 
thoughts excited may be of a different nature; 



142 B.I. Cm. XVIL— ACCOMPANIMENTS TO REMUNERATION* 

the dull ideas of labour may be supplanted by the 
eDlivening considerations of shows and of pleasure. 

Whether or not it is proper to bestow such 
rewards, depends upon the character of the indi- 
vidual ; that character must be known, before it is 
possible to determine what will be their effect; 
but in every case there can be no greater folly 
than to waste in previous gratifications every 
thing which is destined for reward.* • 

In conclusion, these distinctions- ought not to 
be abused. The expense of rewards need not be 
increased on account of each of these items ; it is 
not necessary to appropriate a distinct sum to 
each. The same sum may serve for many, and 
even for all. That which suffices for assuring 
responsibility will, in general, suffice as a guaran- 
tee against temptations, and vice versa, so far as 
ends so uncertain may be effected by such means, 
and will in every case s\iffice for indemnification. 
That which suffices for equipment, may serve in 
part for the support of dignity and the excitement 
of alacrity. That which suffices for the mainte- 
nance of dignity will be sufficient for almost all 
the other ends ; and the whole of whatever is 
employed for any other of these purposes, except 
equipment, cannot but serve for subsistence. 



RATIONALE OF REWARD. 



BOOK IL 



REWARDS APPLIED TO OFFICES. 



CHAPTER L 



SALARY HOW A REWARD. 



There are many species of service, and even 
services of a positive nature, of which governments 
stand in constant and uninterrupted need : such for 
the most part are the duties of those who are em- 
ployed in the different departments of every go- 
vernment. The political state or condition, on 
account of which individuals possessing it are 
considered liable to render these services, is called 
a place, an office, or an employment. To these 
places it is both natural and customary to attach, 
under the title of emolument, certain portions of 
the matter of wealth. If such emolument be deter- 
minate in amount, and paid at regularly recurring 
periods, it is called a salary. 

It is the nature of a reward to operate as a' mo- 
tive, and in that capacity to give birth to acts 
which, by the person by whom the reward is held 
up to view, are esteemed services; the greater the 
reward, the greater is the motive it constitutes: 
the greater the motive, the more strenuous the 



144 B.I1. ch. I.— salary— How a reward. 

exertion it has a tendency to produce; and if the 
value of the service be susceptible of an indefinite 
degree of perfection, the more strenuous the exer- 
tion to perform it, the greater, as far as depends 
wpon the will of the party, will be the value of the 
service. Hence it follows that, if salary be re- 
ward, as far as funds can be found, salaries cannot 
be too large. How different the state of things 
presented to us when we consult experience ! We 
see small salaries, and the service admirably well 
performed: large salaries, and nothing done for them. 
. In certain lines, we see the service regularly worse 
and worse performed, in proportion to the large- 
ness of the salary. Where then lies the error ? 
In experience there can be none. In the argument 
there is none. The error lies in its not being pro- 
perly understood : and that in general it has not 
been ^properly understood, the bad management 
iand weak measures so frequent in this line are 
but too pregnant proofs. To understand the argu- 
ment aright, two points must be observed : the 
one is, to consider, for illustration sake, that just in 
the same manner as punishment, and in no other 
manner, though with less certainty of effect, is 
reward capable of acting as a mptive : the other 
point is, to consider what is really the service for 
which a salary is a reward. 

What then is the service with respect to which 
a salary operates as a motive ? The answer which 
would be generally given to this question is, the 
continued service belonging to the office to which 
the salary is annexed. Obvious as this answer 
may seem, it is not the true one. The service, and 
the only service, with respect to which a salary can 
operate as a motive, is either the simple instanta- 
neous service of taking upon one the office, or the 
permanent service of continuing to stand invested 



B. II, ch.i.^salary-^how a reward. 1'45 

Mrith it. If the duties of the office — the services in 
the expectation of which the salary annexed to the 
office is bestowed, happen to be performed, it 
can not be owing merely and immediately to the 
salary: it must be owing to some other motive. 
If there were no other motive, the service would 
pot be rendered. Nothing is done without a mo- 
tive :— what then is this other motive ? It must be 
either of the nature of reward or punishment. It 
may Iby possibility be of the nature of reward ; but 
ifitbeso, one or other of these rewards would 
seem superfluous : in common it is principally of 
the nature of punishment. In as far as this is the 
case, the service for which the salary considered as 
a reward is given, is the service of taking upon one 
the obligation constituted by the punishment; the 
obligation of performing the services expected from 
him who possesses the office. 

That the zeal displayed in discharging the duties 
of an office should not be in proportion to the 
salary, will now no longer appear strange. Expe- 
rience is reconciled to theory. This subject will 
receive elucidation, if we substitute punishment for 
reward, and consider what tendency such a motive 
would have to give birth to any service, if con- 
nected with it in the same manner as a salary is 
annexed to an office. 

Suppose a schoolmaster, intending to conduct 
the business of his school with regularity, were to 
make it a rule on a certain day, at the beginning 
of every quarter, to call all his scholars before 
him and to give each ten lashes, committing their 
behaviour during the rest of the quarter altogether 
to their discretion ; — the policy of this master 
would be the exact counterpart of the founder of 
the school towards the master, if he has sought to 
attach him to the duties of his office by bestowing 

10 



146 B.11. Ch. I.-r-SALARY^HOW A REWARD. 

upon bim a salary. Suppose the master, finding 
that under this discipline the progress of his 
wholars did not equal his expectations, should re- 
solve to increase his exertions, and accordingly 
» 3hould double the dose of Btripes ;-— his policy in 
this case would be the exact counterpart of the 
founder, who by the single operation of increasing 
the master's salary, should think to increase his 
diligence. . . 

\ A salary is not a reward for any individual ser- 
"^ vice, of the number of those which are rendered, in 
consequence of a man's acceptance of the oflSce to 
which the salary is annexed. For the rendering.of 
any one of these services, the salary presents him 
not with any motive which can come under the 
head of reward: the motives which it gives him 
belong entirely to the head of punishment. It is 
by fenr only, and not by hope, that he is impelled 
to the discharge of his duty ; by the fearof receiv- 
ing less than he would otherwise receive; not by 
the hope.of receiving more. Though he work ever 
so much more or better than a man who holds his 
office is expected to woA, he will receive nothing 
more than his salary, if the salary is all that he has 
to hope for. By working to a certain degree less 
or worse, he may indeedstand a chance of having 
the salary, or a part of it, taken from him, or he 
may be made punishable in some other way; but 
if he continue to keep clear of that extreme degree, 
in such case let him work ever so little or ever so 
badly, he will not, asfar as artificial punishment is 
concerned, be. ever the worse. He has therefore 
no motive, so far as the salary is concerned, for en- 
deavouring to pass the line ^mediocrity ; and he 
has a motive, the motive of indolence or love of 
ease, for stopping as far short of it as he can with 
safety. 



B.U. C».L— SAWRY— HOW A REWAIU). 147 

Suppo$e, for instani^e, a (salary of 4000/. a year 
annexed to the office of tt judge: of all the s^- 
vices he may come to |)erforo[i in the discbarge ^ 
hia function^ M wiAih one Ja this aalary the to- 
ward ? Of tiQ one whatever; Tike any one of tbe 
causes wbtcti would regiriafly ooine before him for 
hearing; though be were to attend, and to display 
ever so tnuch diligence and ever so macfa ability in 
the hearing of it, he would receive no more (hat 
year than^is 4000/.-^tbough he were to absent 
himself aIto(cetber, and l^ve the business to his 
coUeagqea, he would receive no less ; in short, 
provided he does not so far swerve from bis duty 
as to subje<>t hiniself to fine or deprivation, w^e- 
tjber he perform his duty ever so well, or ever bo 
ill ; wheth^ he decide many causes or few ; whe- 
' ther his attendance is constant or remiss ; whether 
he display ever so much or ever so little ability, 
his salary is the same. Not that a man in this 
exalted station is in any want of motives to prompt 
him to exert himself ijn the discharge of itsduties: 
he has the pleasures of poiVer to bialance the pains 
of study ; the fear of shaime to keep him fromalak- 
ing below mediocrity; the hope of <:elebrity to 
elevate him above it ; to spur him on to the high- 
est pitch of excellence. These motives are pre- 
sented to him by his station, but they are not pre- 
sented to him by his salary. 

The services, and the only services, with which 
the salary presents bim a motive for performing, 
are, in the first place, the instantaneous act of 
taking upon him the station, that is, of subjecting 
himself to the obligations annexed to it, and in 
the event of his violating any of those obligations, 
to the punishments annexed to such violations : in 
the next place, the discharging of the smallest 
portion of those obligations which it is necessary 

10. 



148 B.1I. Cir. f .— SALARV-^OW A REWARD. 

he should discharge, in order to his receiving such 
or such part of the salary. Let it, for instance, be 
paid fiim quarterly: if the first quarter be paid 
him in advance, it will afford him no motive of the 
nature of reward for doing any of the business of 
that quarter. He has that quarterns salary; nor 
can he fail of enjoying it, unless, in the way of 
punishment, it be afterwards taken from him. If 
it be not paid him till the end of the quarter^ the 
case will be still the same, unless proof of his 
having rendered certain services, the having at- 
tended, for example, at certain times, be necessary 
to his receiving it. With this exception, it may 
equally be said that, in both cases, for any other 
Jthan the instantaneous act pf taking upon him the 
burthen of the station for that quarter, he has no 
reward, nor any motive but what operates in the 
way of punishment. 

This distinction is of importance, for if the salaty 
given were the inducement for performing the ser- 
vices, the chance of having them performed, and 
well performed, would be exactly as the magni- 
tude of the salary. If, for example, fifty pounds 
sterling a year sufficed to insure fifty grains of 
piety, assiduity, eloquence, and other sacerdotal 
virtues in a curate, five thousand of these same 
pounds ought to insure five thousand grains of 
these same virtues in a bishop or archbishop. But 
what everybody knows, is that this proportion does 
not hold ; on the contrary, it most frequently hap- 
pens that the proportion is inverse : the curate la- 
bours much, the bishop little, and the archbishop 
less. 

The chance of seryice is as the magnitude of 
the punishment; and if the salary can be with- 
drawn, it is so far indeed as the magnitude of the 
salary ; but it may be equally great without any 



B.II. Ch.1.— SALARY— HOW A REWARD. 149 

salary : by the substitution of any other punish- 
ment instead of loss of salary. 

We see, then, how it is that a salary, be it great 
or small, independently of the obligation which it 
pays a man for contracting, has not in itself the 
smallest direct tendency to produce services ; 
whilst experience shows, that in many cases, in 
proportion to its magnitude, it has a tendency to 
prevent them. 



[ mo ] 



CHAPTER IL 

RULES AS TO EMOlUftTENTS. 

Befo&e we enter upoa this subject in detail^ it 
may be necessary to remark that, the proper appli- 
cation of the following rules will depend upon the 
nature of the service required, and its various local 
circumstances. It is only by observing the pecu- 
liar character assumed by abuse in each office, that 
appropriate remedies for each particular evil can be 
provided. Since it is impossible to make a com- 
plete catalogue of all errors, and to anticipate every 
species of abuse, the rules laid down may not con- 
stitute a. perfect system. They may, however, 
serve as a warning against errors and abuses which 
have by experience been found to exist, and also 
against some which may be imagined likely to 
exist. It is useful to erect beacons upon rocks 
whose existence has been made known by the 
shipwrecks they have caused. Among the rules 
about to be given, some may appear so self-evi- 
dent as almost to seem superfluous : but if it can 
be shewn that errors have arisen from the neglect 
of them in practice, such rules, though not enti- 
tled to be considered as discoveries, must at least 
be regarded as necessary. warnings ; they may teach 
nothing new, but they may serve to recall princi- 
ples which it is desirable should be constantly and 
clearly remembered. 

Mule I. Emoluments ought in such manner to 
be attached to offices, as to produce the most inti- 
mate connection between the duty and the interest 
of the person employed. 



B. IK Cu. II.— RULES AS TO EMOLUMENTS. 151 

This rule may be applied in insuring assiduous 
att^ndence on the part of the persons employed, in 
different offices, different service are required ; but 
the greater number of offices have this one circum- 
stance in common : that their duties may be per- 
formed, it is necessary that the individual holding 
the office should be at a certain time in a certain 
place. Hence, of all duties, assuduous attendence 
is the first, the most simple, and the most universal. 
In many oases, to insure the performance of this 
duty, is to insure the performance of every other 
duty. When the clerk is at his desk, the judge 
upon the bench, the professor in his school, if there 
be nothing particularly irksome in their duty, and 
they can do nothing else, rather than remain idle, 
It is probable they will perform their duty. In 
these cases, the service required being of the con- 
tinual kind, and in point of quality not susceptible 
of an indefinite degree of perfection ; the pay being 
required not for certain services, but for such ser- 
vices as may come to be. performed within a certain 
space of time, it may without impropriety be given 
in the form of a salary. But even here, the policy 
of making reward keep pace with service* should 
be pursued as closely as possible ; and for this pur- 
4)Ose the long continued mass of service should be 
broken down into as many separate services as 
possible : the service of a year into the service of 
days. • In the highest offices, an individual, if paid 
by his time, should like the day labourer, and for 
the same reason, be paid rather by the day than by 
the year. In this way he is kept to his duty with 
more than tlie effect, and at the same time with- 
out any of the odium of punishment. 
. In the station, of a judge, it is not common to 

* See b. i. ch. x. rule 3. 



I 

lo2 an. Ch. II.— RULES AS TO EMOLUMENTS. 

exact atlenclance by the force of punishment : at 
least not by the force of punishment to be applied 
in each instance of failure. But if it were, the in- 
fliction of that punishment for trivial transgres- 
sions, that is for one or a few instances of non-per<* 
formance, would be thought harsh and rigorous, 
nor would any body care for the odium of standing 
forth to enforce it. £xcuses would be lightly made, 
and readily accepted. Punishment in such cases 
being to the last degree uncertain, would be in a 
great measure ineffectual. It might prevent con- 
tinual, but it would never prevent occasional, or 
even frequent, delinquency. But what cannot be 
effected by punishment alone, may be effected by 
punishment and reward together. When the officer 
is paid separately for each day's attendance, each 
particle of service has its reward : there is for each 
particle of service an inducement to perform it. 
There will be no wantoil excuses, when inconveni- 
ence adheres inseparably to delinquency without 
the parade of punishment. 

The members of the French Academy and the 
Academy of Science, notwithstanding all their dig- 
nity, are paid their salaries by the day and not by 
the year. And who are the individuals, how low or 
how high soever, who cannot, and who ought not 
to be paid in this manner ? If pride has a legiti- 
mate scruple, it is that which refuses to receive 
the reward for labour which it has not performed. 
Whilst as to the objection which might arise from 
the minute apportionment of the salary, it is easily 
removed by counters given from day to day, and 
converted into money at fixed periods.- 

In the act of parliament for establishing Peni- 
tentiary houses, among other good regulations, 
this method of insuring assiduity of attendance has 
been adopted. The three superintendants receive, 



B.II. Ch.II.— RULES AS TO JSMOLUMENTS. ' 163 

as the whole of their emoluments, each a share of the 
sum of five guineas, which is directed to be distri- 
buted each day of their attendance equally, among 
those who are present. 

A more antiept example of this policy may be 
found in the incorporated society in London, for 
the assurances of lives. The directors of this esta^' 
blishment receive their trifling emoluments in thi» 
manner ; and thus applied, these emoluments suf«i 
fice. This plan has also been adopted as it respects 
commissioners of bankrupts, an/by different. S^so- 
ciations. 

These examples ought not to be lost, and yet/ 
from not having been referred to general princi- 
ples, they have not possessed the influence they 
ought to have. How often have regulations been 
heaped upon regulations without success ! How 
many useless decrees were made in France to in- 
sure the residence of the bishops and beneficed 
clergy. 

In £ngland we have not, in this respect, been 
more successful, that is to say, more skilful. 
Laws have been enacted against the non-residence 
of the clergy. Laws badly contrived, and conse- 
quently useless. Punishment has been denounced 
and a fine imposed, which, being invariable in 
amount, has sometimes been greater and sometimes 
less than the advantage to be derived firom the 
offence. For want of a public prosecutor in this, 
as in so many other cases, it has been necessary to 
rely upon such casual informer as may be allured 
by a portion of the fine : the love of gain has sel- 
dom proved a motive sufficiently strong to induce 
an endeavour to obtain this reward ; whose value, 
not to mention the expenses of pursuit, is de- 
stroyed by infamy. Till this motive is reinforced 



154 ' B.fl. Ck.£l.--RULES AS TO EMOLUMENTS. 

by personal animosity, wbich bursts tbe bonds of 
ijQfamy, these laws are powerless. 

Such cases, which may occur once or twice in 
the course of ten years, throughout the whole 
kingdom, are neither sufficiently frequent, nor 
well known^ to operate as examples. The offence 
remains undiminished; the useless punishment 
constitutes only an additional evil : whilst such 
laws and such methods, powerless among friends, 
serve only to bring enemies into contact 1 When- 
ever it is desirable that a clergyman should live in 
the midst of his parishioners, that is to say, when 
they are amicable, the law is a dead letter; its 
power is exerted only when they are irreconcilable 
enemies; that is, in the only cases wherein its 
utility is problematical, and it were to be wished 
that its. execution would admit of an exception. 
His return into his parish is a triumph for bis ene-^ 
mies, and a hutn^iliation for himself. 

Had the salaries, paid to the professors in the 
universities, been interwoven with their services, 
it might have been the custom for some of these 
pretended labourers to have laboured for their hire; 
and to be a professor, might have meant something 
more than having a title, a salary, and nothing to 
teach. 

A salary, paid day by day, has an advantage 
beyond that of insuring assiduity of attendance ; 
it even renders a service agreeable, which, with 
an annual salary, will be regarded as purely bur- 
thensome. When reward, instead of being be- 
stowed in a lump, follows each successive portion 
of labour, the idea of labour becomes associated 
with pleasure instead of pain. In England, hus- 
bandmen, like other labourers, are paid in hard 
money by the week, and their labour is cheerfully 



B, IK Ch. II.*-RULES as to EMOLUMENTS. 155> 

and well performed. In some parts of the coDtU 
tienti husbandmen are still paid as they were for- 
merly ia England, by bouses and pieces of land 
given once for all; and the labour is said to be 
performed with all the slovenliness and reluctance 
of slavery. 

Huie 1L= — Emoluments ought in such manner 
to be attached to office, as to produce the greatest 
possible degree of excellence in the service rendered. 

Thus far the subject has only been considered 
as applicable to insuring attendance in cases where 
assiduity of attendance appears to suffice for in- 
suring the performance of all other duties. There 
follow some pases, in which it appears possible to 
apply the sam^ principle, either in the prevention 
of abuse, or in insuring an extraordinary degree of 
perfection in the employment of the powers which 
belong to certain stations. 

Instead of appointing a fixed salary, invariably 
of the* same amount, as the emolument of the 
superintendant, or superintendants, of a prison, a 
poor-house, an asylum for orphans, or any kind of 
hospital, whose inhabitants depend upon the care 
of onci or a small number of individuals, whatever 
maybe the difference in the degree of attention 
displayed, or the degree of perfection with which 
the service is performed, it would be well to make 
such emolument in some measure depend upon the 
care with which their duties have been performed, 
as Evidenced by their success. In a penitentiary, 
M other ptisot), that the prisoners might be insured 
frdm ail negligence or ill-treatmept, tending di-* 
rectly or indirectly to shorten their lives, make a 
calculation of the average number of deaths among 
the prisoners in the particular prison, compared 
with the number of persons confined there. Allow 
the superintendant each year a certain sum for 



166 B. If. Cm. II.— rules as TO EMOLUMENTS. 

each person of this number, upon condition, that 
for every prisoner who dies, an equal sum is 
to be withheld from the amount of his emolu- 
ments. It is clear, that having a net profit upon 
the lives of all whom he preserves, there is scarcely 
any necessity for any other precaution against 
ill-treatment, or negligence, tending to shorten 
life.* 

In the naval service, the laws of England allow 
a certain sum for each vessel taken or destroyed, 
and so much for every individual captured. Why 
is not this method of encouragement extended to 
the military service ? 

Is the commander of an army employed in de- 
fending a province — ^allow him a pension which 
shall be diminished in proportion to the territory 
he loses. Is the governor of an important place 
besieged — allow him so much for every day that 
he continues the defence. Is the conquest of a 
province desirable — promise to the general em- 
ployed, besides the honours he shall receive, a 
sum of money which shall increase in proportion 
to the territory he acquires, besides giving him a 
pension, as above, for preserving it when acquired. 

To the principal duty of taking and destroying 
those who are opposed to him, might be added, 
the subordinate duty of preserving the living ma- 
chines whose exertions are necessary for its accom- 

* " The managers of VHStel Dieu were used to charge fifty 
livres for each patient who either died or was cured. M. de 
Chamousset and Co. offered to undertake the management for 
fifty livres, for those only who were cured. All who died were 
not to he reckoned in the bargain, and were to be at their 
expense. The offer was so admirable, it was not accepted. It 
was feared that they would not be able to fulfil their engagement. 
Every abuse which it is attempted to reform is the patrimony 
of those who have more credit than the Reformers.** — Quest 
Encycl, art. Charxte, 



B. II. ch. ii.^rules as to emoluments. 167 

plishment. The method proposed for the preser- 
vation of prisoners, why should it not be employed 
for the preservation of soldiers? It must be ac- 
knowledged, that no reward exclusively attached 
to this subordinate duty could, in the mind of 
a prudent commander, add anything to^the weight 
of those arguments which arise out of the principal 
object. A soldier when he is ill, is worth less than 
nothing; a recruit may not arrive at the moment, 
may not arrive at all, and when he has arrived he 
is not like a veteran. If therefore it be proper to 
strengthen motives thus palpable, by a separate 
and particular reward, it ought at least to be kept 
in a subordination sufficiently marked with respect 
to the principal object. 

Thus much as to a time of war. In time of 
peace the propriety of this method is much less 
doubtful. It is then that the attention of a general 
should be more particularly directed to the preser- 
vation of his soldiers. Make him the insurer of 
their lives, and he will become the rival of Escu- 
lapius in medical science, and of Howard in phi- 
lanthropy. He will no longer be indifferent, whe- 
ther they encamp upon a hill or in a morass. His 
vigilance will be exercised upon the quality of his 
supplies, and the arrangement of his hospitals ; and 
his discipline will be rendered perfect against those 
vices of armies, which are sometimes no less de- 
structive than the sword of the enemy.* 

The same system might be extended to ships of 
war, in which negligence is so fatal, and in which 
general rules are so easily enforced. The admiral, 
or captain, would thus have an immediate in- 

^ A slight sketch is all that can be attempted : the details 
would occupy too much space. A general might be made the 
insurerj as it respects those who die of disease, but not of those 
who are killed. 



168 B.II. Ch. II.— RULES AS TO EMOLUMENTS. 

terest in the preservation of each sailor. The 
ndmirable example of Captain Cook, who cir- 
cumnavigated the world, and traversed so many 
different climates and unknown seas, without the 
Joss of a single sailor, would no longer be unfruitful. 
His instructions respecting diet, change of ^ir, 
and cleanliness, would not be neglected. The 
British navy, it is true, is much improved in these 
respects, but who can tell how much greater per- 
fection might be attained, if to the already exist- 
ing motives, were added the influence of a con- 
stantly acting interest, which, without injuring 
any virtue, might supply the place of all, if they 
were wanting ? 

In the application of these suggestions^ there 
may be difficulties : are they insurmountable ? It 
is for those who have had experience to reply. 

In the treaty made by the Landgrave of Qesse 
Cassel, relative to the troops which the British 
government hired of him to serve in America, one 
stipulation was, that for every man not returned to 
his country, he should receive thirty pounds. I 
know not whether such a stipulation were cus- 
tomary or not, but whether it were or not, nothing 
could be more happily ioiagined, either for the 
fiscal interest of the sovereign lender, or the in- 
terest of the individuals lent. The spirit of party 
found in this stipulation a theme for declama- 
tion, as if its only effect were to give to the 
prince an interest in the slaughter of his i^ubjects ; 
whilst, if anything could counterbalance the mis- 
chievous effects of the treaty, it was this pecuniary 
condition. It gave to these strangers a security 
against the negligence or indifference of the bor- 
rowers, on account of which they might more wil- 
lingly have been exposed to danger than native 
subjects. The price attached to their loss would 



B. II. Ctt. II.^RULfiS AS TO EMOLUMENTS. 169 

act as an iQ&araDce, that care should be taken to 
preserve them. 

It has been said, that in some countries the 
emoluments of the coniiiianders of regiments 
increase in. proportion to the number of non-effec- 
tives : that is to say, that they receive always the 
same amotint for the pay of his corps, though they 
have not al,ways the same number of men to pay. 
Such an arrangement is precisely the opposite of 
what is recommended above. The number of noH«* 
effe<itives increasing by death or desertion, the 
commander gains in money what he loseis in men. 
Every penny which he is thus permitted toacquire 
is a reward offered, if not for murder, at least for 
negligence. 

Note.^^The principles thtis laid down by Mr.Benthamare 
susceptible of great diversity of applicatipn. When Mr. 
Whitbread brought into parliament his bill ibr the establish- 
ment of schools for the education of the podr> I flattered mysdf 
that I had discovered one instance to which they might very 
readilv be applied 5 and> in a letter addressed to Sir Samuel 
Romilly, from which the following paragraphs are extracted:^ 
I explaJnied my ideas upon the subject. It will be perceived^ 
that the wiiole plan depends upon the principles laid down in 
this chapter. 

^' Mr. Whitbread has been fUlly aware of the necessity of 
superintendance in respect to the masters^— «and he has pro- 
posed to commit it to the clergyman and justices of the peaces 
but it is not difficult to foresee^ that this burthensome super- 
intendance wiU be inefficacious. No good will be effected un- 
less the interest of the master is constantly combined with all 
parts of his duty. The only method of accomplishing this, 
consists in making his reward depend upon his success 5 in 
giving him no fixed salary ', in allowing him a certain sum for 
each child, payable only when each child has learned to read } 
in a word> in paying him, as workmen are sometimes paid, 
by the work done. 

" When he receives a fixed salary, the master has only a 
slight interest in the progress of his pupils. 1 f he act suffi- 
ciently well to prevent his being discharged, this is all that can 
reasonably be expected. 



160 B.II. ch. II.— rules as to emolument^. 



<€ 



If he receive no reward till the service be performed^ he 
has a constant interest in performing it quickly. He can relax 
)us exertions only at his own expense. There is no longer any 
necessity for superintendance. The master will himself seek 
to improve the modes of instruction^ and to excite the children 
to emulation. He will be disposed to listen to the advice^ and 
to prc^t by the experience of others. 

*' When he receives a fixed salary^ every new scholar in- 
creases the trouble of the master, diminishes his exertions^ 
and disposes him to complain. Upon the plan which 1 propose, 
it 18 the master who will stir up the negligent parents ; it is 
he who will become the servant of the law. Instead of com- 
plaining that he has too many pupils^ he will only complain if 
be have too few. Should he luive three or four hundred, or 
even as many as Mr. Lancaster, like him, he would find the 
means of attending to them all ; he would employ the most 
forward in instructing those who were less advanced, &c. &c. 

'^ Should a negligent or incapable master be appointed, he 
would be forced to quit his place. Substitute for this plan 
examinations, depositions^ and decisions^ and see what would 
be the consequence. 

" There would be no difficulty in the execution of this pro- 
posed plan. It would be sufficient if, twice or thrice in the 
' year, that the clergyman, and certain justices of the peace, or 
other persons of consequence, who were willing to promote so 
useful a work, should meet together for two or three hours at 
the school-house. The examination of each scholar would not 
occupy more than half a minute. The master himself might 
be trusted for selecting only such as were capable of un- 
dergoing the test, and an ho^norary would thus be added 
to his pecuniary reward, by the publicity given to his suc- 
cess." — ^DUMONT. 



t 161 ] 






CHAPTER III. 

FEES AND PERQUISITES — NONE. 

Another expedient is often employed in the 
payment of public officers. I refer to the fees, 
which they are sometimes authorised to receive 
on their own account, from those who require theirf> 
services. 

This arrangement is attended with a specious 
advantage, and a real danger. The advantage is, 
that the reward seems to be exactly and diri^ly 
in proportion to the labour performed. The 
danger lies in the temptation given to such officers 
to increase their emoluments, by increasing the 
difficulties of those who need their services. The 
abuse is easily introduced. It is very natural, for 
example, that an individual who has been served 
with an extraordinary expedition, should add some- 
thing to the accustomed fee. But this reward, 
bestowed on account of superior expedition in the 
first instance, infallibly becomes a cause of delay 
in all which follow. The regulated hours of busi- 
ness are employed in doing nothing, or in doing 
the least possible, that extraordinary pay may be 
received for what is done out of office-hours. 
The industry of all the persons employed will be 
directed to increasing the profit of their places, by 
lending one another mutual assistance ; and the 
heads of departments will connive at the disorder, 
either for their share of the benefit, or out of kind- 
ness to their inferiors, or for fear of rendering them 
discontented. 

11 



• 162 B.II. Ch. UI.— FEES AND PERQUISITES— NONE. 

The inconveniences will be yet greater, if they 
relate to a service covered with a mysterious veil, 
which the public cannot raise. Such is the veil 
of the law. The useless and oppressive delays in 
legal procedure arise from very complicated causes ; 
but it cannot be doubted, that one of the most 
considerable of these causes is the sinister interest 
which lawyers have in multiplying processes and 
questions, that they may multiply the occasions for 
receiving fees. 

Integrity is more easily preserved in public 
offices in which there are no fees, than those in 
which they are allowed. A lawful right often 
serves as a pretext for extortion. The distinction 
between what is permitted and what is prohibited^ 
in many cases, is exceedingly minute ; and how many 
temptations may occur of profiting by the igno- 
rance of strangers, when circumstances will insure 
impunity ! An easy method of detecting offences 
18 a great restraint. Whenever therefore fees are 
allowed, a list of them should be publicly fixed 
up in the office itself: this will operate as a pro- 
tection to the persons employed against suspicion, 
and to the public against vexation. 

This mode of rewarding services supposes, that 
the individuals, who stand in need of them, Should 
bear the expenses of the establishment : this is 
true only in case the benefit is solely for those in- 
dividuals; in all other cases fees constitute an 
unequal and very unjustly assessed tax. We 
shall have occasion to recur to this subject shortly. 



fr^ 1 • 



[ 163 ] 



CHAPTER IV. 

MINIMIZE^ EMOLUMENT. 

Rule III.- — ^The amountiof the salary, or other 
emoluments, attached to every office, ought to be 
the least that the individuals, qualified toexecute 
its duties^ are willing to accept for their perform*^ 
ance. 

The fair and proper price of any vendible com« 
modity is the least that anybody will take for it; 
so that the expectation of like payment shall be a 
sufficient inducement to the labour requisite to 
produce other like articles in future. The fair and 
proper price of any service is the least that any- 
body will do it for : so that if more were given, it 
would be done either not at all the better, or not 
so much the better as th^t the difference of qui^i^ 
lity should be. equivalent to the difference of ey* 
pense. In this proper and necessary price is in« 
eluded, of course, everything necessary to enable 
the individual to perform, s^nd to continue to pet* 
form, the service ; and. also whatever is necessary, 
on account of the disadvantages attending the ser- 
vice, and on account of the chance which may be 
given up of the advantages that might be expected 
from other services. 

At the first establishment of an office, it may be 
difficult accurately to determine what ought to be 
the amount of its emoluments: in this, as is the 
case with every commodity when carried to market 
for the first time, we can only be guided by chance. 
' 11. 



164 B. II. ch. IV.— minimize emolument. 

The number and character of the candidates will, 
however, soon determine whether the amount 
offered is too large or too small. 

According to this rule, the salaries paid to the 
judges in England, which appear so considerable, 
are scarcely enough ; since, as we have already 
seen, they are not sufficient to induce those, who 
are best qualified to discharge the duty, to under- 
take the office. 

In France, before the revolution, scarcely any 
salaries were paid to the judges; they were not 
drafted from the class of advocates, and no sacrifice 
was required of them when they enterpd upon 
their duties; it was not necessary that they should 
be possessed of much experience, and their reward 
consisted principally in the honour and respect 
attached to their station. In England, the nuinber 
of judges is so small, that there is tio place for 
ciphers: it is necessary that each judee should 
p^ess, from the fi,.t diy he enters updn'his office, 
that skill which, in the present state of immen- 
sity and obscurity in which the law i^ found, can 
only be the fruit of; long study. Id France, 
among the enormous multitude of her judges, 
there was always a sufficient number endowed 
with the requisite skill; and the novice might, so 
long as he chose, preserve a Pythagorean silence. 

A method of ascertaining the proper amount of 
emoluments for any Office, simple as it is effica- 
cious, is afforded by allowing the persons em- 
ployed to discharge their duty by deputy; if no 
one employs a deputy, the emoluments cannot be 
much too great ; if many individuals employ de- 
puties, it will be only necessary to observe what 
is paid to the deputies : the salary of the deputy 
is the proper salary for the place. 



B. A. Cu. IV.^MINIMIZE EMOLUMENT. 165 

If this rule be applied to the emoluments of the 
clergy, and it be asked what is the proper price 
for their services, the answer is not difficult. 
It is, primd facie, the price given by one class 
of the clergy, and received by the other ; it is the 
current price of curacies. I say always primd 
facie, for, in reality, the current price is somewhat 
greater; part of the price being made up in hope. 
For insuring the due performance of all the duties 
of their office, this price is found to be sufficient. 
The possession of any greater emolument is not 
only useless but pernicious, inasmuch as it enables 
them to engage in occupations incompatible with 
the due performance of their function, and as it 
tends to give them a*distaste for the duties of that 
function. 

The inequality observable in the emoluments 
of the established clergy, is also disadvantageous 
in respect to the greater number of ecclesiastics. 
The comparison which they make between their 
condition, and that of the rich incumbents, dimi- 
nishes still further, in their eyes, the value of 
what they receive. A reward so unequal for equal 
services, degrades those who receive only their 
proper portion. The whole presents the ap- 
pearance of a lottery, of favour and injustice, 
ill according with the moral character of their 
vocation. 

It is a good rule of economy to employ only real 
labourers, who do not think themselves superior 
to the work they have to perform. Dutch florists 
ought not to be employed in the cultivation of 
potatoes. 

It is well also fully to employ the time of the 
individuals employed. The duties of many public 
offices require only three or four hours attendance 



166 



B.II. Ch. IV^MINIMJUZB EMOLUMENT. 



daily. After the office hours are passed, such in- 
dividuals seldom are able profitably to employ 
their time. The leisure they possess increases 
their wants. Ennui, the scourge of life, is no 
less the enemy of economy. It is among this 
class, that those who are most discontented with 
their salaries, are generally found. 



[ 167 ] 



CHAPTER V. 

NO MORE NOMINAL THAN R£AL. 

Rule IV. — ^The nominal and real amount of sa- 
laries ought to correspond. 

In other words, no deduction ought to be made 
from the real value of a salary without reducing its 
nominal amount. The practice which has fre* 
quently been adopted in England of reducing the 
real value of salaries and pensions by taxes and 
other deductions, while the nominal amount of the 
salaries has remained unaltered, has given rise to 
this rule. In some instances, the deductions thus 
made have amounted to one third of the nominal 
salary. 

No advantage arises from this arrangement, but 
its inconveniences are numerous. In the first 
place, it is an evil in so far as it spreads an exagger- 
ated idea of the sacrifices made by the public, and 
the expense incurred. under the head of salaries. 
With respect to the public functionaries, it is an 
evil to possess an income greater in appearance 
than reality. The erroneous conceptions hence 
entertained of their wealth, imposes upon them, in 
deference to public opinion, the necessity of keep- 
ing up a corresponding establishment. Under the 
penalty of being considered niggardly, they are 
compelled to be extravagant. It is true the public 
are aware, in general, that salaries and pensions are 
subject to deductions, but they are oftentimes only 
acquainted with a part of the deductions, and they 
seldom in such cases enter into minute calcula- 
tions. 



168 B. II. Ch. v.— NO MORS NOMINAL THAN REAL. 

In this manner the difference between the no- 
minal and real value of a salary, tends to produce 
an increase in the wants of the individual employed. 
Call the amount of his salary 'what it really is, and 
he will be at ease, but every nominal addition will 
prove a costly ornament. If the opportunity of 
illicit profit is presented to him, such nominal ad- 
dition will be an incentive to corruption, and 
should he not be dishonest it will prove a cause of 
distress.* 

The remedy is simple as efficacious ; the change 
need only be in words. 

* A further inconvenience frequently arises from the expense 
of collecting and managing all such peculiar contributions. 



[ 169 ] 



CHAPTER VL 

COUPLE BURTHEN WITH BENEFIT. 

RuleY. — The expenses of an office ought to be 
defrayed by those who enjoy the benefit of the 
services rendered by the office. 

The author of the Wealth of Nations, in inves- 
tigating* the manner in which the expense of ser- \ 
vices ought to be divided, has shewn that in some 
cases it ought to be defrayed by the public, in 
others, exclusively by those who immediately reap 
the benefit of the service. He has also shewn , 
that there is a class of mixed cases in which the ex- \ 
pense ought to be defrayed partly by the public, and 
partly by the individuals who derive the immediate 
benefit. To this class belongs public education. 

The rule just laid down seems scarcely to stand 
in need of proof. It may, however, be useful to 
mention the modes in which it may be violated ; 
as, when for a service rendered to one person or set 
of persons, the obligation of payment is imposed 
upon another. This is partly the case of dissenters 
who support their own clergy, in so far as they are 
obliged to pay for the support of the clergy of that 
established sect from which they dissent. 2. When 
for a service rendered to a certain number of indi- 
viduals, the obligation of payment is imposed upon 
the public. For example, the expenses of a 
theatre, wholly or in part paid out of the public 
purse. 3. When for a service rendered to the 

* Book V. 



170 B. II. ch. VI.— couple burthen with benefit. 

t 

public, the obligation of payment is imposed upon 
an individual. 

With respect to this third case, the examples are 
but too abundant. 

I. The most remarkable example will be found 
in the administration of justice. At first sight it 
may be thought that he who obtains a verdict in 
his fevour reaps the principal, or even the only 
advantage to be obtained ; and therefore that it is 
reasonable he should bear the expense incurred ; 
that he should pay the officers of justice for the 
time they have been employed. It is in this man- 
ner that the subject appeared even to Adam Smith. 
(B. V. sec. 2.) Upon a closer examination, we shall 
discover an important error. The individual in 
whosefavour a verdict is given, is precisely the indi*- 
vidual who has received least benefit : setting aside 
the rewards paid to the officers of justice, how many 
other expenses, which the nature of things render 
inevitable, remain. It is he who, at the price of his 
time, his care and his money, has purchased that 
protection which others receive for nothing. 

Suppose that among a million persons there has 
been, for example, a thousand law-suits in a year ; 
without these law-suits, without the judgments 
which terminate them, injustice would have«had 
nothing to hold it in check, but the defensive 
energy of individuals. A million acts of injustice 
would have been perpetrated in the same time. 
But since, by means of these thousand judgments, 
a million acts of injustice have been prevented, it 
is the same thing as if each complainant had him- 
self prevented a thousand. Because he has ren- 
dered so important a service, because he has ex- 
posed himself to so many mishaps, to so much 
trouble and expense, does he deserve to be taxed ? 



B. II. ch. VI.— cx)uple burthen with benefit. 171 

It is as though the militia who defend the fron- 
tiers should be selected to bear the expenses of the 
campaign. 

'* Who goeth a warfare any time at his own 
charges ?'^ saith St. Paul. It is the poor litigant 
who makes war upon injustice, who pursues it 
before the tribunals at his own risk, and who is 
made to pay for the service which is rendered to 
him. 

When such expenses are thrown upon a defen- 
dant, unjustly dragged into the litigious contention, 
the case is yet worse ; instead of any thing having 
been done for his advantage, he has b^en tormented, 
and he is made to pay for having been tormented. 

Ifthe expenses are altc^ther thrown upon the 
party who is found to have done wrong, (although it 
often happens, owing to the uncertainty either of 
the facts or of the law, that there has been no wil- 
ful wrong on either side,) this cannot be done at 
first ; this party can only be known at the termina- 
tion of the suit. But then such a judgment would 
be a punishment ; and there is a chance that 
such a punishment may not be deserved ; another 
chance, that the individual may not be in a condi- 
tion to support it ; another chance, that it will be 
either too great or too little.* 

II. As another violation of this rule, may be 
cited the practice of taking fees, as carried on in 
most custom-houses, and which con3tituted agreat 
abuse in those of England, previously to the re- ^ 

* There are many other objections to taxea up(m law pro- 
ceedings, but they do not belong to the present subject. Un- 
der the head of procedure, it might be shewn that these taxes 
oppose the ends of justice : under the head of finance, that 
they constitute a bad source of revenue. The subject has been 
more fully discussed in Mr. Bentham's *^ Protest against Law 
Taxes:* 



172 B. II. Ch. VI.-COUPLE BURTHEN WITH BENEFIT. 

form introduced by Mr. Pitt. Many of the offi- 
cers, not receiving salaries sufficient for their main- 
tenance, were allowed to make up the deficiency 
by fees received for their own- advantage. This 
custom had an appearance of reason. ^' We pass 
your merchandise through the custom-house/^ they 
might have said ; " and you ought to pay for this 
service.^' But this reason is deceptive. "Without 
this custom-house/^ the merchants might have re- 
plied, " our merchandize would have gone straight 
forward ; it is not for our advantage that this costly 
depot is established. It is for the general wants of 
the state. The state therefore, which you serve, 
ought to pay you, and not us, whom you torment 
with your services, which we should be very 
happy to do without.^' But, it may be said, this 
expense must be borne by somebody, why should 
it not be borne by these merchants as well as any 
body else? Because it is a partial and unequal 
tax. Taxes upon merchandize are generally in 
proportion to the value of the goods ; this abusive 
tax seldom is so. A rich merchant does not feel 
it; he is reimbursed by the sale of his goods. A 
poor individual is oppressed by this second contri- 
bution, which he finds it necessary to pay to the 
clerk after he has paid what is due to the exche- 
quer; and it with reason appears to him the more 
odious, because it is oftentimes arbitrary. 

III. In conclusion, as a last example of the 
violation of this rule, we mention the emoluments 
of the clergy, in so far as they consist of tithes. If 
theservices of the clergy contribute to the main- 
tenance of public morality, and obedience to the 
laws, even those to whom these services are not 
personally directed are benefited by them ; they 
are useful to the whole state. Their expense, what- 
ever ought to be its amount, ought to be borne by 



B.II. Ch. VI.— COUPLE BURTHEN WITH BENEFIT. 173 

the whole community. Distributed as this expense 
is at present, under the system of tithes, in such man- 
ner that every one knows how much and to whom 
he pays it, no advantage is derived from this know- 
ledge; whilst the inconveniences are but too mani- 
fest in that hatred which so frequently subsists be- 
tween the parishioners and their minister, the shep- 
herd and bis flock ; by means of which his labours, 
so long as this enmity subsists, are rendered worse 
than useless. Were this expense to be defrayed 
from the general source of the public treasure, 
these scandalous dissensions would be avoided) and 
whether the revenues were more or less ample, it 
would be possible to preserve a more just propor- 
tion between them and the different d^rees of 
labour; instead of floating as at present between 
.£30. and ^20,000. per annum, under the directioa 
chance.* 



* Tithes considered as a tax are attended with other incon- 
veniences : they belong not to our present subject. They have 
been exposed by Adam Smithy with that force and precision 
which characterise that great master. 



[ 174 ] 



CHAPTER VII. 

BY EMOLUMENTS EXCLUDE CORRUPTION. 

■ Rule F.— In employments which expose the 
public functionary to peculiar temptations, the 
emoluments ought to be sufficient to preserve him 
from corruption. 

Setting aside all considerations of the happiness 
of the individual, the interest of the public ve^ 
quires that in all employments which afford the 
means of illicit gain, the individuals employed 
should be placed above want. If this important 
consideration be neglected, we ought not to be sur«* 
prised that men urged on by perpetually recurring 
wants should abuse the powers they possess. Under 
such circumstances, if they are found guilty of 
extortion and peculation, they are less deserving of 
blame than that government which has spread the 
snare into which it was scarcely possible that 
their probity should not fall. Placed between the 
necessity of providing the means of subsistence, 
and the impossibility of providing them honestly, 
they will naturally be led to regard peculation and 
extortion as a lawful supplement, tacitly autho- 
rized by the government. The examples of this 
mischievous economy, and of the inconveniences 
resulting from it, are more frequent in Russia than 
under any other European government. 

" M. de Launay (Farmer-General under Fre- 
derick II.) represented to the king that the sala- 
ries of the custom-house officers were too small 
for their subsistence, and that it would be but 
justice to augment them ; he added that he 



B.II. Cii.VIL—BV£MOLUM£NTS EXCLUDE CORRUPTION. 175 

could insure to his majesty that every one would 
then discharge his d uty bqtter, and that the aggregate 
receipts in all the offices would be larger at the 
end of the year/' — " You do not know my sub- 
jects/' said Frederick, " they are all rogues where 
my interests are in question. I have thoroughly 
studied them, and I am sure they would rob 
me at the altar. By paying them better you 
would diminish my revenues, and they would not 
rob me less/' — ^' Sire," replied M. de Launay, 
" how can they do otherwise than steal ? Their 
salaries are not enough to buy them shoes and 
stockings ! a pair of boots costs them a month's 
pay ! at the same time, many of them are married*. 
And where can they obtain food for their wives 
and families, if it is not by conniving at the smug- 
glers ? There is, sire, a most important maxim 
which, in matters of government, is too frequently 
neglected. It is that men in general desire to be 
honest; but it is always necessary to leave them 
the ability of being so. If your majesty will con- 
sent to make the trial I propose, 1 will engage that 
your revenues will be augmented more than a 
fourth." The maxim in morals, thus brought for- 
ward by M. de Launay, appeared to the king, beau- 
tiful and just, as it really is in itself — so much the 
more excellent from being in the mouth of a finan- 
cier ; since men of this class are not in general 
reputed to know many such. He authorized the 
experiment, he increased the salaries of the officers 
by a half, and his revenues were increased a third 
without any new taxes.* 

A salary proportionate to the wants of the func- 
tionary operates as a kind of moral antiseptic, or 
preservative. It fortifies a man's probity against 

* Thiebault. Mes Souvenirs de Berlin. Tome iv. p. 126. 



176 B.n. CH.vii^By emoluments exclude corruptiom. 

the influence of sinister and seductive motives: 
The fear of losing it will, in general, be more than 
equivalent to the ordinary temptations held out 
by illicit gains. 

But in the estimation of a man^s wants, it is not 
merely to what is absolutely necessary that our 
calculation ought to be confined. Fabricius and 
Cincinnatus are not the proper standards to be 
selected. The actual state of society ought to be 
considered. The average measure of probity must 
be our rule. Public opinion assigns to every 
public functionary a certain relative rank ; and, 
whether reasonably or not, expects from him an 
expenditure nearly equal to that of persons in a 
similar rank. If he is compelled to act in defiance 
of public opinion, he degrades and exposes himself 
to contempt — a punishment so much the more 
afflictive, in proportion as his rank is elevated. 
Wants keep pace with dignity. Destitute of the 
lawful means of supporting his rank, his dignity 
presents a motive for malversation, and his power 
furnishes the means. History abounds with crimes, 
the result of this ill-judged policy. 

If a justification is required for the extraordi- 
narily high salaries, which it is customary to pay to 
the supreme magistrates, who are called Kings^ it 
will be found in the principles above laid down. 
The Americans, by denominating their chief ma- 
gistrate a President^ have thereby made a small 
salary, compared with what is paid in England to 
the sovereign, answer every purpose of a large 
one. Why ? Because the dignity of the presi- 
dent is compared with that of the other oflScers of 
the republic, whilst in Europe the dignity of the 
sovereign is measured by a sort of comparison 
with that of other kings. If he were unable to 
maintain a certain pomp amidst the opulence of 



11. Ch. VI!.— by emoluments EXCLUDE CORRUPTION. 177 

his courtiers, be would feel himself degraded.' 
Charles II., to relieve himself from the restrictions 
imposed upon him by the economy of parliament, 
sold himself to a foreign potentate, who offered to 
supply bis profusion. The hope of escaping from 
the embarrassments into which he had plunged 
himself, drove him, like an insolvent individual, 
to criminal resources. This mistaken economy 
occasioned the expense of two successive wars, 
terminating in a peace more disastrous perhaps 
than either of the wars. Our strength was wasted 
in oppressing a necessary ally, instead of being 
employed in checking the ambition of a rival, with 
whom we had afterwards to contend, with dimi- 
nished resources. Thus the establishment of the 
Civil List, though its amount may appear large, 
may be considered as a measure of general security. 
It is true that the sum necessary to prevent 
Charles II. from selling himself, or, in other words, 
the amount which in this instance would have 
operated as a moral antiseptic, or preservative, 
could not have been very accurately calculated. 
A greater or less portion of this antiseptic must 
be employed in proportion as there exists a greater 
or less proclivity towards corruption. Experience 
18 th.e touchstone of all calculations in this respect. 
Provided these abuses are guarded against, a low 
scale of salaries can never be an evil; it must 
be a good. If the salary be not a sufficient re- 
ward for the service to be performed, the office 
will not be accepted. If it be sufficient, everything 
which is added to its amount is so much lavished 
in pure waste. 



12 



f 178 ] 



CHAPTER VIII. 

GIVE PENSIONS OF KETREAT. 

I 

RuleYll. — Pensions of retreat ought to be pro- 
vided, especially when the emoluments allowed 
are not more than sufficient to meet the absolute 
wants of the functionary.* 

Pensions of retreat are recommended by consi^ 
derations of humanity, justice, and good economy; 
they moreover tend to insure the proper discharge 
of duty, and constitute a source of responsibility 
on the part of the individuals employed. 

1. There are many cases in which it is not de- 
sirable that a. public functionary should continue 
to be employed after his activity aud capacity have 
become impaired. But, since the infirmities of 
age tend to increase bis wants, this is not the tinbe 
in which he will be able to retrench his expendi- 
ture; and he will be induced by this Consideration, 
in his old age and impotency, to continue Jto en- 
deavour to perform, with pain, «nd even with dis- 
grace, the duties of a station which, in hid matu- 
rity, he had filled with pleasure and reputation. 
To wait till he voluntarily resigils, is to expect a 
species of suicide ; to dismiss him without a pen- 
sion of retreat is, in the supposed state of his 
feculties, a species of homicide; A pension of 

* The reader ought to be apprised that, having found in 
Mr. Bentham*s MSS. upon this subject, only the memorandum 
" Pensions of Retreat,'* I have confined myself to the most 
simple exposition of the subject : its details would have been 
too widely extended. — Note by Dumont. 



B.II. Cm. VI1L-.G1VE PENSIONS OF RETREAT. 179 

retreat removes all these difficulties: it i:fr a debt 
of humanity paid by thq public to its servants. 

2. By means of. these pensions, the scale of all 
salaries m^y. be lower than otherwise, without 
producing any ill eifiect upou the quality of the 
servioes rendered. They wiH constitute an item 
in the /Calculation v^hicb ev^ry individual makes : 
tn the mean time, gof?ernment will obtain from all, 
^t a low prtc^r servic?^, ! the ulterior compensation 
for«whichi op ac(Coqnt of tbe'cs^sualties of human 
life, wilil>pn)}^be(reGet vied by a few. - it is a lottery, 
in whif^htbfareiarje no blanks. .: »r. . 

oi S. In T?bW employaifints frOih w,liicb the indivi* 
duals / ar^ mfff¥>y^l^ at; pleasiire, : th^ pension of 
retreat), iq opnsecjiu^noe ; of the > approach, of the 
period at which it will become necessary or due, 
will add an increasing value to the salary, and 
augment the responsibility of the individual em- 
ployed. Should he be tempted to malversation, 
it will be necessary that the profit derivable from 
his malversation should compensate with certainty 
not only for the loss of his annual salary, but also 
the value of his future pension of retreat ; his fide- 
lity is thus secured to the last moment of his con- 
tinuing in office. 

4. We ought not to forget the happiness, insured 
to the persons employed, resulting from the security 
given to them by the provision thus made against 
that period of life, which is most menaced with 
weakness and neglect. Hence an habitual dispo- 
sition to perform the duties of their Office with 
alacrity will arise ; they will consider themselves 
as permanently provided for, and fixed in a situa- 
tion in which all their faculties may be applied to 
the discharge of its duties, without being turned 
aside by vague apprehensions of future distress, 
and the desire of improving their condrtion, which 

12. 



180 a II. ch. VIII.— give pensions of retreat. 

80 often leads individuals successively to try diffe-* 
rent stations. Another advantage to the govern^ 
ment ; instead of being badly served by novices, 
it will possess a body of experienced functionaries, 
expert and worthy of its confidence. 

The amount of these pensions ought to be 
regulated by fixed rules, otherwise they will 
become a source of abuse ; offices will be bestowed 
for the sake of the pension, instead of the pension 
being bestowed for the sake of the office. They 
ought also to increase according to the length of 
service, leaving at all times an inducement to con- 
tinued exertion, without which precaution the 
services of experienced individuals, which it might 
be desirable to retain, would frequently be lost. 



[ 181 ] 



CHAPTER JX. 

OF THE SALE OF OFFICES. 

If it be desirable that the public servants should 
be contented with small salaries, it is more desi- 
rable that they should be willing to serve gra- 
tuitous^ly, and most desirable that they should be 
wiUrng to pay for the liberty of serving, instead of 
being paid for their services. Such is the simple 
but conclusive train of argument, in favour of the 
venality of offices, abstractly considered. 

Such an arrangement is attended with another 
advantage. A sum laid out in the purchase of an 
office renders the purchaser responsible in a higher 
degree than he would be were he to receive a 
salary equal to, or even exceeding in amount, the 
interest of the money he has paid. The loss of 
a salary paid by the public, is. merely the cessation 
of so much gain; the loss of an omce which has 
been purchased, is the positive loss of so much 
capital which the individual has actually pos- 
sessed. The impression produced upon the mind 
bv these two species of loss is widely different. 
The cessation of a gain is generally much less 
severely felt than a loss to a corresponding amount. 
The gain which depends upon external circum- 
stances is always precarious, it cannot be reckoned 
upon with certainty ; on the other hand, if an 
individual have purchased an office with his own 
capital, he looks upon it as absolutely his own ; 
it comes to be regarded as a certain, fixed, and 



'.-...jAL* 



182 B.II. CH.IX.— OF THE SALE OF OFHCES. 

permanent source of revenue, and as identified 
with his original property upon which he has 
always reckoned. 

When a man purchases an office, it may be 
fairly presumed that hei possesses appropriate apti- 
tude for the discharge of its duties. Are there 
pecuniary emoluments attached to an .office — the 
office may be accepted for the sake of these emo- 
luments. Are there no pecuniary emoluments — 
the office can be desired only on account of its 
duties, or of the natural rewards of honour and 
pbwer, which are inseparable from it. Such, at 
least, is the ordinary state of things. It is how- 
eter possible that such an office might be desired 
as a means of obtaining soine hidden profit preju- 
dicial to the public ; but this would be a particuf 
lar case, whose existence ought to be established 
by proof.' 

It is not by names alone that we can determine 
whether it? is most advantageous for th^ public 
that offices should, without emoluments, be given 
away, or when with emoluments should be sold : 
this question can only be determined by an accu- 
rate account^ exhibiting the balance of the sums 
paid and t received. If, however, there: be any 
offices without emoluments, for which purchiusers 
can be found; were it possible to sell jiurely 
honorary appointments, offices connected with 
public pomp and show, it would be entirely con- 
sistent with good economy ; it would be to 
convert a tax upon honour, unfelt by any one, but 
established in favour of the purchasers, into hard 
cash. A tax would thus be levied upon vanity* 
The gain would be real, though the bargain, like 
that of the Lapland sorcerers, were only for bags 
of wind. 



B. II. Ch. IX.-^P THfi SALE OP OFFICES. 183 

As it respects offices of which the emoluments 
are fixed, the question of economy is simple; the 
amount of the emoluments does not differ frotn a 
perpetual rent. But when an office is sold, the 
profits of which, whether received from the public, 
or levied upon individuals, are uncertain in 
amount, this uncertainty causes a presumption 
against the economy of the bargain: it is disad- 
vantageous to the public to be subject to uncer- 
tain expenses, and it is not probable that these 
uncertain profits will sell for so large a price as 
would willingly be paid for a salary equal to their 
average amount. 

Again, as to emoluments derived solely from indi- 
viduals, these are a species of tax often created and 
alienated at the same time in favour of the office. 
The general presumption cannot but be unfavour- 
able to taxes imposed under such circumstances. 
In former times, when the science of political 
economy was in its cradle, when taxes and the 
methods of collecting them were little understood, 
governments have frequently thus alienated large 
branches of the public revenue. Tempted by an 
immediate supply, they either did not or would 
not regard the extent of the sacrifices they made. 
The history of French finance is replete with 
instances of this kind. The customs of Orleans, 
which were originally purchased by a Duke of 
Orleans for 60,000 francs^ afterwards yielded to 
his posterity a yearly revenue of more than a 
1, 000,000 /ranc5. 

The venality of offices in that kingdom had 
created an exceedingly complex, iand consequently 
exceedingly vicious system. The sale of offices 
conferring hereditary nobility was especially mis- 
chievous, since this nobility enjoyed a multitude 
of exemptions. The nobles paid no taxes. Hence 



184 B. u. ch. IX.— of the sale of offices. 

every creation of nobility wasatax, equal in value 
to the exemption granted, thrown upon those who 
continued liable to pay them. 

Should the price for which an office is sold form 
a part of the emoluments of the head of the office, 
and not be received by the public, this would 
make -no difference in the question of economy 
as respects giving and selling. That the produce 
of the sale is afterwards wasted, is an accident 
unconnected with the sale. The emoluments re- 
ceived by the head of the department may be too 
large or not. If not too large, the public gains by 
the operation ; since, in suppressing the sale, it 
ivould be necessary to increase his emoluments 
by other means. If too large, the excess might 
be made applicable to the public service. 

THE SALE OF OFFICES CONSIDERED WITH RE- 
SPECT TO PARTICULAR DEPARTMENTS, 

Public opinion is at present adverse to the sale 
of public offices. It more particularly condemns 
their sale in the three great departments of war, 
law, and religion. This prejudice has probably 
arisen from the improper use to which it has 
sometimes been applied ; but whether this be the 
case or not, the use of the word venal seldom, if 
ever, but in an odious and dysolgystic sense, has 
tended to preserve it. 

" He who has bought th^ right of judging will 
sell judgments,^^ is the sort of reasoning in use 
upon this subject. Instead of an argument, it is 
only an epigram.* The members of the French 

« 

* Vendere jure potest^ emerat ille prius. Apply the reason- 
ing to another subject : '' He who has bought apples^ will sell 
apples." The consequence does not follow 3 for he may chance 
to eat or to give them away. 



EAh Cm.IX.-^P the sale OF OFFICES. 186 

parliaments were judges, and they purchased their 
places ; it did not by any means follow that they 
wefe disposed to sell their judgments, or that^ they 
could have done so with impunity. The greater 
number of these parliaments were never even 
suspected of having sold them. Countries may 
however be cited in which the judges sell both 
justice and injustice, thbugh they have not bought 
their places. The uprightness of a judge does 
not depend upon these but upon other circum- 
stances. If the laws be intelligible and known ; 
if the proceedings of the judges are public ; if the 
punishment for injustice surpass the profit to be 
reaped from it, judges will be upright, even though 
they purchase their ojffices. 

In £ngland, there are certain judicial offices 
which the judges sell, sometimes openly, some- 
times clandestinely; the purchasers of these 
offices extract from the suitors as much as they 
can : if they had not purchased their places, they 
would not have endeavoured to extract less. The 
mischief is, not that this right of plundering is 
sold, but that the right exists. 

In the English army^ the system of venality^ 
has been adopted. Military commissions, from 
the rank of ensign to that of lieutenant-colonel, 
are sold, with permission to the purchasers to 
re-sell them. The epigram upon the judges is 
not applied here. The complaint is, that the 
patrimony of merit is invaded by wealth. But it 
ought to be recollected, that in this career the 
opportunities for the display of merit do not occur 
everyday. It is only upon extraordinary occa- 
sions that extraordinary talents can be displayed ; 
and when these occur, there can be no difficulty, 
even under this system, of bestowing proportionate 
and appropriate rewards. Besides, though the 



186 B. U. C^.lXL-^P THE SAIiE OF Of PIC£& 

patrimony of merit should by diis meetns : be in^ 
▼Bded' by wealth, it would at the same, time: be 
defended from favouritism, a divinity in less esteem 
even than wealth. The circumstance which 
ought to recommend the system of venalty to 
suspicious politicians is, that it diminishes the 
influence of the crown. The whole circle over 
which it extends is so much reclaimed from, the 
influence of the crown. It may be called a cor- 
ruption, but it serves as an antidote to a corruption 
more to be dreaded. 

It is the sale of ecclesiastical offices which has 
occasioned the greatest outcry. It has been made 
a particular sin, to which has ; been given the 
name of Simony. In the Acts of the Apostles, 
we ape informed that at Samaria, there, was a 
magician named Simon, to whose gainful prac- 
tices an immediate stop Was put by the preach- 
ing^d miracles of Philip; one of the deacons of 
thechurch of Jerusalem, who bad been driven to 
Samaria by persecution. Simon therefore, regard- 
ing Philip as a more fortunate rival, enrolled him- 
self among the number of his proselytes, and when 
the apostles Peter aaid John came down from Jeru- 
salem, and by the laying on of their hands commu- 
Qioated to the disciples the gift of the Holy Ghost, 
Sitnon, desirous of possessing something more 
tijan the rest, offered to them money, saying, " give 
me tilso this power, that on whomsoever I lay hands, 
be may receive the Holy Ghost/^ Upon which 
Peter severely repririianded him, and the magician, 
supple as he was intriguing, asked forgiveness, and 
thus his history closes. It is nowhere said he was 
punished. 

Upon the strength of this story, the Roman 
Catholic church has converted the act of buying 
or selling ecclesiastical benefices into a sin ; and 



Bi it/cii; lit.— cftp iTHiE sALfr"OP oyriBES. 1 87 

' ■ * 

the tewglish law, copying from the G^tholicchurciK, 
has constituted such art act & crime. As the Romah 
Catholic church, among catholics, is infallible, a^ 
to them it must have decided rightly when it 
declared such acts to be sinful. Our subject, "how- 
ever, leads us only to the consideration of the 
legal crime ; and between this crime and the of- 
fence of Simon Magus, there is nothing in com- 
mon. Presentation to a living and the reception 
of the Holy Ghost are not the same things. If it 
be the object of this law to exclude improper 
persons, more direct, simple, and efficacious means 
might be employed ; their qualifications might be 
ascertained by public examinations, their good 
conduct by the previous publication of their names, 
with liberty to all the world to object against them. 
Their moral and intellectual capacity being thus 
proved, why should they not be allowed to pur- 
chase the employment, or to discharge it gratui- 
tously ? An idiot, once admitted to priests' orders, 
may hold an ecclesiastical benefice, but were a 
man, gifted like an apostle, to give five guineas 
to be permitted to discharge the duties of that 
benefice, he would be borne down by the outcry 
against the simony he had committed. 

What then is the effect of these anti-simoniacal 
laws ? A priest may not purchase a benefice for 
himself; but his friend, whether priest or layman, 
may purchase it for him. He may not purchase 
the presentation to a vacant benefice, but he may 
purchase the right of presentation to a benefice 
filled by a dying man, or by a person in good 
health who will have the complaisance to resign, 
and receive it again with an obligation, again to 
resign whenever his patron requires it. In reading 
these self-styled anti-simoniacal laws, it is difficult 



188 B.II. CH*IX.f-OF THE SALE OF OFFICES. 

to discover, whether they are intended to prohibit 
or to allow the practice of simony. Their only 
real effects are to encourage deception and fraud. 
Blackstone complains of their inexecution. He 
did not perceive that a law which is not executed 
is ridiculous. 



t t«9 ] 



CHAPTER X. 



OF QUALIFICATIONS, 



We have already seen that a salary may be etn^ 
|)loyed as a means of insuring the responsibility of 
Bn individual, and as a moral antiseptic to preserve 
him from the influence of corruption. By the sale 
of offices, it has been seen that the actual expense 
of a salary may be diminished, and even reduced to 
nothing. It is therefore evident that the important 
circumstance is, that the individual should possess 
the requisite portion of the precious matter of te* 
ward, and not that it should have. been given t^ 
him. If he possess it of his own, so mucB WB 
better ; and the more he already possesses the lew 
is it necessary to give him. In England, such ale 
the attractions of power and dignity, that the num-^ 
ber of candidates for their possession has been 
found so large, that it has been thought desirable 
to limit the selection to the number of those who 
possess the required quantity of this moral antisep* 
tic ; and this circumstance has given birth to what 
have been called qtuilifications. 

The most remarkable and important offices to 
which these pecuniary qualifications have been at- 
tached, are those of justices of the peace and mem- 
bers of parliament. A justice of the peace ought 
to possess at least 100/. per annum landed property* 
There is no reasonable objection' against this law. 
The office is one of those for which an ordinarily 
liberal education is sufficient. It is at the same 
time such an office that the individual invested 



190 B. II. Ch. X.— of aUAUFICATIONS. 

with it might do much mischief were he not re- 
strained by powerful motives. 

As a qualification for the more important office 
of member of parliament, the law requires of the 
member for a borough or city a similar qualifica- 
tion of 300/. per annum, and of the member for a 
county of 600/. per annum. This case differs 
widely from the other. Sufficient talent for carry- 
ing the laws into execution is possessed by a mul- 
titude of individuals ; but few are able to deter- 
mine what laws ought to be framed. The science 
of legislation is still in its cradle ; it has scarcely 
been begun to be formed in the cabinets of philo- 
sophers ; among legislators in name, scarcely any 
other practice can be found than that of children, 
who in their prattle copy what they have learned 
of their nurses. That a science may be learned, a 
motive is necessary ; that the science of le'gisla- 
tion may be learned, or rather may be created, 
motives so much the more powerful are necessary, 
as this science is most repulsive and thorny. For 
the pursuit of this study, an ardent and persevering 
mind is required, which can scarcely be expected 
to be formed in the lap of ease, of luxury, and of 
wealth. Among those whose wants have been 
forestalled from their cradle, amohg thbse who 
become legislators to gratify their vanity, or relieve 
their ennui, there can scarcely be found one who 
could be called a legislator without mockery. How 
shall he who possesses everything without the 
trouble of thinking, be led to subject himself to 
the labour of thought ? If it be desirable that le- 
gislators should he men of enlarged arid well-in- 
structed minds, they must be sought among those 
who possess but little wealth, among those who, 
oppressed with their insignificance, are stimulated 



B. JI. Ch. X,--0F QUAUFlCATlpNS. l&l 

by ambition, and even by hunger, to distinguish 
themselves; they must.be sought among those 
who possess the habits of Cyrus anc] not of Sardar 
napalus. Among the children of luxury, of vt^hom 
the great mass of senators chosen by a rich people 
will alvi^ays be composed, there are but few who 
will undergo the fatigue of studying the lesson? 
which, at the expense of so much labour, hdve be^n 
furnished them by BecQai:ia and Adam SmitbJ 
Can it be expected* then, that from among their 
number the rivals of these great masters should be 
found?. Qualifications in this case tend to ex* 
elude th.e individuals endowed with the greatest 
moral and intejlectusd capacity^ ! 

The reasons however in favour of qualifications 
are plausible. It is alleged, th^t the possession of 
a certain property tends to guarantee thie indepeni- 
dsnce of its possessor, and' that in, no other situa^ 
tion 13 independence more desirable, than in th^t 6f 
a deputy appointed to We^tch over and defend, the 
interests, or the people. against , the enciK)achmejGit8 
of jthe^Kecutive power, supplied as that power 
almost necessarily is Wiitji som^dy n)eanj» of seduc^ 
tion. To this it may be replied, that it iis not the 
poor alone who are liable to be seduced ; multi- 
tudes possessing property exceeding in value the 
qualifications required, are biassed by the seductive 
influence of places and pensions, whilst the poor 
remain unmoved. 

A law of this nature whose effect, were it strictly 
executed, would be to exclude the most capable, is 
made to be evaded, and in fact has constantly been 
evaded : among those who have acted the most 
conspicuous parts in the British House of Com- 
mons, many have been able to enter there only by 
an evasion of this law. Means might be provided 
which would afford a perfect guarantee against 



162 «.It. CH.3^.-OFSUAUFtCATlON9. 

such evasions, but happily upon this, as upotl 
many other occasions, the veil that hides from 
human weakness the distant inconveniences of bad 
laws, hides also the means necessary for rendering 
such laws efficacious. 

Some years ago, a member, the honesty of whose 
intentions could not be doubted, proposed to aug- 
ment the qualifications for cities and boroughs 
from 300/. to 600/. per annum. The proposition, 
after having made considerable progress, fell to the 
ground. I know not whether this happened from 
a conviction of its trifling utility, or from one of 
those accidents which in that slippery path equally 
befal the most useful and most mischievous 
projects. 

When the greatest possible freedom is given to 
popular suffrage, and even when no corrupt influ- 
ence is used, the popular employment of wealth, 
being of all species of merit that of which people 
in general are best qualified to judge, and most 
•disposed to esteem, there naturally exists an 
aristocracy of wealth. Is it desirable that this 
aristocracy should be rendered necessary and 
complete ? 



C 193 ] 



CHAPTER XI. 

OF TRUST AND CONTRACT MANAGEMENT. 

The capacity of the individuals to discharge the 
duties required of them having been ascertained, 
and the most intimate connection between their 
interest and the discharge of these duties having 
been established, the only desirable circumstance 
remaining is, to reduce the amount of the emolu- 
ments to be paid for the discharge of these duties 
to the lowest term. Suppose the amount expended 
in the purchase of a given service to be a certain 
sum, and that an individual equally capable of 
rendering this service, should offer to render it at 
less expense, is there any good reason for refusing 
such an offer? I can discover none. The accept- 
ance of such a proposition is the acceptance of 
a contract ; the service thus agreed to be per- 
formed, is said to be contracted for, or let to farm. 
To this method, the mode of obtaining services 
by employing commissioners and managers, is op- 
posed. 

General reasonings upon this subject are insuffi- 
cient to determine which of these two opposite 
systems will be most advantageous in any particu- 
lar department : the nature of the service must be 
ascertained before the question can be decided. 

If we confine ourselves to general principles, 
contracts must be preferred to commissions. Un- 
der the system of contracts, the interests about 
vhich the individual is employed are his own ; 
'whilst, under the system of commissions, the m^ 
terests about which he is employed remain the 

13 



194 B.II. CH.XI.— OP TRUST AND CONTRACT MANAGEMENT. 

interests of the state, that is, the interests of 
another. In the first case, the sub-functionaries 
employed are the servants of an individual, in the 
other they are the servants of the public — fellow- 
servants of those who are to watch over them. 
'^ But the servants of the most negligent master,'^ 
says Adam Smith, *^ are better superintended than 
the servants of the most vigilant sovereign/^ If 
this cannot be admitted as an infallible rule, it 
is at least more frequently true than otherwise. 

Public opinion is, however, but little favourable 
to the system of contracts. The savings which 
result to the state are forgotten, whilst the profits 
reaped by the farmers are recollected and exagge- 
rated. Upon this subjcict the ignorant and the 
philosopher, those who judge without thought, and 
those who pretend to have examined the subject, 
are nearly agreed. The objections v^rhich they 
bring forward against contractors (for they relate to 
individuals rather than to the system) are suffici- 
ently specious. 

I. 2'he contractors are rich. If they are so, this 
is not the fault of the system, but of the conditions 
of the bargain made lyith them. 

II. The contractors are ostentatious and vain. 
And if they burst with vanity, what then ? Such in- 
appreciable, or rather imaginary evils, cannot be 
brought into political calculations. Their vanity 
will find a sufficient counterpoise and punish- 
ment in the vanity erf those whom they incommode, 
whilst their ostentation will distribute their wealth 
among those whom it employs. 

III. The contractors , excite envy. This is the 
fault of those who are envious, and not of the con-» 
tractors: it is another imaginary evil, in oppOdi-^ 
tion to which imay be placed the pleasure of detrac- 
tion. Besiides, if the contracts are opea to all. 



a tL Ch, 3q-»-<>P trust and eONTRACT MAN AGEMBNT. 186 

unless improvident bargains are tnade ^ through 
favour, corruption, or ignorance, rapid fortunes will 
not. GtXen be accumulated by contractors. Should 
they still become rich, it will be because they have 
deserved it, 

IV. Contraciors never ^nd the laws ioo severe t6 
insure the collection of the taxes for which they have 
contracted. They will procure severe and sanguinary 
laws to be enacted. If the laws are severe and san* 
guinary^ the legislature is in fault, and not the con-^ 
tractors. Whether the taxes are managed by con- 
tractors or commissioners, it is equally proper that 
the most efficacious system of laws, for their coU 
lection, should be established ; and certainly se- 
vere and sanguinary laws are not the most effica^ 
<!ious. Contractors, therefore, are not likely to seek 
the enactment of the most severe laws : there are 
many reasons for supposing the contrary will be 
the case* The better the law is executed, that is 
to say, the more certainly punishment follows the 
transgression of the law, the less severe need it be* 
But under the inspection of the contractor, who 
has so strong an interest in its execution, the law 
ha^ abetter chance of being put in execution, than 
when under the inspection of a commissioner Vho 
has so little, if any, interest in the matter. Upon 
this point it is impossible to imagine by what 
means two interests can be more intimately con^ 
oected, than those of the contractor and the state. 
It is the interest of the contractor that all who 
illegally evade the payment of the taxes should be 
punished: this, also, is the interest of the state. 
But it can never be the interest of the contractor 
to punish the innocent: this would tend to excite 
the whole people against him : of every species of 
injustice, this is one which is least likely to meet 
with tranquil and acquiescent spectators. 

13. 



1S6 B. II. ch. XL— of trust and contract management. 

Adafn Smith, who has sfdopted all these objec- 
tions, little calculated as they seem to me to ap- 
pear in such a work as his, also contends that 
" the best and most frugal way of levying a tax, 
can never be by farm.*^^ If this were true, it would 
be a conclusive reason against ever letting taxes to 
ferm, and it would be useless to seek for others. 
When a fact is proved, it is useless to trouble one- 
self with prejudices and probabilities. 

It is true, without the hope of gain, no contrac- 
tor would undertake to collect the produce of a 
tax, and to make the advances required. But 
from whence ought the profitof the farmer to arise ? 
This is wKat Adam Smith has not examined : he 
supposes that the state would make the same pro- 
ikf by esta|blishing an administration under their 
own inspection. The truth of this supposition is 
«ltc^ether doubtful. The personal interest of a 
minister is to have as many individuals, that is to 
say, as many dependants, employed under him as 
possible, that their salaries should be as large as 
possible; and he wjll lose nothing by their negli- 
gence. The interest of the farmer, or contractor^ is 
to have as few individuals employed under him as 
poAible, and to pay each one no more than he 
deserves; and he will lose by every instance of 
their negligence. In these circumstances, though 
no greater amount should be received from the 
people than would have been collected by the 
state, a contractor might reasonably hope to find a 
source of profit. 

Adam Smith has attacked, with as much force as 
reason, the popular prejudices against the dealers 
in corn, so odious and so much suspected under 
the name of forestallers. He has shewn that the 

* Wealth of Nations^ b. v. ch. 2. 



B. II. Ch. XI.— of trust and CONTRACT MANAGEMENT. 197 

interest of the public is most intimately connected 
with the natural, and almost necessary interests of 
this suspected ckss of merchants. He might with 
equal justice have extended his protection to far- 
mers of the public revenue, a class of men nearly 
as little beloved. 

In every branch of politics, and especially in so 
wide a field as his subject embraced, it was 
nearly impossible that he should examine every 
thing with his own eyes. It was almost of neces- 
sity that he was sometimes guided by .general opi- 
nion: this seems to me to have happened upon 
this occasion. He forgot in this instance to apply 
the principle already cited,, and of which he had^ 
elsewhere made such beautiful applications. I had 
myself once writteo an essay against farmers of 
the revenue ; I have thrown it into the fire, for 
which alone it was fit. I know not how long I 
should have retained the opinions it advocated, 
had I not been better instructed by Adam Smith. 

Note. — In Burgoyiie*s '^ Picture of Spain>** vol. ii. page 4> 
^c. it is stated^ that in that country Trust was found more, 
ecotiomical than Contract management. But he does not 
state in what manner contracts were granted : whether Ikvour 
or corruption did not preside at their disposal ; whethei^the 
trust management had not superior means of enforcing the 
payment of the taxes ; nor whether their increased produce 
was notj in part at leasts owing to the increase of trade and 
wealth. 



[ 198 ] 



CHAPTER XII. 



OF REFORMS. 



The emoluments annexed to any office being 
shown to be in excess, and the mischiefs res^ilting 
from such excess being ascertained, the next 
question which occurs is, What remedy ought to 
be applied ? . The most obvious answer is ^ short 
one: strike them off at once. But thus unquali- 
fied, this answer is far from being the proper one. 

Reform is the practical conclusion expected 
lis. the reward for all the labour bestowed on the 
examiiiatron of these theoretic propositions. Upon 
this subject) nothing further remains but to point 
Qut one limitation, without which every reform 
can only be a greater abuse than the whole of 
those which it pretends to correct. This limita- 
tion is, Ma^ no reform ought to be carried into 
iffect without granting complete indemnity to those 
whose emoluments are drni^inished^ or whose offices 
are suippressed. In a word, that the only legiti- 
mate benefit to be derived by th6 public from 
economicar reform, consists in the conversion of 
perpetual into life annuities. 

Will it be said, that the immediate suppres- 
sion of these offices would be a gain to the 
public ? This would be a mere sophism. The 
sum in question would, without doubt, be gained 
by the public, if it came from abroad, if it were 
obtained by commerce, &c. but it is not gained 
when it is taken from individuals who form a part 
of that same public. Would a family be richer, 
because the father disinherited one of his children 



B. II. Ch.SX:II«— OF REFORMS. 19d 

that he might the more richly endow the others ? 
In this iqstiance, as the disipberiting of one child 
would increase the inheritance of the others, the 
mischief would not he without aoqie countervail- 
ing advantage ; it would be productive of good to 
some part of the family. But when it relates to 
the public, the emoluments of a suppressed place 
being divided amongst the whole community, 
the gain, beifig distributed among a multitude, is 
divided into impalpable quantities; whilst the 
loss, being Confined to one, is felt in its entirety 
by him who supports it alone. The result of the 
operation is in no respect to enrich the party who 
gains, whilst it reduces the party who loses to 
poverty. • Instead of one place suppressed, 8up« 
pose a thousand, or ten thousand, or a hundred 
thousand, the total disadv%intage will remain the 
same: the plunder taken from thousands will 
have to be distributed among millions ; your 
public places will be filled with unfortunate citi* 
zens whom you will have plunged into indigence, 
whilst you will scarcely see one individual who 
is sensibly enriched in consequence of all these 
cruel operations. The groans, of sorrow and the 
cries of despair will resound on every side; the 
shouts of joy, if any such are heard, will not be 
the expressions of happiness, but of that male* 
yolence which rejoices in the agony of its 
victims. 

By what means do individuals deceive them- 
selves and others into the sanction of such mis- 
chievous acts ? It is by having recourse to cer- 
tain vague maxims, consisting of a mixture of 
truth and falsehood, and which give to a question, 
in itself simple, an appearance of deep and mys- 
terious policy. , The interest of individuals, it is 



200 



BJI. Ch.XII«-M)F reforms. 



said, must give way to the public interest. But 
what does this mean ? Is not one individual as 
much a part of the public as any other? This 
public interest, which is thus personified, is only 
an abstract term ; it only represents the aggregate 
of individual interests. They must all be taken 
into the account, instead of considering a part as 
the whole, and the rest as nothing. If it were 
proper to sacrifice the fortune of one individual to 
augment that of the others, it would be still more 
desirable to sacrifice a second ^nd a third, and so 
on to any greater number, without the possibility 
of assigning limits to the operation ; since, what- 
ever number may have been sacrificed, there still 
remains the same reason for adding one more. In 
a word, the interest of the first is sacred, or the 
interest of no one can be so. 
* " The interests of individuals are the only real 
interests. Take care of individuals, never molest 
them, never suffer them to be molested, and you 
have done enough for the public. 

^^ Amoiigthe multiplicity of human affairs, indi- 
viduals have often been injured by the operation 
of particular laws, without daring to complain, or 
without being able to obtain a hearing for their 
complaints, on account of this vague and false 
notion, that the interest; of individuals ought to 
give way to the public interest. Considered as a 
question of generosity, by whom ought this virtue 
to be displayed ? By all towards one, or by one 
towards all ? Which then is the most selfish, he 
who would preserve what he already possesses, or 
he who would seize, even by force, what belongs 
to another? 

" An evil felt, and a good unfelt, — such is the 
result of those magnificent reforms, in which the 



B. II. cb. XII.— of reforms. 201 

interests of individuals are sacrificed to those of 
the public/^* 

The principles here laid down, it ni^ay be said, 
are applicable to offices and pensions held /or lifcy 
but not to offices and pensions held during plea- 
sure ; and which consequently may be revoked at 
any time. May not these be reformed at any 
time? No: the difference between the two is 
only verbal; — in all those cases in which it has 
been customary for those places, which are granted 
during pleasure^ to be held for life, though the 
possessor may have been led to expect other causes 
of removal, he has never expected this. " My 
superior,^^ he has said to himself, " may dismiss 
me, I know ; but I flatter myself I shall never 
deserve to be dismissed ; I shall, therefore, retain 
my office for life.^^ Hence the dismission of such 
an individual, without indemnity, is as great an 
evil, as much unforeseen, and equally unjust, as 
in the former case. 

To these reasons, arising from justice and hu- 
manity, may be added a prudential consideration. 
By such indemnification, the interests of indivi- 
duals and the public are reconciled, and a better 
chance of securing the latter is obtained. Assure 
those who are interested that they shall not be in- 
jured, they will be among the foremost in facilitat- 
ing reforms. By thus removing the grand obstacle 
of contrary interests, the politician prevents those 
clandestine intrigues, and private solicitations, 
which so often arrest the progress of the noblest 
plans. 

It was thus that Leopold, the Grand Duke of 
Tuscany, proceeded: — " Notwithstanding the mul- 

* This passage is extracted from Mr. Bentham*s work^ 
Traites des Legislation, tomei. partie i. ch. 15. Ed. 1820. 



902 B.II. Ch.XIX.— OF REFORM^. 

titude 6f reforms introduced by his royal highness 
since his accession to the throne, there has not 
been a single office reformed in Tuscany, the holder 
of which has not either been placed ia some other 
office {eqtialto tha^t suppressed^ must be understood) 
or who has not received as a pension a salary equal 
in value to the emoluments of his office/^* Upon 
such conditions, the pleasure of reform is pure: 
nothing is hazairded ; good only is accomplished ; 
M least the principal object is secured, and the 
happiness of no one is interrupted. 

* ^ 

* '^^^ Indication Sommaire des Big^emens de Leopoldj Grand 
Due de Toscane/' Bruxelles, 1773. 



RATIONALE OF REWARD. 



BOOK III. 

REWARD APPLIED TO ART AND SCIENCE. 



CHAPTER I. 

ART AND SCIENCE DIVISIONS. 

A CLOUD of perplexity, raised by indistinct and 
erroneous conceptions, seems at all times to have 
been hanging over the import of the terms art and 
, science. The common supposition seems to have 
been, that in the v^hole Jield of thought ^.nd action^ 
a determinate number of existing compartments 
are assignable, marked out all round, and distin- 
guished from one another by so many sets of natu- 
ral and determinate boundary lines : that of these 
compartments some are filled, each by an ar/, 
without any mixture of science ; others, by a w- 
ence^ without any mixture of art ; and others, 
again, are so constituted that, as it has never hap- 
pened to them hitherto, so neither can it ever 
nappen to them in future, to contain in them any 
thing either of art or science. 
. This supposition will, it is believed, be found in 
every part erroneous ; as between art and science^ 
in the whole field oi thought vrnd action^ no one 



204 B. lU. Oi. I.— ART AND SCIENCE-DIVISIONS. 

spot will be found belonging to either to the ex- 
clusion of the other. In whatsoever spot a portion 
of either is found, a portion of the other may be 
also seen ; whatsoever spot is occupied by either, 
is occupied by both : is occupied by them in Joint 
tenancy. Whatsoever spot is thus occupied, is so 
much taken out of the wcLste ; and there is not any 
determinate part of the whole waste which is not 
liable to be thus occupied. 

Practice^ in proportion as attention and exertion 
are regarded as necessary to due perfomiancej^ is 
termed art. Knowledge, in proportion as attention 
and exertion are regarded as necessary to attain^ 
mentj is termed science. 

In the very nature of the case, they will be 
found so combined as to be inseparable. Man 
cannot do anything well, but in proportion as he 
knows how to do it: he cannot, in consequence 
of attention and exertion, know anything but in 
proportion as he has practised the art of learning 
it. Correspondent therefore to every art, there is 
at least one branch of science ; correspondent to 
every branch of science, there is at least one branch 
of art. There is no determinate line of distinc- 
tion between art, on the one hand, and science on 
the other ; no determinate line of distinction be- 
tween art and science, on the one hand, and unar^ 
^idal practice and unscientific knowledge, on the 
other. In proportion as that which is seen to be 
done^ is more conspicuous than that which is seen 
or supposed to be known! : that which has place is 
apt to be considered as the work of art: in pro- 
portion as that which is seen or supposed to be 
known is more conspicuous than anything else 
that is seen to be done, that which has place is 
apt to be set down to the account of science. Day 
^y day,- acting in coiy unction, art and science are 



B. ttt. Cn. I.-ARt AND SCIENCiE— DiVlSldOT. 206 

• 

gaining upon the above-mentioned wiaste — the field 
of unarti/icial practice and unscientific knowledge.^ 
Taken collectively, and considered in their con- 
nection with the happiness of society, the arts and 
sciences may be arranged in two divisions, viz. 
1. Those of amusement and curiosity ; 3. Those 
of utility, immediate and remote. These two 
branches of human knowledge require different 
methods of treatment on the part of governments. 

By arts and sciences of amusement, I mean 
those which are ordinarily called the^n^ arts; 
isuch as music, poetry, painting, sculpture, archi- 
tecture, ornamental gardening, &c. &c. Their 
complete enumeration must be excused : it would 
lead us too far from our present subject, were we 
to plunge into the metaphysical discussions neces- 
sary for its accomplishment. Amusements of all 
isorts would be comprised under this head. 

Custom has, in a manner, compelled us to make 
the distinction between the arts and sciences of 
amusement, and those of curiosity. It is not how- 
ever proper to regard the former as destitute of 
utility ; on the contrary, there is nothing, the 
utility of which is more incontestible. To what 
shall the character of utility be ascribed, if not to 
that which is a source of pleasure ? All that can 
be alleged in diminution of their utility is, that 
it is limited to the excitement of pleasure : they 
cannot disperse the clouds of grief or of misfortune. 
They are useless to those who are not pleased with 
them : they are useful only to those who take 
pleasure in them, and only in proportion as they 
are pleased. 

By arts and sciences of curiosity, I mean those 

* The foregoing paragraphs are extracted from Mr. Ben- 
tham's '^ Chrestomathia^" part i. p. 908. 



206 B.I1I. Ch. I.— ART AND SCIENGE-^DIVISIONS. 

which in truth are pleasiDgj but not in the same 
degree as the fine arts, and to which at the first 
glance we might be tempted to refuse this quality. 
It is not that these arts and sciences of curiosity do 
not yield as much pleasure to those who cultivate 
theiii as the fine arts ; but the nuoober of those 
who study them is more limited. Of this nature 
are the sciences of heraldry, of medals, of pure 
chronology, the knowledge of ancient and barba- 
rous languages, which present only collections of 
strange words, and the study of antiquities, inas^ 
much as they furnish no instruction applicable to 
morality, or ^ny other branch of useful or agreeable 
knowledge. 

The utility of all these arts and sciences, — I speak 
both of those of amusement and curiosity, — the 
value which they posses, is exactly in proportion to 
the pleasure they yield. Every other species of pre- 
eminence which may be attempted to be established 
among them is altogether fanciful. Prejudice apart, 
the game of push-pin is of equal value with the arts 
and sciences of music and poetry. If the game 
of push-pin furnish more pleasure, it is more 
valuable than either. Everybody can play at push- 
pin : poetry and music are relished only by a few. 
The game of push-pin is always innocent : it were 
well could the same be always asserted of poetry. 
Indeed, betweeti poetry and truth there is a natural 
.opposition: false morals, fictitious nature: the 
poet always stands in need of something false. 
When he pretends to lay bis foundations in truth, 
the ornaments of his supenlttructure are fictions; 
his business consists in stimulating our passions, 
and exciting our prejudices. Truth, exactitude 
of every kind, is fatal to poetry. The poet must 
see everything through coloured media, and strive 
to make every one else to do the same. It is true, 



B.JII. ch.i«^art and science— divisions. ^7 

there have been noble spirits, to whom poetry imd 
philosophy have been equally indebted, but these 
exceptions do not remove the mischiefs which 
have resulted from this magic art. If poetry and 
music deserve to bq preferred before a game of 
push-pin, it must be because they are calculated 
to gratify, those individuals who are most difficult 
to be pleased. 

All the arts and sciences, without exception^ 
inasmuch as they constitute innocent employmentfi^ 
at least of time, possess a species of moral utility, 
neither the less real or important, bec$iuse it is 
frequently unobserved. They, compete with, and 
occupy the place of those mischievous and dan* 
gerous passions and employments, to which want 
of occupation and ennui, give birth. They are 
excellent substitutes for drunkenness, slander, and 
the love of gaming.* 

The effects of idleness upon the ancient Germai» 
maybe seen in Tacitus : bis observations, are ap4 
plicable to all uncivilized nations : : for want of 
other occupations they waged war upon each other: 
it was a more animated amuseoient than that of the 
chase. The chieftain who proposed a otartial etx* 
pedition, at the first sound of bis trumpet ranged 
under his banners a crowd of idlers, to whom peace 
was a condition of restraint, of languor, and of 
ennqi. Glory could be . reaped only in one field : 
opulence kiuaw but one lu^iiury. This field was 
that of battle ; this luxury that of conquering or 
recounting, past conquests. Their women: them* 
selves, ignorant of those agreeable arts which niui* 
tiply the means of pleasing^ and p^rolong the empire 
of beauty, becamethe rivals of the naen in couxage* 

* Traites dt Legislation, tomAi.j^artie 4, (Ed. 1820.) ''Des 
moyens iadirects de prevenir les d^Iits.** 



2k)8 B. tli. U. t.~ART AND SCIENCE— DlVISIdli^d. 

and, mingling with th^m in the barbarous tumult 
of a military life, became unfeeling as they. 

It is to the cultivation of the arts and sciences 
that we must, in great measure, ascribe the exist-* 
ence of that party which is now opposed to war : 
it has received its birth amid the occupations 
and pleasures furnished by the fine arts. These 
arts, so to speak, have enrolled under their peace- 
ful banners that army of idlers which would have 
otherwise possessed no amusement but in the 
hazardous and bloody game of war. 

Such is the species of utility which belongs in- 
discriminately to all the arts and sciences. Were 
it the only reason, it would be a sufficient reason 
for desiring tp see them flourish and receive the 
most extended diffusion. 

If these principles are correct, we shall know 
how to estimate those critics, more ingenious than 
useful, who, under pretence of purifying the public 
taste, endeavour successively to deprive mankind 
of a larger or smaller part of the sources of their 
amusement. These modest judges of elegance 
and taste consider themselves as benefactors to the 
human race, whilst they are really only the inter- 
rupters of their pleasure — a sort of importunate 
hosts, who place themselves at the table to dimi- 
nish, by their.pretended delicacy, the appetite of 
their guests. It is only from custom and preju- 
dice that, in matters of taste, we speak of false and 
true. There is no taste which deserves the epithet 
good, unless it be the taste for such employments 
which, to the pleasure actually produced by them, 
conjoin some contingent or future utility : there 
is no taste which deserves to be characterized as 
bad, unless it be a taste for some occupation which 
has a mischievous tendency. 

The celebrated and ingenious Addison has dis- 



B. III. ch. I.— art and science-divisions. 209 

tinguished himself by his skill in the art of ridi- 
culing enjoyments, by attaching to them the fan- 
tastic idea of bad taste. In the Spectator he wages 
relentless war against the whole generation of 
false wits. Acrostics, conundrums, pantomimes, 
puppet-shows, 6o{^f5-rem^5, stanzas in the shape of 
eggs, of wings, burlesque poetry of every descrip- 
tion ; in a word, a thousand other light and equally 
innocent amusements fall crushed under the strikes 
of his club. And, proud of having established his 
empire above the ruins of these literary trifles, he 
regards himself as the legislator of Parnassus ! 
What, however, was the effect of his new laws ? 
They deprived those who submitted to them of 
many sources of pleasure ; they exposed those who 
were more inflexible, to the contempt of their 
companions. 

Even Hume himself, in spite of his proud and 
independent philosophy, has yielded to this literary 
prejudice. " By a single piece,^^ says he, " the 
Duke of Buckingham rendered a great service to 
his age, and was the reformer of its taste P^ In 
what consisted this important service ? He had 
written a comedy. The Rehearsal^ the object of 
which was to render those theatrical pieces, which 
had been most popular, the objects of general dis- 
taste. His satire was completely successful ; 
but what was its fruit ? The lovers of that species 
of amusement were deprived of so much pleasure; 
a multitude of authors, covered with ridicule and 
contempt, deplored, at the same time, the loss of 
their reputaion and their bread. 

As the amusement of a minister of state, it must 
be confessed, that a more suitable one might be 
found than a game at solitaire. Still, among the 
number of its amateurs was once found Potemkin^ 
one of the most active and respected Russian 

14 



210 B. III. Ch.I.— ART AND SCIENCE— DIVISIONS. 

ministers of state. I see a smile of contempt upon 
Jthe lips of many of my readers, who would not 
think it strange that any one should play at cards 
from " eve till raorn/^ provided it were in company. 
But, how incomparably superior is this solitary 
game to many social games; so often anti-social 
in their consequences! Thefirst, a pure and simple 
amusement, stripped of everything injurious, free 
from passion, avarice, loss, and regret. It is gaming 
enjoyed by some happy individuals, in that stat^ 
in which legislators may desire, but cannot hop^ 
that it will ever be enjoyed by all throughout 
;the whole world. How much better was this 
minister occupied, than if, with the Iliad in his 
hand, he had stirred up within his heart the seeds 
of those ferocious passions which can only be 
gratified with tears and blood. 

As men grow old, they lose their relish for the 
simple amusements of childhood. Is this a reason 
for pride? It may be so; when to be hard to 
please, and to have our .happiness dependant on 
what is costly and complicated, shall be found to 
be advantageous. The child who is building houses 
of cards is happier than was I^ouis XIV. when 
building Versailles. Architect and mason at once, 
master of his situatioi^ and I;iis materials, he alters 
and overturns at will. 

Diruit^ edificat> mutat qua^^ata rotaipdis. 

And all this at the expense neither of groans 
nor money. The proverbial expression of the games 
of princes^ may furnish us with str<)ng jreai^ons for 
regretting that princes should ever cease to love 
the games of children. 

A reward was offered by one of the Homan 
emperors to whoever would invent a nav pleasure; 
and because this emperor was called Ner^j or Calu 
guia^ it has been imputed to him as a crime : as if 



B.ni. ch. 1.— art and science— divisions. 211 

every sovereign, and even every private individual, 
who encourages the cultivation of the arts and 
sciences, were not an accomplice in this crime. 
The employment of those critics, to whom we have 
before referred, tends to diminish the existing stock 
of our pleasures : the natural effect of increasing 
years, is to render us insensible to those which re- 
main: by those who blame the offer of the Roman 
emperor, these critics should be esteemed the be- 
nefactors of mankind, and old age the perfection 
of human life. 

In league with these critics are the tribe of sati- 
rists ; those generous men, who without other 
reward than the pleasure of humbling and dis- 
figuring everything which does not please them, 
have constituted themselves reformers of man- 
kind ! The only satire I could read, without disgust 
and aversion, would be a satire on these libellers 
themselves. Their occupation consists in fo- 
menting scandal, and in disseminating its poisons 
throughout the world, that they may be furnished 
with pretexts for pouring contempt upon every- 
thing that employs or interests other men. By 
blackening everything, and exaggerating every- 
thing (for it is by exaggeration they exist) they 
deceive the judgments of their readers : — innocent 
amusements, ludicrous eccentricities, venial trans- 
gressions and crimes, are alike confounded and 
covered with their venom. Their design is to 
efface all the lines of demarcation, all the essential 
distinctions which philosophy and legislation have 
with so much labour traced. For one truth, we 
find a thousand odious hyperboles in their works. 
They never cease to excite malevolence and anti- 
pathy : under their auspices, or at least under the 
influence of the passions which animate them, 
language itself becomes satirical. Neutral expres- 

14. 



212 B. III. Ch.I.— ART AND SCIENCE— DIVISIONS. 

sions can scarcely be found to designate the motives 
which defermine human actions: to the words ex- 
pressive of the motive, such as avarice^ ambition^ 
pride, idleness, and many others, the idea of dis- 
approbation is so closely, though unnecessarily, 
connected, that the simple mention of the motive 
implies a censure, even when the actions which 
have resulted from it have been most innocent. The 
nomenclature of morals is so tinctured with these 
prejudices, that it is not possible, without great 
difficulty and long circumlocutions, simply and 
purely, without reprobation or approbation, to 
express the motives by which mankind are go- 
verned. Hence our languages, rich in terms of 
hatred and reproach, are poor and rugged for the 
purposes of science and of reason. Such is the 
evil created and augmented by satiric writers.* 

Among rich and prosperous nations, it is not 
necessary that the public should be at the expense 
of -cultivating the arts and sciences of amusement 
and curiosity. Indivdiuals will always bestow 
upon these that portion of reward which js pro- 
portioned to the pleasure they bestow. 

Whilst, as to the arts and sciences of immediate 
and those of more remote utility, it would not be 
necessary, nor perhaps possible, to preserve be- 
tween these two classes an exact line of demarca- 
tion. The distinctions of theory and practice are 
equally applicable to all. Considered as matter 
of theory, every art or science, even when its prac- 
tical utility is most immediate and incontestable, 
appears to retire into the division of arts and 
sciences of remote utility. It is thus that medi- 
cine and legislation, these arts so practical, consi- 

* See further on this subject in Mr. Bentham*s ** Table of 
Springs of Action.*' 



B. III. ch. 1.— art and science— divisions. 213 

dered under a particular aspect, appear equally 
remote in respect to their utility with the specu- 
lative sciences of logic and mathematics. On the 
other hand, there is a branch of science for which, 
at first, a place would scarcely have been founds 
among the arts and sciences of curiosity, but which- 
cultivated by industrious hands, has at length pre- 
sented the characters of immediate and incontes- 
table utility. Electricity, which, when first disn 
covered, seemed destined only to amuse certai 
philosophers by the singularity of its phenomena 
has at length been employed with most striking 
success in the service of medicine, and in the pro- 
tection of our dwellings against those calamities, 
for which ignorant and affrighted antiquity could 
find no sufficient cause, but the special anger of 
the gods. 

That which governments ought to do for the arts 
and sciences of immediate and remote utility, may 
be comprised in three things — 1. To remove the 
cjiscourag'ements under which they labour; 2. To 
favour their advancement; 3. To contribute to 
their diff*usion. 



[ 214 J 



CHAPTER 11. 

ART AND SCIENCE — ADVANCEMENT. 

Though discoveries in science may be the re- 
sult of genius or accident, and though the iriost 
important discoveries may have been* made by 
individuals without public assistance, the progress 
of such discoveries may at all tiroes be materially 
accelerated by a properapplication of public en- 
couragement. The most simple and efficacious 
method of encouraging investigations of pure 
theory, the first step in the career of invention, 
consists in the appropriation of specific funds to 
the researches requisite in each particular science. 

It may, at first sight, appear superfluous to re- 
commend such a measure as this, since there are 
few states which have not sometimes made such ap- 
propriations, and since all governments, in propor- 
tion as they have become enlightened, have been 
more and more disposed to reckon such expenses 
necessary. The most efficacious methods of em- 
ploying the large funds which ought thus to be 
appropriated, remain, however, to be examined. 

It would be necessary that the funds applicable to 
a given science, chemistry for example, should be 
confided to the students of chemistry themselves. 
They ought, however, to be bestowed in the shape 
of reward. Thus the chemist, who upon a given 
subject should have produced the best theoretic 
dissertation, might be put into possession of these 
funds, upon condition that he should employ 
them in making the experiments which he had 
pointed out. What more natural or useful re- 



B.11I. Ch. XI.— art and SClENCE-ADVANCEMEIiT. 2]6 

ward could be conferred upon a philosopher, than 
thus to be enabled, with honour to himself, to 
satisfy a taste or a passion which the insufiicienpy 
of his own fortune would have rendered rather a 
torment than a pleasure ? His talents are rewarded, 
by giving him new means of increasing them. 
Other rewards often have a contrary effect, they 
tend to distract his attention, and to give birth to 
opposite tastes. 

If this method of encouraging theoretic researches 
has been neglected, it has been because the inti- 
mate connection between the sciences and arts, 
between theory and practice, has only been well 
understood by philosophers themselves ; the greater 
number of men recognise the utility of the sciences 
only at a moment when they are applied to imme- 
diate use. The ignorant are always desirous of 
humbling the wise; gratifying their self love, by 
accusing the sciences of being more curious than 
useful. " All your books of natural history are 
very pretty ,^^ said a lady to a philosopher, " but 
you have never saved a single leaf of our trees from 
the teeth of the insects.^^ Such is the frivolous 
judgment of the ignorant. There are many disco- 
veries which, though at first they might seem use- 
less in themselves, have given birth to thousands 
of others of the greatest utility. It is in conduct- 
ing the sciences to this point, that encouragements 
might thus be advantageously employed, instead of 
beingbestowed in whatare generally called rewards. 
When the discoveries of science can be practically 
employed in the increase of the mass of general 
wealth, they receive a reward naturally propor- 
tioned to their utility: it is therefore for such dis- 
coveries as are not thus immediately applicable, 
that reward is most necessary. Of this nature are 
most of the discoveries of chemistry. Is a tiew 



216 B. III. ch. II.— art and science— advancement, 

earth discovered ? a new air ? a new salt ^ a 
new metal ? the utility of the discovery is at 
first confined to the pleasure experienced by those 
interested in such researches. This ordinarilv is 
all the benefit reaped by the discoverer: occu- 
pied in making further discoveries, he leaves it 
to others to reap their fruits. It is those who 
follow him who apply them to the purposes of 
art, and levy contributions upon the individuals, 
who are desirous of enjoying the fruits of his labour. 
Ought the master workman, who sees no particular 
individual upon whom he may levy a contribution, 
therefore to go without rewards 



'I "" I 



V 



[ 217 ] 



CHAPTER III. 

ARTS AND SCIENCE DIFFUSION. 

The sciences, like plants, may expand in two 
directions ; in superficies and in height. The su- 
perficial expansion of those sciences which are 
most immediately useful, is most to be desired. 
There is no method more calculated to accelerate 
their advancement, than their general diffusion : 
the greater the number of those by whom they are 
cultivated, the greater the probability that they will 
be enriched by new discoveries. Fewer opportu- 
nities will be. lost, and greater emulation will be 
excited in their cultivation. 

Suppose a country divided into districts, some- 
what similar to the English counties, but more 
equal in size, say from thirty to forty miles in dia- 
meter, the following is the system of establish-* 
ments which Ought to be kept up in the central 
town of each district. 

1 . A professor of medicine. 

2. A professor of surgery and midwifery. 

3. An hospital. 

4. A professor of the veterinary art. 

5. A professor of chemistry. 

6. A professor of mechanical and experimental 
philosophy. 

7. A professor of botany and experimental hor- 
ticulture. 

8. A professor of the other branches of natural 
history. 

9. An experimental farm. 

The first advantage resulting from this plan 



218 B.I1I. Ch.III.— ART AND SCIENCE— DIFFUSION. 

would be the establishment, in each district, of a 
practitioner, skilled in the various branches of the 
art of healing. An hospital, necessary in itself, 
would also be further useful, by serving as a school 
for the students of this art. 

The veterinary art, or the art of healing as ap- 
plied to animals, hasonly within these few years 
been separately studied in England. The farriers, 
who formerly practised upon our cattle, were ge- 
nerally no better qualified for their duty, than the 
old women whom our ancestors allowed to practice 
upon themselves. The establishment of a professor 
of the veterinary art in every district, might even 
be recommended as a matter of economy : the 
value of the cattle preserved would more than coun- 
terbalance the necessary expense. This professor- 
ship might, for want of sufficient funds, be united 
to one of the others. 

The connections of chemistry with domestic 
and manufacturing economy are well known. The 
professor of this science would of course direct 
his principal attention to the carrying thisprac- 
tical part to its greatest perfection. His lec- 
tures would treat of the business of the dairy; the 
preservation of corn and other agricultural produc- 
tions; the preservation of provisions of all sorts; 
the prevention of putrefaction, that subtle enemy 
of health as well as of corruptible wealth ; the pro- 
per precautions for guarding against poispns of all 
sorts, which may so easily be mingled with our pro- 
visions, or which may be collected from the vessels 
in which they are prepared. They would also 
treat of the various branches of trade: of the arts 
of working in metal, of breweries, of the prepara- 
tion of leather, and the manufactures of soap and 
candles, &c. &c. 

Botany, to a certain degree, is necessary in the 



B. III. ch. III.— art and science— diffusion. 219 

science of medicine: it supplies a considerable part 
of the materials employed. It has a similar con* 
nection with chemistry, and the arts which 
depend upon it. The combined researches of the 
botanist and chemist would increase our know- 
ledge of the various uses to which vegetable sub- 
stances might be applied. It is to them that we 
must look for the discovery of cheaper and better 
methods, if such methods are to be found : of 
giving durability and tenacity to hemp and flax 
for the manufacture of linens, ropes, and paper; 
for discoveries respecting the astringent matters 
applicable to the preparation of leather ; and for 
the invention of new dyes, &c. and so on, to infi- 
nity. Indeed, it is the botanist who must enable 
the agriculturist to distinguish the most useful 
and excellent herbs and grasses, from those which 
are less useful and pernicious. 

The professor of natural history would also 
furnish abundance not only of curious but useful 
information. He would teach the cultivator to 
distinguish throughout all the departments of the 
animal kingdom bis allies from his enemies. He 
would point out the habits and the different 
shapes assumed by different insects, and the most 
efficacious methods of destroying them and pre- 
venting their ravages. It might, however, per- 
haps appear, were we fully acquainted with the 
history of all the animals which dwell with us 
upon the surface of this planet, that there would 
be found none whose existence was to us a mat- 
ter of indifference. 

I have placed in the last rank the institution of 
an experimental farm ; not because its utility 
would be inferior to all the others, but because its 
functions may be easily supplied by individual 
industry. In a country so well replenished with 



220 B.III. Ch.IH.— ART AND SCIENCE— DIFFUSION. 

knowledge, wealth, -and zeal, as England, there is 
no district which could not furnish an abundance 
of experiments in this department. Little more 
would be necessary than to provide a register 
into which they might be collected, and in which 
they might receive the degree of publicity neces- 
sary for displaying their utility. Such a register 
England once possessed in the work of the 
enlightened and patriotic Arthur Young. Such 
a register, however numerous and excellent as 
the hints dispersed throughout it were, was far 
from supplying the place, and rendering useless 
a system of regular and connected researches 
in which instruction should constitute the sole 
object.* 

In enumerating the branches of knowledge with 
which, on account of their superior utility, it is 
most desirable that the great mass of the people 
should be acquainted, it may well be supposed 
that I ought not to forget the knowledge of the 
laws. But that this knowledge maybe diffused, 
a determinate system of cognoscible laws, capable 
of being known, is necessary. Unhappily, such a 
system does not yet exist: whenever it shall 
come to be established, the knowledge of the laws 
will hardly be considered worthy of the name of 
science. The legislator who allows more intelli- 
gible terms to exist within the compass of lan- 
guage, than those in which he expresses his laws, 
deserves the execration of his fellow men. I 
have endeavoured to present to the world the 
outlines of a system,t which should it ever be 

* The Board of Agriculture, which, at the solicitation of Sir 
John Sinclair, was formed during the administration of Mr. 
Pitt, was designed to carry purposes similar to those recom- 
mended above into effect. 

t See An Introduction to Principles of Morals and Legislation' 



fi.III. Ch. III.— ART AND SCIENCE— DIFFUSION. 221 

filled up, I flatter myself would render the whole 
system of laws cognoscible and intelligible to all. 
As to those arts and sciences which may be 
learned from books, such as the arts of legislation, 
history in all its branches, moral philosophy and 
logic, comprehending metaphysics, grammar, and 
rhetoric, — these may be left to be gathered from 
books. Those individuals who are desirous of al- 
leviating the pains of study, by the charms of de- 
clamation upon these subjects, may be permitted 
to pay for their amusements. There is however 
one branch of encouragement wKiich the hand of 
government might extend even to these studies. 
It might establish in each district in which the 
lectures, of which we have already spoken, should 
be delivered, an increasing library, appropriated to 
these studies. This would be at once to bestow 
upon students the instruments of study, and upon 
authors their most appropriate rewapd. 

I should not consider knowledge in these de- 
partments, at once so useful and so curious, ill 
acquired, were it even acquired at the expense of 
Latin and Greek, an acquaintance with w^hich is 
held in such high estimation in our days, and for 
instruction in which the foundations are so abun- 
dant. Commpn opinion appears to have consi- 
dered the sciences more difficult of attainment than 
these dead languages. This opinion is only a pre- 
judice arising from the comparatively small number 
of individuals who apply themselves to the study 
of the sciences, and from its not having been the 
custom to study them till the labour of these other 
studies has been completed. But, custom and pre- 
judice apart, it is in the study of the sciences that 
young people would find most pleasure and fewest 
difficulties. In this career, ideas find easy access 
through the senses to the memory and the othe 



222 B.ni. Ch. III.— ART AND SCIENCE— DIFFUSION. 

, intellectual faculties. Curiosity, that passion 
which even in infancy displays so much energy, 
would here be continually gratified. In the study 
of language, on the contrary, all is abstraction; 
there are no sensible objects to relieve the memory ; 
all the energy of the mind is consumed in the ac- 
quisition of words, of which neither the utility 
nor the application is visible. Hence, the longest 
and most detailed course of instruction which need 
be given upon all the sciences before mentioned, 
would not together occupy so much time as is 
usually devoted to the study of Latin, which is 
forgotten almost as soon as learned. The know- 
ledge of languages is valuable only as a means of 
acquiring the information which may be obtained 
from conversation or books. For the purposes of 
conversation, the dead languages are useless, and 
translations of all the books contained ii^ them may 
be found in all the languages of modern Europe. 
.What then remains to be obtained from them, not 
by the common people, but even by the most in- 
structed ? I must confess, I can discover nothing 
but a fund of allusions wherewith to ornament their 
speeches, their conversations, and their books : 
too small a compensation for the false and narrow 
notions which custom continues to compel us to 
draw up from these imperfect and deceptive 
sources. To prefer the study of these languages 
to the study of those useful truths which the more 
mature industry of the moderns has placed in their 
stead, is to make a dwelling-place of a scaffolding, 
instead of employing it in the erection of a build- 
ing : it is as though, in his mature age, a man 
should continue to prattle like a child. Let those 
who are pleased with these studies continue to 
amuse themselves ; but let us cease to torment 
children with them, at least those children who 



B. III. ch: III.— art and sciencb-diffusion. 223 

will have to provide for their own subsistence, till 
such time aa. we have supplied them with the 
means of slaking their thirst for knowledge at those 
springs where pleasure iscombined with immediate 
and incontestable utility. 

It is especially by a complete course of instruc- 
tion that the clergy, who might be rendered so 
useful, ought to be prepared for their functions. 
Within the narrow limits of every parish, there 
would then be found one man at least well in- 
structed upon all subjects with which acquain- 
tance is most desirable. In exchange for this know- 
ledge which constitutes the glory of man, I would 
exchange as much as might be desired of that con- 
troversy which is his scourge and his disgrace. 

The intervals between divine service on the 
sabbath might then be filled up by the communi- 
cation of knowledge to those, whose necessary 
avocations leave them no other leisure time for 
improvement. An attendance upon a course of 
physico-theology, it appears to me. would be a 
much more suitable mode of employing this time, 
than wasting it in that idleness and dissipation in 
which both health and money are so frequently 
lost. 

There are three causes which tend to strengthen 
an attachment to the dead languages. The first is, 
the utility which they formerly possessed. At 
the revival of letters, there was nothing to learn 
but Latin and Greek, and nothing could be learnt 
but by Latin and Greek. The period when this 
utility ceased having never been fixed, custom 
has led us to regard it as still subsisting. 

A second reason is, the time and trouble ex- 
pended by so many persons in learning them. 

The price of any thing is regulated not only by 
its utility, but also by the labour expended in pro- 



:»«. . 



224 B. III. CH.III.— ART AND SCIENCE— DIFFUSIO N. 

curing it. Few would be willing to acknowledge 
that they had spent a large portion of their life in 
learning that, which when learnt was not worth 
knowing. There are many individuals who have 
learnt Latin and Greek, but have learned nothing 
else. Can it be expected that they should ac- 
knowledge these languages are useless ? As well 
might a knight-errant have been expected to ac- 
knowledge that his mistress was ugly 1 

The third cause is, their reputed necessity. 
This necessity, though purely conventional, is not 

* '' En eflfet, la plupart de ces savans ne sentent plus les 
choses en elles-m^med. lis sont corame ces imaginations 
^Eubles^ qui> subjugu^es par I'^cM des dignites et des richesses^ 
admirent dans la bouche d'un grand ce qu*ils trouveraient 
pitoyable dans celle d*un homme du commun. Ainsi> Tancienne 
reputation et les langues savantes leur imposent^ et changent 
tout i leurs yeux. Telle pensee qu*ils entendent tous les jours 
en.Fran9ois sans y prendre garde^ les enl^ve s*ils viennent k la 
rencontrer dans un auteur Grec. Tout pleins qu*ils en sont> 
ils vous la citent avec emphase 3 et si vous ne partagez pas 
leur entbousiasme> Ah ! s*ecrient-ils^ si vous saviez le Grec ! 
II me semble entendre le heros de Cervantes^ qui^ parcequ*!! 
est arme chevalier^ voit des enchanteurs o\x son ecuyer ne volt 
que des moulins. 

'' Tel est rinconv^nient ordinaire de T^rudition, et il n'y a 
que les esprits du premier ordre qui puissent I'^viter. L*igno- 
rance> me dira-t-on, n'a-t-elle pas aussi ses inconveniens ? 
Oui^ sans doute; mais on a tort d*appeler ignorans ceux 
m^mes qui ne sauroient ni Grec ni Latin. lis peuvent m^me 
avoir acquis en Fran9ois toutes les idees n^cessaires pour per- 
fectionner leur raison> et toutes les experiences propres d assu- 
rer leur godt. Nous avons des philosophes^ des orateurs^ des 
, poetes : nous avons ra^me des traducteurs oti Ton peut puiser 
toutes les richesses anciennes^ depouill^es de I'orgueil de les 
avoir recueillies dans les originaux. Un homme qui^ sans Grec 
et sans Latin^ auroit mis a profit tout ce qui s'est fait d'excel- 
lent dans notre langue> Temporterait sans doute sur le savant 
qui, par un amour' der^gU des anciens, auroit dedaign^ les 
ouvrages modernes.*'— Xa Mothe, Reflexions sur la Critique, 
p. 148. 



B.in. Ctf.III.— ART AND SCIENCE— DIFFUSION. '225 

the less real. Public opinion has attached a de- 
gree of impiprtance to an acquaintance with them, 
and he who should be known to be entirely igna« 
rant of them, would be branded with disgrace. 
So long as this law subsists, it must be obeyed. A 
single individual is seldom able to withstand or 
change the law9 established by public opinion. 

As the public mind becomes enlightened, these 
laws will change of themselves. A sovereign may, 
however, hasten these changes if he believe themi 
useful, and if he consider the attempt worth the 
trouble. He may reward individuals for teaching 
the arts and sciences, and thus establish a new 
public opinion, which shall at first compete with, 
and at length ultimately subdue the previous pre- 
judice. 

He may also attain the same end by another less 
costly, but more startling method. He may pre- 
scribe an attendance upon different scientific lec- 
tures, as a necessary condition to the holding of 
certain offices, and particularly of all honorary em- 
ployments. To those who have completed their 
course of attendance, an honorary diploma may be 
given, which upon all occasions of public cere- 
mony shall entitle those who possess it to a certain 
precedence. 

In the times of feudal barbarism, when war wa» 
the only occupation of those who did not belong to 
the commonalty or the clergy, the upper ranks in 
society were necessarily military* The knight was 
th^ warrior who could afford to fight on horse- 
back ; the squire was one who, not being so rich 
as the knight, could afford to be his principal at* 
tendant, and this constituted their nobility. 

In future times, when other occupations shall be 
pursued and other manners established, it is possi- 
ble that knowledge may confer rank in £urope, as 

15 



226 B. III. ch. hi.— art and science— diffusion. 

the appearance of it has for a long time past in 
China. Wealth, indepeDdently of any convention, 
possesses real power, and will always mingle with 
everything which tends to confer respect. The 
philosopher, to his title of honour, will unite the 
idea of an individual sufficiently wealthy to have 
supported the expense of a learned education : 
Knowledge, whether true or presumptive, might 
thus become a mark of distinction, as the length 
of the nails is in China. 

But it may be said, that something more than 
attendance upon a course of scientific lectures is 
necessary, if anything is to be learned, and that the 
law which should bestow honour upon attendance 
would not insure study. If it were necessary to 
have a nobility composed of real philosophers, 
other niethods must be pursued; but when the 
object in view is merely to change the species of 
knovyledge in which they are to be instructed, froqi 
what is useless to what is useful, what more need 
be required ? When interesting objects of study are 
substituted for those which are uninteresting, they 
would not study less. 

I know that public examinations are powerful 
means for exciting emulation, but 1 have no desire 
to place additional obstacles in the way of a plan 
whose novelty alone would render it but too alarm- 
ing: a project which to many will appear ro- 
mantic, need not be accompanied by an accessory 
whose aspect is alarming, and whose utility is 
problematic. 

The most stupid and inattentive could scarcely 
attend upon a long course of instruction without 
gaining some advantage ; they would, at least, be 
familiarised with the terms of art, which constitute 
not only the first, but the greatest difficulty; 
they would form some idea of the principal divi- 



B. m; ch. III.— art and science— diffusion. 227 

I 

sions of the country they traversed ; and should 
they ever be desirous of directing a more par- 
ticular examination to any particular divisioa, 
they will at least know in what direction to; 
seek for it. As all the world would then b6' 
occupied with the study of the sciencQs, they, 
would pretend thus to employ themselves, and 
would be ashamed to be entirely ignorant of 
those things which were the subjects of general 
conversation. 

Russia is an instance of the ease with which a, 
new diriQCtion may be given to the opinions of a 
whole people. Nobility of birth is but littW 
respected; official rank is the only ground of dis-. 
tinction. This change has been eflfected by a few 
simple regulations. Unless he is an officer, no in-* 
dividual, how rich or nobly born soever he may 
be, can vote, or even sit in the assembly of the no- 
bility. The consequence has been, that all classes 
have pressed into the service of the state. If they 
do not intend to make it their profession, they quit 
it when they have attained the rank which confers 
this privilege. f.% 

Note. — If Mr. Bentham had consented to revise his MSS. 
which were written more than forty years ago> he might have 
seen reason to alter many of his observations. 

In England^ much has been done in the interval. Public 
opinion has sensibly changed respecting the value of classical 
learning. It is highly esteemed at college^ but elsewhere it is 
now only considered as an accessory -, the most enlightened 
parents regret that it is still the only object of instruction in 
our puplic schools. 

Since the establishment of the Royal Institution, many simi- 
lar institutions have been formed, and a general desire for 
useful knowledge has been disseminated. The ladies have dis- 
played a persevering ardour in their attendance on these means 
of instruction^ so much the more praiseworthy, as it has been 
uniformly excited by inclination alone. Elementary works 

15. 



228 B,IIL Cir.III.— ART AND SCIENCE— DIFFUSION. 

have been multiplied ; but all this has been done by the exer-^ 
tioBs of individuals^ without any encouragement from the state. 

As to public education^ it is more easy to create than to re* 
form. A good institutipn would be the best criticism iqpon the 
bML If tw6 or three colleges were founded in London> suited 
to the wants of the more numerous classes of those who are 
destined to the pursuits of art> trade> or commerce^ in which 
not Latin or Greek (almost always useless in these avocations) 
diould be taught^ but the national language^ which has gene- 
rally been neglected^ together with all those branches of know- 
ledge> which if not absolutely necessary^ are always useful and 
agreeable^ we should soon see these seminaries draw together 
a crowd of scholars, and the old colleges would be obliged to 
correct their system in order to maintain their ground. 

It may be said, that private schools may supply the defici- 
ency ', but there is a great difierence between public and pri' 
▼ate establishments. Private education can only succeed by a 
train of happy events, whilst in public education, a multitude 
of circumstances are overcome. Besides, domestic education 
is lim>ited to the rich, whilst public instruction is adapted to> 
the most moderate fortunes. — Bvmont. 



RATIONALE OF REWARD, 



BOOK IV. 

EEWARD APPLIED TO PRODUCTION AND TRADE. 



CHAPTER I. 

BENTHAM AND* ADAM 6M1TH. 

N.B. This fourth book was not included by 
the author, in his plan, as a part of a treatise upon 
rewards. It consists, however, of the most im- 
portant application of the principles laid down in 
the former piart of this work, and particularly in 
Book 1, cl^. 15 J Competition as to Rewards. It 
is extracted from another of Mr. Bentham^s ma- 
nuscripts, entitled, A Manual of Political Eco- 
nomy; a work, which as it respects its foun- 
dations and its results, is the same as Adam 
Smith's Wealth of Nations^ but from which it 
widely differs in plan and form. 

The Scotch Philosopher, having to discuss a 
new subject which presented a controversy at 
every step, thought it necessary to begin with an 
exposition of facts. His work is principally his- 
torical : he has described rn a most admirable 
manner the progress of society, from its state of 

* Translated from the French of Dumont. 



[> 



230 B. IV. Ch. I.*^£NTHAM and ADAM SMITH. 

primitive poverty to its present condition of 
opulence ; he has traced the march of industry in 
its natural course, from agriculture to. manufac- 
tures, from manufactures to commerce, and from 
internal to foreign commerce. In the midst of 
these interesting pictures, the didactic part is only 
incidental : he seems to have been fearful of pre- 
iftaturely forming a system. He has collected the 
elements of knowledge, and he has left to the 
fermentation of time the care of bringing them to 
perfection, and extracting their consequences. 

The. object of Adam Smith allowed of a happy 
diversity, and he has chosen the easiest and most 
ornamental method of effecting it; but it is neither 
the shortest nor the most favourable for the purposes 
6f instruction. His movements are not progres- 
sive ; he often retraces his steps : active minds 
reproach him with being diffuse in argumentation, 
and pretend that each of his chapters forms a dis- 
tinct treatise. M.. 
, , » . ... 

Mr. Bentham has chosen a narrower and iQore 
difficult path : he has considered the sqbject with 
a reference to legislation alone, and unifornily has 
confined himself to the practical part. .This is 
.what the law ought to be on this point: this is 
what ought to be done ; and above all this 
ought not to be done, if it.be desiraUa: that the 
national prosperity should be carried to the .highest 
possible pitch; such is his design. His progress 
is marked by a didactic rigour : he advances from 
definitions to principles, and from principles to 
consequences. 

This difference ip design is not the only one 
between the two works. Mn !$.entbam has sim- 
plified his subject, by referring everything to one 
principle ; namely, the limitation of production and 
trade hy the limitation of capital: a principle which 
brings all his reasonings into a very small circle^^ 



B.1V. Ch. I.— BKNTHAM and ADAM SMITH. 231 

arid which serves to unite into one bundle those 
observations which cannot be so easily grasped 
when they are disunited. His is not a new dis^ 
covery. This principle pervades, and, so to speak, 
is diffused throughout the whole work of Adam 
Smith, but is ncTwhere announced as a governing 
principle: he has never directly employed it. Had 
he clearly recognized it, he would have made it 
the centre of his system : it would have been the 
foundation upon which he would have erected his 
whole superstructure, and he would have been 
spared a multitude of repetitions and windings. 

The Manual of Mr. Bentham would not tend to 
supersede the necessity of reading the Wealth of 
Nations. The historical part of that work, in 
exhibiting! the origin of things; in leading us to 
reflect upon the phenomena of society ; jn taking 
down its machinery and exhibiting each part se- 
parately, lays the foundation of the science. It is 
thus, that the knowledge of anatomy and physi- 
ology ought to precede the science of medicine, 
properly so called. 

I have extracted from Mr. Bentham^s Manual, 
those parts which belonged to my present work, 
and which I could not have omitted without, in 
some respects, leaving it incomplete. It is not, 
however, for the learned that this part of the 
work is intended : they are above these elements. 
The study of. political economy has become com- 
mon and familiar, in comparison with what it was 
when these writings were composed. Still, how- 
ever, in them errors are attacked which are yet far 
from being completely destroyed ; and which have 
a continual tendency to be reproduced. The pas- 
sions of men are continually sowing in this field 
briars and poisonous plants, which it is necessary 
contitiuaily to extirpate. This little extract, which 



232 B. IV. Ch. I.-^BfiNTHAM AND ADAM SMITH. 

may be read iii'half an hour, places in a new light 
the grand principles of social order, security, the 
free exercise of industry, the energy of the at- 
tractive and remuneratory motives which induce 
free men to labour, the comparative weakness of 
the motives of constraint which induce slaves 
to exert themselves. New arguments are fur-: 
nished wherewith to combat national jealousies, 
the desire for distant establishments, and other 
prejudices not less mischievous. 

In conclusion, political economy is a science, 
rather than an art. There is much to be learned 
respecting it and little to be done. 

Is it inquired what ought governments to do, 
that wealth may be increased — the answer is. 
Very little, and nothing rather than too much. 
What ought to be done for the increase of popula- 
tion ?-— Nothing. In the greater number of states, 
the best methods of augmenting. population and 
wealth, would consist in abolishing those laws and 
regulations whereby it has been sought to increase 
them, provided such abolition were gradually and 
carefully accomplished. 

The art therefore is reduced within a small com- 
pass: security and freedom is all that industry 
requires. The request which' agriculture, manu- 
factures, and commerce presents to governments, is 
modest and reasonable as that which Diogenes 
made to Alexander : '' Stand out of my sunshine J' 
We have no need of favour, we require only a 
secure and open path. 

In connexion with this Manual, I cannot omit 
the opportunity of making a remark in favour of 
those philosophers who have particularly culti- 
vated the science of political economy. They have 
taken no part in the dissemination of those splene- 
tic and odious paradoxes respecting the inequality 



B. IV. Ch. L— BENTHAM and ADAM SMITH. 233 

t 

f>{ ranks, the progress of wealth and civih'zation, 
the enjoyments of luxury and arts. It is they, on 
the contrary, who have furnished the most solid ar- 
guments wherewith to refute these subversive opi- 
nions, and wherewith to justify social order. They 
have replied to declamation by reasoning ; to the 
pictures of fancy, by facts ; to conjectures, by cal- 
culations. They have shown that men in society 
have a much greater number of interests in com- 
mon, than of interests opposed to one another ; 
that ignorance alone separates them ; that the more 
they are enlightened, the more closely they be- 
come united ; that there is a sensible progression 
among the human race towards perfection, although 
its march may be irregular, and its movements 
even sometimes retrograde. 

What answer so victorious to the multitude of 
complaints respecting the misery of the poorer 
classes amongst us, as the real picture of the uni- 
versal indigence of primitive societies ! Poverty is 
not a consequence of social order : why is k con- 
sidered as its reproach ? It is a remnant of a state 
of nature. Wealth has been created by man : po- 
verty is the condition of nature. The division of 
property, of labour, the invention of machines, the 
application of the elements to the purposes of pro- 
duction, have increased the powers of the human 
race a hundred-fold, and have in like manner aug- 
mented the sources of abundance, so that famine, 
that almost habitual scourge of savage nations, is 
unknown among nations moderately well governed ; 
they have even a sufficient superfluity for the sup- 
port of numerous classes who consume without 
reproducing. To this security respecting subsist- 
ence, the first benefit accruing from social order, 
add the pleasures of gradual acquisition ; that sweet 
association of industry with nope, that growing in- 



234 b: IV. ch. i.^B£NTHam and adam smith. 

terestof life when one advances towards the object 
of his desires ; that charm of property, the spur of 
youth and pillow of old age. This system of in- 
dustry is at the same time the foundation of mora- 
lity, of reciprocal wants, of relative bonds, and of 
public and private virtues. 

The objection apparently the most specious is 
happily found the most false. It has been pretended, 
that individuals could only enrich themselves by 
despoiling others ; that they were necessarily ene- 
mies, and lived, as gladiators, only by destroying 
one another. Trade has been confounded with 
gambling, in which the gain of one is always 
founded upon the loss of another. But on the 
contrary, in a social undertaking, all the adven- 
turers may reap their share of advantage ; since, all 
other things equal, the more labour there is, the 
greater will be the result. The sources of wealth, 
if the government be not very bad, are always in- 
creasing ; so that the number of the successful, 
among the candidates for fortutie, always increases, 
and there are not any who are necessarily unsuc- 
cessful. 

The idea of beholding in those who enrich 
themselves, only more daring and expert plun- 
derers than others, is correct as that of the mis- 
anthropist, who considers its criminal calendar as 
an account of the habitual actions of the citizens 
of any country. Without stopping to refute in 
detail such absurd exaggerations, we shall only 
point out a single clear and palpable proof of the 
fact. When we look at North America, we may 
there behold society in almost all its stages; we 
may there trace the formation of wealth in the 
furrows of agriculture, and its distribution through 
the channels of industry. Industry, like an hy-^ 
draulic machine, raises the waters as they proceed 



B.1V. Cii.l^BE^HAM AND ADAM SMITH. 235 

from their source; it turns them baclL a^in, re- 
raises, and n^akes them circulate without cessation. 
There is no waste in the whole process. The 
wealth of one is'so little founded upon the impo- 
(Verisbment of others, that, on the contrary, the 
creation of one capital soon, creates others, and the 
jQvei of all conditions is elevated at the same time. 

The argument against civilization, drawn from 
the power and number of those swarms of barba- 
rians which issued from the north, is become, 
when judiciously examined, a direct proof in its 
favour. > These barbarians had no home : deprived 
of everything which attaches man to the soil which 
gp,ye him birth, they envied what they knew not 
how to create, and destroyed instead of imitating. 
The innumerable multitudes, which were gratui- 
tously supposed, have vanished when it has been 
considered that hordes, wandering in countries 
covered with forests, could not have increased 
above their narrow means of subsistence. Since 
civilization has penetrated into these countries ; 
since the means of enjoyment and combatting the 
disadvantages of the climate by the resources of 
art have been multiplied, the people, more happy 
and more numerous, have assumed habitudes 
which have attached them to the possession of the 
soil. Famine no longer obliges them to pounce 
like vultures upon their wealthy neighbours: their 
necessary wants supplied, their manners have been 
softened. Production has supplanted pillage, and 
they have become incorporated in that great family 
of which they were the scourge. 

A culpable insensibility ought not, however, to 
be imputed to the admirers of social order, with 
respect to the evils which they have not yet known 
how to prevent. If happiness be produced by 
natural and constant causes ; if it greatly exceed 



236 B.IV. Ch. I.— BENTHAM and ADAM SMITH. 

the evil; if it have a tendency to augmentation, 
their admiration is justified. Happiness is of ne- 
cessity; misery is accidental. Happiness arises 
from the order of nature, misery from the igno- 
rance of men. Happiness multiplies itself, and 
every instance of its increase produces more; 
misery carries with it its warning, and is its own 
antidote. These considerations, far from cooling 
our zeal in favour of the suflFering part of society, 
leave those without excuse who turn away from 
assisting them. It is lawful to turn away our 
thoughts from incurable evils, but we are criminal 
if we allow those to exist which we can cure. 
Omnisquenon solum cessatio ignavia est: sedetiam 
quaerendi defatigatio existimari debet turpissima, 
ubi id quod quaeritur est pulcherrimum.* 

*.Scaliger. 



[ 237 ] 



CHAPTER II. 

WEALTH AND HAPPINESS— RELATION— JNCREASfi* 

That the reader may not be detained by a 
multitude of definitions, I shall confine myself to 
a few preliminary estplanations. Under the general 
name of the matter of wealth,* every object id 
comprehended which can be desired by man ; 
which can be possessed by him ; which is actually 
fit for his use, or which can be made so. 

The wealth of a community is the aggregate 
amount of the matter of wealth belonging to the 
different individuals of which that community is 
composed. 

All wealth is either the spontaneous production 
of the earth, or the result of labour, employed in 
the cultivation of the earth, or upon the materials 
which it yields. 

Wealth may be employed in four ways : 1. For 
subsistence ; 2. For enjoyment ; 3. For security 
or defence ; 4. For increase. 

As the matter of wealth cannot be employed in 
any one of these ways, without being in a greater 

♦ The compound term> *' matter of wealth," is employed to 
prevent ambiguity ; it carries with it a reference to quantity. 
There are many things which may constitute part of the 
matter of wealth, which, when taken separately or in small 
quantities, would hardly be called wealth. Thus the wealth 
of a stationer may consist of a mass of rags 3 a small portion 
of which lying upon a dunghill few would call wealth 5 none, 
however, could deny that they might constitute pari of the 
matter of wealth. 



238 B.IV. ch.ii^wealth and happiness, &c. 

or less degree consumed, the stock existing at 
any given period would be continually diminish- 
ing, if constant exertions were not employed in 
the increasing of it. 

Wealth, considered as arising at successive 
periods, is called income. 

That portion of it which is employed for the 
purposes of giving increase to its amount, is called 
capital. 

An individual who would in any manner em- 
ploy himself in the accumulation of wealth, 
ought to possess — I. Materials on which to work ; 
2. Tools wherewith to work ; 3. A place in which 
to work ; 4. Necessaries for his subsistence while 
at work. All these objects are com|)rised under 
the name of capital. 

In the order of history, labour precedes capital. 
Flrom land and labour, everything proceeds. But 
in the actual order of things there is always some 
capital already produced, which is united with 
land and labour in the production of new values. 
When an article of the produce of land or labour, 
in place of being consumed or kept for the use of 
him who has made it, or caused it to be made, is 
offered in exchange, it then becomes an article of 
commerce : it is merchandise. 

The general wealth is increased : — 

1. By the .increased efficacy of labour. 

2. By the increase of the number of workmen. 

3. By the increase of capital. 

4. By the more advantageous employment of 
capital. 

6. By means of trade. 

In all civilised societies, a class of persons is 
found who purchase of the manufacturer that they 
may sell to the consumer. 



B. IV. Ch. II.— wealth and HAPPINESS* &c. 29^ 

The whole of the operations of manufacture,, 
and of sale, may be described by the general terms 
of production and trade. 

The spontaneous actions of individuals, id 
the career of production and trade, depiend on 
three conditions : Inclination^ knowledjgCj and 
power^ 

Inclination to incvedise in wealth by labour and 
economy may be wanting in some individuals, 
but it predominates in men in general, and needs 
no other encouragement than legal security for the 
possession of what has been produced by it. 
Knowledge, in the shape here in question, is a 
result of the inclination which naturally leads men 
to study, every one in his own concerns, the means 
of preserving and increasing his wealth. By 
power, in the shape here in question, I under- 
stand that which consists in pecuniary capital, 
which is in proportion to this capital, and cannot 
exceed it. 

As to inclination, government has no need 
to do anything for its increase ; any more than 
for the increase of the desire of eating and 
drinking. 

In respect of knowledge, it may contribute to 
extend it, not only by means of general in- 
struction, of which we have already spoken, but 
also by information respecting particular facts ; 
respecting particular branches of production and 
trade, and respecting particular new discoveries 
to which it may give birth by reward and encou- 
ragement, and which it may communicate by 
publication. 

In respect of power, in so far as it consists 
in pecuniary capital, government cannot with 
advantage create it : whatever it gives to one 
individual it must have taken from another ; 



240 a IV. ch. ii^wealth and happiness, &c. 

but there is another species of power, which 
consists in liberty of acting, which government 
may grant without any expense: it has only to 
repeal restrictive laws, to take* away obstacles ; 
in a word, to leave things to themselves. 

Such are the outlines of an analytical plaor 
by which, it is believed, it will be found, that 
a circle is drawn around the subject. 



r 241 ] 



CHAPTER III. 

PRODUCTION IS LIMITED BY CAPITAL. 

No kind of productive labour of any importance 
can be carried on without capital. From hence it 
follows that the quantity of labour, applicable to 
any object, is limited by the quantity of capital 
which can be employed on it. 

If I possess a capital of 10,000/. and two species 
of trade, each yielding twenty per cent, profit, but 
each- requiring a capital of 10,000/. for carrying 
them on, are proposed to me, it is clear that I may 
carry on the one or the other with this profit, so 
long as I confine myself to one, but that in carrying 
on the one, it is not in my power to carry on 
the other ; and that if I seek to divide my capital 
between them both, I shall not make more than 
twenty per cent ; but I may make less, and even 
convert my profit into a loss. But if this propo- 
sition is true in the case of one individual, it is 
true for all the individuals in a whole nation. 
Production is therefore limited by capital. 

There is one circumstance which demonstrates, 
that men are not sensible of this truth, apparently 
so obvious. When they recommend the encourage- 
ment of particular branches of trade, they do not 
pretend that they are more profitable than others ; 
but because they are branches of trade, and they 
cannot possess too many. In a word, they would 
encourage trade in general ^ as if all trade did 
not yield its* own reward; as if an unprofitable 

16 



242 B.1V. CH.ni.—PR0DUCTION IS UMITED BV CAPITAL. 

trade deserved to be encouraged ; and as if a profi- 
table trade stood in need of encouragement ; as if 
indeed, by these capricious operations, it were pos- 
sible to do aqy other thing than transfer capital 
from one branch of trade to another. 



[ 243 ] 



CHAPTER IV. 

CAPITALIST THE BEST JUDGE OF HIS OWN 

INTEREST. 

The quantity of capital being given, the increase 
of wealth will, in a certain period, be in proportion 
to the good employment of this capital ; that is to 
say, of the more or less advantageous direction 
which shall have been given to it. 

The advantageous direction of capital depends 
upon two things : 1. The choice of the undertak- 
ing ; 2. The choice of the means for carrying it 
on. 

The probability of the best choice in both these 
respects, will be in proportion to the degree of in- 
terest which the undertaker has in its Being' well 
made, in connection with the means he has of ac-* 
quiring the information relative to his undertak- 

ing- 

But knowledge itself depends in a gre^t mea* 

sure upon the degree of interest which the indivi- 
dual has in obtaining it; he who possesses the 
greatest interest will apply himself with the 
greatest attention and constancy to obtain it* 

The interest which a man takes in the concerns 
of another, is never so great as he feels in his owHI 

If we consider every thing necessary for the !. 
most advantageous choice of an undertaking, or | 
the means of carrying it on, we shall see that the \ 
official person, so fond of intermeddling in the \ 
details of production and trade, is in no respect j 
superior to the individuals he desires to govern^ I 
and that in most points he is their inferior. 

16. 



^ 



244 B. IV. Ch.IVw— CAPITALIST THE BEST JUDGE, Ac. 

A prime minister has not so many occasions for 
acquiring information respecting farming as a 
farmer, respecting distillation as a distiller, re- 
specting the construction of vessels as a ship- 
builder, respecting the sale of commodities, as 
those who have been engaged in it all their lives. 

It is not probable that he should either have 
directed his attention to these objects for so long a 
time, or with the same degree of energy, as those 
who have been urged on by such powerful motives. 
It is therefore probable that in point of information 
relative to these professions, he is inferior to those 
who follow them. . 

. Official persons, therefore, with fewer oppor- 
tunities of instruction, less attention to the affairs, 
endless practical information, are not in a condi- 
' tion to form a better judgment than those who are 
interested, neither in the choice of the undertak- 
ing nor the means of carrying it on. 

If by chance a minister should become informed 
of any circumstance, which proves the superior ad- 
vantage of a certain branch of trade, or of a certain 
process, it would not be a reason for employing 
authority in causing its adoption. Publicity alone 
would produce this effect : the more real the ad- 
vantage, the more superfluous the exercise of 
authority. 

To justify the regulatory interference of govern- 
ment in the affairs of trade, one or other of these 
two opinions must be maintained : that the pub- 
lic functionary understands the interests of indi- 
viduals better than they do themselves ; or that 
thequantity of capital in every nation being infi- 
nite, or that the new branches of trade not requiring 
any capital, all the wealth produced by a new and 
favourite commerce is so much clear gain, over 
and above what would have been produced if 



B. IV. Ch. IV.— capitalist THE BEST JUDGE, &c. 245 

these advantages had not been conferred on this 
trade. 

These two opinions being contrary to truth, it 
follows that the interference of government is al- 
together erroneous, that it operates rather as an 
obstacle than a means of advancement. 

It is hurtful in another manner: by imposing 
restraints upon the actions of individuals, it pro- 
duces a feeling of uneasiness — so much liberty 
lost, sa much happiness destroyed. 

This indeed is not a conclusive objection against 
these laws, since it may be urged against the best 
laws. All laws are coercive ; but this is a reason 
for not making any laws, at least where their 
utility does not more than overbalance this incon- 
venience. 

A measure of government, which would be un- 
justifiable employed as a means of increasing the 
national wealth, may be proper as a means of sub- 
sistence (for exampte, the maintaining of maga- 
zines of corn), or as a ibeans of defence (for exam- 
ple, encouragements given to certain branches of 
commerce considered as a nursery for seamen) ; 
but it is essential to know that it produces its de- 
signed end, and not to mistake a sacrifice for an 
advantage, a loss for a gain. Encouragements of] 
this nature do not the less belong to the class of 
things which ought not to be done^ when uncon- 
nected with imperious circumstances, which pro- 
duce the exception to the general rule. 



<i-.v. 



[ 246 ] 



CHAPTER V. 

FALSE ENCOURAGEMENTS— LOANS. 

Qf all the means whereby a government may 
gjve a particular direction to production, the loan 
of pecuniary capital to individuals, to be employed 
in any particular branch of trade, is the least open 
to objection. ' 

•- It ought, however, at all times, to be free from 
objection with respect to justice and prudence. 
All the treasure of the government, from whence 
does it arise but from taxes, and these taxes levied 
by constraint ?* To take from one portion of its 
subjects to lend to another^ to diminish their actual 
enjoyments, or the amount which thiey would have 
laid up in reserve, is to do a certain evil for an 
uncertain good ; is to sacrifice security for the 
hope of increasing wealth. 

If loans of this nature were always faithfully 
repaid, their injustice would be limited to a certain 
period. Let us suppose that the capital thus em- 
ployed is 100,000/., and that the whole sum has 
been levied in one year, the injustice of the mea- 
sure will have begun and ended in a year; and if 
the money thus lent has produced an increase of 
industry, it is an advantage to be set in opposition 
to the evil arising from the tax. 

But these loans have a natural tendency to be 
ill employed, wasted, or stolen. Monarchs, and 

* At least where the revenue of the government is not the 
produce of land, or the interest of money formed by an accu- . 
mulation of rent. Of this nature is a part of the revenue of 
the republic of Berne. 



B.IV. Ch.V,— FALSE ENCOURAOEMENTS-rLOANS. 247 

their ministers, are as liable to be deceived in the 
choice of individuals as in the selection of parti- 
cular branches of commerce. Those who succeed 
with them prove only that ibey possess the talent of 
persuasiop, or understand the practices of courts ; 
but these are not the things which produce sue*' 
cess in trader It may be seen in the work of 
Mirabeau, upon the Prussian Monarchy, that 
Frederick II., with all his vigilance and severity, 
was often deceived by the ignorance or dishonesty 
of those who obtained from bis avaricious credulity 
loans of this nature. Thus, in the train of the 
first Unjust tax for the formation of the capital 
lent, follow other taxes, rendered necessary to re- 
place the thefts and dilapidations to which the 
first has been exposed.* 

It is also most probable, that the capital thus 
employed will only be applied upon branches of 
industry less productive than those towards which 
k would naturally have directed itself. What is 
the argument of the borrower? that the tr^de he 
wishes to establish is new, or that it is necessary 
to support an established trade : but why should 
the government intermeddle with it, if not because 
individuals who consider their own interests are 
not willing to meddle with it ? The presumption 
is therefore against the enterprise. 

Suppose even that, by chance, this loan should 
take the most advantageous direction possible, 
the loan is not justified by this profit : it was 
unnecessary. For employing capital in the most 
advantageous manner, it is only necessary that 
the most advantageous employment should be 
known. If it be not well employed, it is that a 
better employment is not known. It is know- 
ledge which is wanted : it is proper to teach and 
not to lend. If the government cannot tell which 



248 B. IV. Ch. V.-FAL8E ENCOURAGEMENTS-LOANS. 

is the most advantageous employment of capital, 
it is stili less able to employ it well ; if it can tell 
which is the best employment, that is all it need do. 
If the money of government had not taken this 
direction, that of individuals would, had they beea 
instructed and left free. 

There are circumstances in which loans of this 
nature are always justifiable: w^en they are not 
employed for the encouragement of new enter- 

E rises, but only to afford support to particular 
ranches of commerce, labouring under temporary 
difficulties, and which need only to be sustained 
for a short time till the crisis of peril or suspen- 
sion is passed. This is not a speculation on the 
part of government, but rather an assurance against 
a calamity, which it seeks to prevent or to lighten. 
In such cases of distress individuals will not, of 
themselves, assist the merchants whose affairs are 
thus in danger: it is necessary, therefore, that 
assistance be supplied ; and, when supplied, it is 
not in the way of regulation but of remedy. 



^* I t 



V. 



[ 249 ] 



CHAPTER VI. 

GIFT, OR GRATUITOUS LOAN. 

Were we to judge from the number of instances 
in which it has been adopted, we should conclude 
that gratuitous grants of capital for the encourage- 
ment of commerce were most excellent measures. I 

Their inconveniences are of the same kinds as 
those of loans, but they greatly exceed them in 
degree. In case of a loan, if it be repaid, the same 
sum may serve the same purpose a second time; 
and so of the rest. The oppressive act by which 
the. government obtained the capital need not be 
repeated. But if, in' place of being lent, it be 
given, — so often as this favour is repeated, so often 
must the amount be levied by taxes : and upon 
every occasion it may be said, that the produce of 
the tax is lost, if we consider the use which might 
have been made of it in lightening the public bur- 
thens. 

, Sometimes capital has been lent with this view, 
without interest ; sometimes at an interest below 
the ordinary rate. In the first case, if it be repaid, 
it is not the capital which is lost, but only the 
interest ; in the second case, it is not all the inte- 
rest, but only the difference between the lower 
and the ordinary rate. It is still the same false 
policy as to its kind ; all the difference is in the 
degree. 

It may be observed, that gratuitous grants are / 
more likely to be wasted than loans : it may be / 
because, in the latter case, responsibility is always 
incurred ; it may be, because money received as a 



250 B. IV. ch. VI.— gift, or gratuitous loan. 

gift tends to produce prodigality : as it has been 
obtained without labour, it seems to have the less 
value. 

In some cases, capital has been given, n(^t in the 
shape of money, but in that of goods ; by advanc- 
ing to a manufacturer, for example, those articles 
which he wants for the completion of his work. 

This plan may have the good effect of insuring 
the employment of the articles furnished upon the 
intended object. Those articles, however, with 
which the government interferes, are ordinarily 
dearer and worse in quality than those which the 
individual, with the same sum of money, could 
have obtained at his own choice. It is not the best 
method of treating men worthy of confidence ; and 
it will not succeed with those who are unworthy 
of trust, since, after they are put in possession of 
them, they can convert the articles into money, 
and $pend the amount. There may be measures 
which would obviate this danger: inspection, 
suretyship, &c. ; but, when it regards a plan radi- 
cally bad, the discussion of the comparative incon- 
veniences of any particular scheme, whereby the 
risk may be diminished, is not worth the labour it 
would cost. 



t 261 3 



CHAPTER VII. 

BOUNTIES UPON PKODUCTION. 

This mode of encouragement much exceeds 
the two former in the career of absurdity. In the 
two former cases it was an expense, a risk,, with- 
out suJfficient reason for supposing it would prove 
successful, and even without sufficient reason in 
case of success. But a bounty is an expense in- 
curred with the certainty of not obtaining the 
object sought, and even because it is certain that 
it cannot be obtained. 

In the case of a bounty upon production, it is . 
not only the end which is absurd, but the means 
also, which possess this particular character of con- 
tributing nothing towards the end. 

It is uniformly because the trade in question is j 
disadvantageous, that it is necessary to bestow ■ 
money upon its maintenance ; if it were advanta- 'i 
geous, it would maintain itself. It ia because the 
workman is not able to obtain from the buyer a 
price for his merchandise which will yield an or- 
dinary profit, that it is necessary that he should re- 
ceive from the government a bounty which 'shall 
make up the difference. 

Whether the kind of product upon which it 
operates be advantageous or not, the bounty has 
no efficacy in increasing the ability of the pro- 
ducer to augment it. Since it follows the produc- 
tion, since he receives it when the thing is done^ 
and not before, it is' clear that he has possessed 
other means of producing it. The bounty may 



\ 



262 B. IV. ch. VII.— bounties upon production. 

have operated upon his inclination, but it cannot 
have contributed to his ability. 

Bounties have been bestowed upon particular "^ 
branches of trade for all sorts of reasons ; on ac- 
count of their antiquity, on account of their 
novelty, because they were flourishing, because 
they were decaying, because they were advan- 
tageous, because they were burthensome, be- 
cause there were hopes of improving them, and 
because it was feared they would grow worse : 
so that there is no species of commerce in the 
world which could not, by one or other of these 
contrary reasons, claim this kind of favour during 
every moment of its existence. 

It is in the case of an old branch of trade that 
the evil of su(5h measures is most enormous, and 
in that of a new one that its inefficacy is most 
striking. A long established branch of trade is in' 
general widely extended: this extent furnishes 
the best reason for those who solicit these favours 
for its support ; and, to give it effect, it ought at the 
same time to be represented bs gaining ^nd losing; 
gaining, that there maybe a disposition to preserve 
it ; losing, that there may be a disposition to as* 
sist it.* 

I In the case of a new branch of trade or industry, 

\ the futility of the measure is its principal feature. 

Here, there is no reason which carries the mask of 

an apparent necessity — no pompous descriptions 

♦ It is true, though it may not be worth the expense of 
supporting it by bounties with a view to the increase of 
wealth, it may be proper to assist it as a means of subsistence 
or defence. It b still more true, that what ought not to be 
done with the intention of supporting an unprofitable branch 
of trade, may yet be proper for preventing the ruin of the 
workman actually employed in such business : but these are 
objects entirely distinct. 



B.IV.Cii.Vn.^BOUNTIES UPON PRODUCTION. 263 

of its extent. All which can be alleged is that,^/ 
once established, it will become great and lucrative^ 
but what it wants, is to be established. What theii. 
is done for its establishment ? measures are taken 
which can only operate after it is established.' 
When the trade is established, it will have such 
great success that it will yield, for example, fifty 
per cent, profit ; but, to establish it, it requires 
such large advances, that it is doubtful if those who 
possess capital will make them, on account of the 
risks which are almost al ways inseparable from every 
ne,w undertaking. What course does the govern- 
ment pursue ? does it give capital > no, this 
would be foolish. Does it lend capital ? no, this ; 
would be to run too great risk ; it will give a 
bounty upon the article when it shall have been 
made : till then, it says, we shall give no money. 
Thus, to the fifty per cent, you will gain by your 
merchandize, we will add a bounty of ten per cent 
— -very well : and, according to this reasoning, at 
what time will you refuse assistance ? You refuse i 
so long as the bestowment of it will be useful, i 
you grant it in order that something may be done, 
and you do not give it till it is already done by ' 
means independent of you. 

Mistrust, shortsightedness, a suspicious disposi* 
tion, and a confused head, are very susceptible 
of union. Why are bounties preferred to advance 
capital ? they are afraid of being deceived in the 
latter case. If 10,000/. are given at once, nothing 
may perhaps be done : to avoid this risk they give, 
when the thing is done, 10,000/. per annum, which 
they will never receive again. 

Instead of being beneficial, the expense to the 
state becomes more burthen&ome in proportion as 
the trade becomes extended. The bounty insti- 
tuted for one reason, is continued on an opposite 



264 B.IV. Ch. VII.— BOUNTIES UPOt^ PRODUCTION. 

account : at first it was given in order to obtain, 
in the end it is continued for fear of losing, the par- 
ticular branch of trade. What would have been 
necessary for its establishment was a trifle, what 
must be paid for its continuance, knows no bounds. 

The capital bestowed upon a new branch of in- 
dustry for an experiment, is always comparatively 
a small sum; but what is given as a bounty is 
always, or at least it is always hoped that it will be, 
a large one : for unless a large quantity of the 
merchandise is manufactured and sold, and conse- 
quently unless a large bounty is paid for its pro- 
duction and sale, the object'is considered' as \in^ 
accomplished : it is con^sidered that the bounty has 
not answered its end. « 

When the article is one which would not have 
been manufactured without the bounty, all that is 
paid is lost ; but if it be one of those which, even 
without the bounty, the manufacturers would have 
found it their interest to product, only a portion 
of the bounty is lost. As it makes an addi^^ 
tion, and that a very sensible addition to the ordi^ 
nary profit of the trade, it attracts a great number 
of individuals towards this particular enterprise : 
by their competition, the article is sold at the 
lowest rate, and the diminution of price is i in pro- 
portion to the bounty itself (allowance being made 
for the necessary expenses of soliciting and r©-» 
ceiving it). In this state of things it. would 
appear, at first sight, that the bounty does neither 
good nor harm t the public gains by the reduction 
of price as much as it loses by the tax, which is 
the eflFective cause of this reduction. ; 

This would be true, if the individuals who paid 
the tax in the one case wdre the same who profited 
by the bounty in the other, if the measure of this 
profit Vi^ere exactly the measure of their contribu^ 



B.IV. Ch. VII.— BOUNTIES UPON PRODUCTION. 265 

tion, if thev received the one at the same time that 
they paid the other, and if all the labour lost in 
these operations had not cost anything. But all 
these suppositions are contrary to fact. .There are 
not two taxes which affect all the members of the 
state: there is not one which affects them all 
equally. The tax is paid a long time bef6re the 
indemnification, by the reduction of price, is re- 
ceived, and the expenses of this useless circulation 
are always considerable. 

After all that can be said, it is clear that a 
bounty upon production cannot, in the long run, 
produce an increased abundance of the article in 
question^ whatsoever maybe thediminution of price 
which may result from it. The profit which the pro- 
ducer will obtain is not greater than before : the only 
difference is, that it comes to him from another 
hand.' It is not individuals who give it him in a 
direct manner, it is the government. Without the 
bounty, those who pay for the article are those who 
enjoy it : with the bounty, they only pay directly 
a part of the price ; the rest is paid by the public 
in general; that is to say, more or less, by those 
who derive no advantages from it.* '^ 

Although a bounty upon production addsj 
nothing to the abundance of any article of general ■ 
• consumption, it diminishes the price to the buyer. ■ 
Suppose that, in Scotland, there were a bounty 
upon the production of oats, and that the bounty 
were paid by a tax upon beer brewed from this 

frain, oats would not be more abundant than 
efore ; but they would be sold at a less price to 
the buyer (though the merchant would make the 

* Adam Smith has made a mistake in sayings that a bounty 
upon production was a means of abundance^ on which account 
it was better thsuoi a bouoty on exportation.. 



266 B. IV. Cu. VII.— BOUNTIES UPON PRODUCTION. 

same profit), whilst the beer brewed with this graip 
would be proportionally dearer : the consumer of 
oats would not find himself richer than before, but 
fot the same price he would have a greater quantity 
of this grain in the form of food, and less in the 
shape of drink. 

I speak here of relative abundance, in proportion 
to the ordinary consumption; ispeak of superfluity 
compared with habitual wants. The lower this 
commodity is in price, compared with others, the 
greater will be the demand for it. More will be 
produced in consequence of the increased demand, 
but more will not be produced than is demanded. 
The commodity, as it respects abundance, will re- 
main upon the same footing as before. If a su- 
perfluity is required, if a quantity be required ex- 
ceeding what is commonly produced, other mea^ 
sures must be resorted to than a bounty on pro- 
duction. 

If a bounty upon production could be justified. 
It would seem that it ought to be so in the case 
where the article thus favoured was an article of 
general consumption — as, corn in England, oats in 
Scotland, potatoes in Ireland, and rice in India; 
but it would only appear so as a means of pro- 
ducing equality, and not under any other point of 
view. In fact, this measure does not tend to pro- 
duce abupdance — what it does, is to take the 
money out of the pockets of the rich to put it 
into the pockets of the poor. A commodity of 
general consumption is always the most necessary 
of all the articles of life : it is always that of 
which the poor make the greatest use. The richer 
a man is, the more he consumes of other commodi- 
ties beside this universal commodity. Suppose, 
then, a bounty upon the production of oats in 
Scotland; if nothing is consumed there but oats, 



B. IV. Ch. VII.— bounties UPON PRODUCTION. 267 

or if there is only a tax upon oats, the persons 
who reap the advantage of the bounty would be 
those who bear the burthen of the tax, and that 
in the same proportion, inasmuch as the expense 
of levying the tax would be the only result of this 
measure. But commodities of all kinds are con- 
sumed in Scotland, and taxes are there levied 
upon a great variety of commodities. Oats, the 
commodity of the poor, being the object not of a 
tax but a bounty, and the articles consumed by 
the rich being the object not of a bounty but of a 
tax, from the produce of which the bounty upon 
the production of oats is paid, the result will be, 
that the poor will obtain the commodity of which 
they make the greatest use at a lower price. 

I agree to this; but does it follow that their 
condition will be bettered ? Not at all. Oats 
will be sold to the poor at a lower price, but they 
will have less money wherewith to buy them. All 
the means of subsistence in this class resolve 
themselves into the wages of labour; but the 
wages of labour necessarily depend upon the 
degree of opulence which a country possesses; 
that is, upon the quantity of capital applicable to 
the purchase of labour in connection with the 
number of those whose labour is for sale. The 
low price resulting from the bounty will produce 
no advantage to the labourers, whilst the wealth of 
th€| country remains the same: if the commodity be 
lowered in price, they will be less paid ; or, what 
comes to the same thing, as they work for a ration 
of oats, they will be obliged to give more labour 
for this ration if oats are at a lower price. 

All that relates to this mode of encouragement 
may be summed up in a few words. 

The natural course of things gives a bounty 
upon the application of industry to the most 

17 



268 B. IV. ch. VIII.— bounties upon production. 

advantageous branches, a bounty of which the 
division will always be made in the most equitable 
manner. If artificial bounties take the same course 
as the natural, they are superfluous ; if they take 
a different course, they are injurious. 



t 259 J 



CHAPTER VIIL 

EXEMPTIONS FROM TAXES ON PRODUCTIOJf* 

An exemption from a tax capable of being im- 
posed upon any article in the hands of the maker/ 
or seller, is a modification of a bounty upon pro- j 
duction ; it is a disguised bounty. f 

This kind of negative favour may be extended 
to every species of tax upon trade. The methods 
of encouragement in this way are as numerous as 
those of discouragement. If, of two rival manu- 
factures, the one is weighed down by a tax, and 
the other free, that which is taxed is, in respect of 
that which is not, in the same situation as if both 
were free from taxes, and a bounty were bestowed 
upon one. 

Jiut each manufacture is a rival to every other } 
if this rivalry is not special, it is at least general 
and indirect. For what reason ?— ^because the 
power of purchasing is limited, as to every indi- 
vidual, by his fortune and his credit. Every arti- 
cle which is for sale, and which he can desire, is 
in a state of competition with every other ; the 
more he expends for the one, the less can he spend 
for the others. 

Exemption from taxes upon production cannot 
be blamed absolutely ; for it is to be wished, if the 
thing were possible, that there were no taxes* 
But, relatively, any particular exemption may be 
blamed, when the article exempted has nothing 
which justifies this particular exemption. If it 
were equally fit for taxation, the favour granted to 
it is an injury to other productions. 

17. 



260 B. IV. ch. viii.-exemptions from taxes, &c. 

That an object fit for taxation be exempt, is an 
evil. It renders necessary some other tax, which 
by the supposition is less proper, or it allows some 
injurious tax to renvain* 

Whilst, as to advantage, there is none. If more 
of this untaxed merchandise is produced, less is 
produced of that which is taxed. 

The evil of an unjust tax is all the difference 
between a more or less eligible tax, and the worst 
of those which exist. 



[ 261 ] 



CHAPTER IX. 



BOUNTIES ON EXPORTATION. 

In the case of Bounties upon Exportation^ the 
error is not so palpable as in that of Bounties upon 
Production, but the evil is greater. In both cases, 
the money is equally lost : the difference is in the 
persons who receive it. What you pay for pro-/ 
duction, is received by your countrymen; what! 
you pay for exportation, you bestow upon stran-j 
gers. It is an ingenious scheme for inducing a 
foreign nation to receive tribute from you without 
being aware of it ; a little like that of the Irishman 
who passed his light guinea, by cleverly slipping it 
between two halfpence. 

As a bounty upon production may sustain a 
disadvantageous trade, which would cease with- 
out it, by forming its sole profit, it is also possible 
that it may for a short time increase the profit of 
an advantageous trade, which would support itself 
without this aid. 

Does the bounty support a disadvantageous 
trade? It does not produce a farthing of profit 
more than would have existed without it. Left to 
itself, this trade would have ceased and made way 
for a better ; and the community loses the profits 
of a capital better employed in lucrative under- 
takings. 

Does the bounty support an advantageous trade? 
The evil, in the end, will be greater, because the 
extra profit drawing more rivals into this career, 
their competition will reduce the price so low, that 



262 B.IV. Cm. IX.— BOUNTIES ON EXPORTATION. 

the bounty will constitute at last the whole profit 
of this trade. 

However, till the price is thus reduced, the 
bounty is a net gain for the first undertaker^ ; and, 
the consumers being our fellow-countrymen, a 
part of this ill-employed money turns to their ad- 
vantage by the low price of the commodity. 

But in the case of a bounty upon exportation, 
the nation which pays it never receives any advan- 
tage: everything is lost, as if it were thrown into 
the sea, or at least as if it had been given to 
foreigners. 

Without this bounty, the article would have been 
exported, or it would not. It would have been 
exported, if foreigners were willing to pay a price 
which would cover the expense of the manufactur- 
ing, of exporting, and the ordinary profit of trade. 
It would not have been exported, if they did not 
offer a sufficient price. In the first case, they would 
have obtained the article by paying its worth ; in 
the second case, this disadvantageous commerce 
would not have been carried on. 

Suppose a bounty upon exportation, what are 
its effects? The foreigners who heretofore had 
found the article too dear, become disposed to pur- 
chase it : why ? Because you pay them to induce 
them to do so. The more government gives to the 
exporter, the less need the foreigner give. But it 
is clear that he will not pay more than the lowest 
price which will satisfy the exporter : he need not 
give more ; since, if one merchant refuses to sup- 
ply him at this price, another will be quite ready 
to do it. 

Suppose an article of our manufacture, already 
purchased by foreign nations without a bounty 
upon its exportation, what will happen if a bounty 



B.IV. Ch. IX— BOUNTIES ON EJ^PORTATION. 263 

is given? Solely the lowering of its price to the 
foreigners. A bounty of one penny for every 
pound 4n weight is given upon an article which 
sells for five pence per pound ; the nnanufacturer 
would not have found it worth while to have sold 
it for less than five pence per pound ; he will now, 
however, find the same profit in selling it for four 
pence, because his own government makes up the 
difference. He will sell at four pence, because, 
if he do not, some other will ; and, because, in this 
case, instead of selling for five pence, it may happen 
that he will not sell at all. Thus the whole which 
government gives is a net saving to the foreigners: 
the effect in the way of encouragement is nothing. 
The whole which is exported with the bounty is 
neither more nor less than would be without it.* 

Though a bounty does not render such a branch 
of trade more flourishing than it would otherwise 
have been, it will not render it less flourishing ; 
but the more flourishing it becomes, the greater 
will be the loss* to the nation. 

Disadvantageous branches of trade are often 
spoken of. People are uneasy; they fear that 
certain manufactures, left to themselves, will be 
unprofitable. It arises from error: it is not possible 
that any branch of trade, left to itself, can be disad- 
vantageous to a nation: it may become so by the 
interference of government, by bounties, and other 
favours of the same nature. It is not to the mer- 
chant himself" that it can become disadvantageous ; 
for the moment he perceives there is nothing to be 
gained, he will not persevere in it; but to the 
nation in general it may become so, — to the na- 

* The same effect is produced when it is endeavoured to 
favour the importation of corn, for example^ by giving a 
bounty to the first importers. Its effect is to increase the price 
in foreign countries. 



264 B. IV. Ch.IX.— BOUiNTIES ON £XP0RTATlON. 

tion, in its quality of contributor ; and the amount 
of the bounty is the exact amount of the loss. 

The Irishman who passed his light guinea was 
very cunning; buMhere have been French and 
English more cunning than he, who have taken 
care not to be imposed upon by his trick. When 
a cunning individual perceives you have gained 
some point with him, his imagination mechani- 
cally begins to endeavour to get the advantage of 
vou, without examining whether he would not do 
better were he to leave you alone. Do you appear 
to believe that the matter in question is advanta- 
geous to you — he is convinced by this circum- 
stance that it is proportionally disadvantageous to 
him, and that the safest line of conduct for him to 
adopt, is to be guided by your judgment. Well 
acquainted with this disposition of the human 
mind, an Englishman laid a wager, and placed 
himself upon the Pont-neuf, the most public tho- 
roughfare in Paris, offering to the passengers a 
crown of six francs for a piece of twelve sous. 
During half a day he only sold two or three. 

Since individuals in general are such dupes to 
their self-mistrust, is it strange that governments, 
having to manage interests which they so little 
understand, and of which they are so jealous, 
should have fallen into the same errors ? A govern- 
ment, believing itself clever, has given a bounty 
upon the exportation of an article, in order to force 
the sale of it among a foreign nation ; what does 
this other nation in consequence ? Alarmed at the 
sight of this danger, it takes all possible methods 
for its prevention. When it has ventured to pro- 
hibit the article, everything is done. It has refused 
the six franc pieces for twelve sous. When it has 
not dared to prohibit it, it has balanced this bounty 
by a counter bounty upon some article that it ex- 



B. IV. Ch. IX.— bounties ON EXPORTATION. 266 

ports. Not daring to refuse the crowns of six 
francs for twelve sous, it has cleverly slipped some 
little diamond between the two pieces of money, 
and thus the cheat is cheated. 

A strife of this nature, painted in its true colours, 
and stripped of the eclkt which dazzles by the 
magnitude of the object and the dignity of the 
agents, appears too absurd to be possible ; but for 
one example among a thousand, we may refer to 
what has happened between England and Ireland 
respecting the trade in linens. 



[ 266 ] 



I 



CHAPTER X. 

PROHIBITION OF RIVAL PRODUCTIONS. 

This pretended mode of encouragement can 
never be productive of good ; but it may produce 
evil : hurtful or useless, such is ttie alternative. 

1. I say useless. It is a particular privilege of 
this exercise of power, to be employed in certain 
cases without doing any harm; and these cases 
occur when the branch of production or trade 
which is prohibited would not have been intro- 
duced, even had there been no prohibition. In 
former times, it was declared felony in England to 
import pollards and crocards, a kind of base coin at 
that time. This prohibition is yet in existence, 
without producing any inconvenience. If, with the 
intention of encouraging the increase of poultry, 
or with any other similarly patriotic view, the im- 
portation and increase of phoenixes were prohi- 
bited, it is clear that the trade in poultry would 
neither gain nor lose much. 

Among all the species of manufacture which 
England, with so much anxiety, has prohibited to 
her colonies, there are many which, in comparison 
with agriculture, are no more suitable to the 
Americans than the breeding of phoenixes, the 
cultivation of pine-apples in their fields, or the 
manufacture of stuffs from spiders^ webs. 

Were the articles of foreign manufacture, loaded 
with the expenses of importation, neither better in 
quality nor lower in price than the articles of home 
manufacture, they would not be imported ; the 
prohibition exists in the nature of things. 



B.IV. ChX.— PROHIBITION OF RIVAL PRODUCTIONS. 267 

2. Hurtful. By the prohibition of a rival ma-^ 
nufacture, you wish to insure the success of a 
favoured manufacture, and you at once create all | 
the mischiefs of a monopoly. You enable the ! 
monopolists to sell aTsr higher rate, and you di- 
minish the number of enjoyments ; you grant them 
the singular privilege of manufacturing inferior ar- 
ticles, or of ceasing to improve them ; you weaken 
the principle of emulation, which exists only when 
there is competition ; in short, you favour the 
enriching of a small number of individuals at the 
expense of all those who would have enjoyed the 
benefit; you give to a few bad manufacturers an 
excessive degree of wealth, instead of supplying 
the wants of ten thousand good ones ; you also 
wound the feelings of the people, by the idea of 
injustice and violence attached to the partiality of 
this measure. 

Prohibitions of foreign manufactures are most 
frequently applied to those objects which foireign- 
ers can supply less expensively, on account of 
some peculiar advantage arising from their soil or 
their industry. By such prohibitions, you refuse 
to participate in this natural advantage which they 
^"joy ; you prefer what costs you more capital and 
labour; you employ your workmen and your capi- 
tal at a loss, rather than receive. from the hands of 
a rival what he offers you of a better quality or at 
a lower price. If you hope, by this means, to 
support a trade which would otherwise cease, it 
may be supported it is true; but, left to itself, 
capital would only leave this cheinnel where its 
disadvantages are unavoidable, to enter upon 
others where it would be employed with greater 
advantage. The greatest of all errors is to suppose, 
that by prohibitions, whether of foreign or domes- 
tic manufactures, more trade can be obtained. 



268 B.1V. CH.X.— PROHIBITION OF RIVAL PRODUCTIONS. 

The quantity of capital, the efficient cause of all 
increase, remaining the same, all the increase thus 
given to a favoured commerce is so much taken 
from other branches. 

The collateral evils of this prohibitory system 
ought not to be forgotten. It is a source of ex- 
pense, of vexation, and of crimes. 

The expense most evidently lost, is that of the 
custom-house officers, the inspectors, and other 
individuals employed ; but the greatest loss is 
that of labour, both of the unproductive labour of 
the smuggler and of those who are, or who appear 
to be, employed in the prevention of smuggling. 

X To destroy foreign commerce, it is only neces- 
sary to sell everything and to purchase nothing : 
such is the folly which has been passed off as the 
depth of political wisdom among statesmen. 

Among the transactions between nation and 
nation, men have consented, at great expense, to 
support disadvantageous manufactures, that they 
may not buy of their rivals. We do not see such 
monstrous extravagance on the part of individuals. 
If a merchant were to act thus, we should say he 
was hastening to ruin ; but his interest guides him 
much better. It is only public functionaries who 
are capable of this mistake, and they only when 
they are acting on account of others. 

Covetousness desires to possess more than it can 
hold. Malevolence likes better to punish itself 
than to allow a benefit to an adversary. 

To have its eyes greater than its belly j is a pro- 
verb which nurses apply to children, and which 
always applies to nations. An individual corrects 
this fault by experience.^ The politician, when 
once affected by it, never corrects himself. 

When a child refuses physic, mothers and nurses 
sometimes induce it to take it by threatening to 



B.IV. Ch.X.— PROHIBITION OF RIVAL PRODUCTIONS. 269 

give it to the dog or the cat. How m^ny states- 
men, children badly educated, persist in supporting 
a commerce by which they lose, that they may 
avoid the mortification of allowing a rival nation to 
carry it on. 

The statesman who believes he can infinitely 
extend commerce without perceiving that it is 
limited by the amount of capital, is the child whose 
eyes are larger than his belly. 

The statesman who strives to retain a disadvan- 
tageous commerce, because he fears another nation 
will gain it, is the child who swallows the bitter 
pill for fear it should be given to the dog or the cat. 

These are not noble comparisons, but they are 
just ones ; when errors cover themselves with an 
imposing mask, one is tempted to set them in a 
light which will show them to be ridiculous. 



. ' ; ' 



[ 270 ] 



CHAPTER XL 



FIXATION OF PRICES. 



The limitation of the price of commodities may 
have two opposite objects : 1 . The rendering them 
dearer : 2. The rendering them cheaper. 

The first of these objects is least natural: so 
many commodities, so many means of enjoy- 
ment : to put them within the reach of the largest 
number, is to contribute to the general happiness. 
This motive, however, is not unexampled, and in- 
toxicating liquors are an instance of its exercise* 
Legislators have often endeavoured, and not with- 
out reason, to increase their price, with the design 
of limiting their consumption on account of their 
dearness. But imposing a tax upon them suffices 
to increase their price ; there is no necessity for re- 
sorting to the method of direct limitation. 

Is the design of these limitations the obtaining 
of the article at a low rate — the method will 
scarcely answer its end. Before the existence of 
the law, the article was sold at what may be called 
its average or natural price ^ that is to say, it was 
confined within certain limits: 1. by the compe- 
tition between the buyers and the sellers : 9. by 
a competition between the branch of trade in ques- 
tion, and that of other branches to which the mer- 
chant might find it to his advantage to transfer his 
capital. 

Does the law endeavour to fix the price at 
a lower rate than this average or natural prtce-^ 
it may obtain a transient success, but by little 



B. IV. Ch. XI.— fixation OF PRICES. 271 

• 

and little this branch of trade will be abandoned. 
If the constraint is increased, the evil will grow 
worse, the constraint in fact can only act upon the 
existing stock ; this being sold at a forced price, the 
merchant will take care not to replace it. What 
can the law effect ? Can it oblige him to reple- 
nish bis storehouse with the same commodities ? 
No legislator has ever attempted it, or at least no one 
has ever attempted it with success. This would 
be to convert the officers of justice into commercial 
agents, it would be to give them a right to dispose 
of the capitals of the merchants, and to employ the 
merchants themselves as their clerks. 

The most common fixation has been that of the 
rate of interest. It will form the subject of another 
chapter. 

The fixation of the price of wages (especially 
with regard to agriculture) has often been pro- 
posed, and even carried into effect, for the most 
opposite reasons : to prevent what is considered 
as an excess; to remedy what has been regarded 
as a deficiency. 

In this latter point of view, this measure is 
liable to great objection. To fix the minimum of 
wages, is to exclude from labour many workmen 
who would otherwise have been employed ; it is 
to aggravate the distress you wish to relieve. In 
fact, all that can be done, is limited to determining 
that, if they are employed they shall not receive 
less than the price fixed : it is useless to enact that 
they shall be employed. Which is the farmer, 
where is the manufacturer, who will submit to em- 
ploy labourers who cost them more than they 
yield ? In a word, a regulation which fixes the 
minimum of wages, is a regulation of a prohi- 
bitory jiature, which excludes from the com- 



272 B. IV. Ch. XI.— nXATION OF PRICES. 

petition all whose labour is not worth the price 
fixed. 

The fixation of the rate of wages, in order to pre- 
vent their excess^ is a favour conferred on the rich 
at the expense of the poor ; on the master at the 
expense of the workman. It is a violation, with 
regard to the weakest class, of the principles of se- 
curity and property. 



[ 273 ] 



CHAPTER XII. 

TAXES EFFECTS ON PRODUCTION. 

Taxes ought to have no other end than the 
production of revenqe, with as light a butthen as 
possible.* When it is attempted to employ them 
as indirect means of encouragement or discourage- 
ment for any particular species of industry, go- 
vernment, as we have already seen, only succeeds 
in deranging the natural course of trade, and in 
giving it a less advantageous direction. 

The effects of particular taxes may appear very 
complicated and difficult to trace. By considering 
the subject in a general point of view, and distin- 
guishing the permanent from the temporary effects 
of taxes, this complexity will be disentangled and 
the difficulty disappear. 

First question : What are the effects of a tax im^ 
posed by a foreign nation upon the articles of our 
manufacture ? 

Permanent consequences :-— 1. If the exporta- 
tion is not diminished, the tax makes no differ- 
ence with respect to us: it is only paid by the 
consumers in the state wbicfb^ imposes the tax. 

2. If the exportation is diminished, the capital 
which was employed in this branch of manufacture 
withdraws itself and passes into others. 

* This principle may admit some exceptions^ but they are 
very rare -, for example^ a tax may be imposed upon intoxl^ 
eating liquors, with the design of diminishing their consump- 
tion by io creasing their price. 

18 



274 B.IV. Ch.XII.— TAXES— EFFECTS ON PRODUCTION. 

Temporary consequences: — This diminution of 
exportation ocicasions a proportional distress among 
the individuals interested in this species of in- 
dustry. The workmen lose their occupations ; 
they are obliged to, undertake labours to which 
they are unaccustomed, and which yield them 
less. As to the master manufacturer, a part of 
his fixed capital is rendered useless; he loses 
his profits in proportion as the manufacture is 
reduced. 

Second question : What are the effects of a tax^ 
imposed by ourselves^ upon the manufactures we 
ourselves consume / 

Permanent consequences : — 1 . If the consump- 
tion is not diminished, no other difference is pro- 
duced than the disadvantage of the tax to the 
consumer, and a proportional advantage for the 
public. 

S. If the consumption is diminished, indivi- 
duals are deprived of that portion of happiness 
which coQsisted in the use of this particular ar- 
ticle of enjoyment. 

3. Capital, in this as in the preceding case, re- 
tires from this branch and passes into others. 

Temporary consequences : — If the consumption 
is not diminished, the tax makes no difference: if 
it is diminished, similar distress, in proportion as 
in the case above. 

Third question : What are the consegtiences of a 
tax J imposed by ourselves^ upon the manufactures of 
our own country consumed by foreigners ? 

Permanent consequences: — 1. Whilst the con- 
sumption is not diminished, the operation produces 
so much clear gain for us. The burthen of the tax 
is borne by the foreigner, and the profit is reaped 
by ourselves. 



B. IV. ch. XII.— taxes— effects on production. 275 

If the consumption is diminished, the capital 
which loses this employment passes hito others. 

Temporary consequences :— Consumption not 
diminished, no difference to us : consumption 
diminished, similar distress in proportion, as in the 
former cases. 

It results from hence, that the permanent effects 
of these taxes are always of little importance as to 
commerce in general ; and that their temporary 
effects are evil in proportion to the diminution of 
the consumption. The evil is greater or less, 
according as it is more or less easy to transfer 
capital and labour from one branch of industry to 
another. 

The least hurtful of these taxes are those which 
bear upon our own productions consumed by 
foreigners. If the same quantity is exported after 
the, tax as before, so far from being prejudicial, it 
yields us a clear benefit: it is a tribute levied upon 
them precisely as if it were raised out of the.bowels 
of the earth. 

The tax imposed by us upon foreign importa- 
tions is paid by ourselves, and burthensome as any 
other tax would be to the same amount. If the 
consumption is not diminished, it would be better 
that the tax upon this article should be imposed 
by us, that we might profit by it, rather than the 
country which produced it, and which would 
otherwise enjoy the benefit. 

A nation, which has a natural monopoly of an 
article necessary to foreigners, has a natural means 
of taxing them for its own profit. Let us take tin 
for an example: Eagland is the only country which 
has mines of this metal, at least all others are too 
inconsiderable to satisfy the demand. . England 
might, therefore, lay a considerable tax upon the 

18. 



276 B. IV. Crt. XII.— TAXES— EFFECTS ON PRODUCTION. 

exportation of tin, without danger of smuggling, 
because it might be levied at the mine, or at the 
foundry. France could not impose an equal tax, 
because it would give too great an allurement to 
the smugglers. 

These principled are easy of application to com- 
mercial treaties : everything which is permanent, 
whether it be called encouragement or discou- 
ragement, has but little effect upon trade and 
commerce in general ; since trdde and commerce 
are always governed by the capital which can be 
employed on them. But international precautions 
may be taken for the prevention of rapid changes, 
from which temporary distresses result. Let every 
nation make a sacrifice by refusing to impose taxes, 
or to augment them, upon articles of its own ex- 
portation: every nation would then receive indem- 
nification by a reciprocal sacrifice. Commerce 
would thus acquire stability; and that petty fiscal 
warfare would no longer be carried on, which pro- 
duces a dangerous irritation among the people, 
always greatly disproportioned to the importance 
of the object. 

The object of the first chapter of the Commer- 
cial Code ought to be to show the reciprocity of in- 
ternational interests, to prove that there is no 
impropriety, during the continuance of peace, in 
favouring the opulence of foreigners; no merit in 
opposing it. 

It may happen to be a misfortune that our 
neighbour is rich; it is certainly one that he be 
poor. If he be rich, we may have reason to fear 
him ; if he be poor, he has little or nothing to sell 
to, or to buy of, us. 

But that ne should become an object of dread, 
by reason of^ an increase in riches, it is necessary 



B. IV. ch. XII.— taxes-effkcts on production. 27'? 

that this prosperity should be his alone. He will 
have no advantage, if our wealth has made the 
sanie progress as his own, or if this progress has 
taken place in other nations equally well disposed 
with ourselves to repress him. 

Jealousies against rich nations are only founded 
upon mistakes and misunderstandings : it is with 
these nations that the most profitable commerce is 
carried on ; it is from theise that the returns are the 
most abundant, the most rapid, and the most 
certain. 

Great capitals produce the greatest division of 
labour, the most perfect machines, the most active 
competition among the merchants, the most ex- 
tended credits, and, consequently, the lowest price. 
Each nation, in receiving from the richest every- 
thing which it furnishes, at the lowest rate, and 
of the best quality, would be able to devote its 
capital exclusively to the most advantageous 
branches of industry. 

Wherefore do governments give so marked a 
preference to export trade ? 

1. It is this branch which exhibits itself with 
the greatest show and eclat : it is this which is 
most under the eyes of the governors ; and which 
therefore most strongly excites their attention. 

2. This commerce more particularly appears 
to them as their work : they imagine they are 
creators ; and inaction appears to them a species 
of impotence. 

All these pretensions fall before the principle, 
that production is subordinate to capital. These 
new branches of trade, these remote establish- 
ments, these costly encouragements, produce no 
new creations ; it is only a new employment of 
a part of one and the same capital which was 



278 B. lY. ch. XII.— taxes— effects on production. 

not idle before. It is a new service, which is 
performed at the expense of the old. The sap 
which by this operation is strained through a new 
branch, being diverted from another, gives a dif- 
ferent product, but not an increase of produce. 



£ 279 ] 



CHAPTER XIII. 

POPULATION FORCED— INCREASE DESIRABLE? 

Many volumes have been written upon the sub- 
ject of population, because the means of promot- 
ing its increase have generally been the subject of 
examination. I shall be very short upon this 
subject, because I shall confine myself to shewing 
that all these means are useless. 

If anything could prevent men from marrying, 
it would be the trouble which is pretended to be 
taken to induce them to marry. So much uneasi- 
ness upon the part of the legislator can only in- 
spire doubts respecting the happiness of this state. 
Pleasures are made objects of dread when con- 
verted into obligations. 

Would you encourage population ? render men 
happy, and trust to nature. But that you may 
render men happy, do not govern them too much. 
Do not constrain them even in their domestic 
arrangements, and above all, in that which can 
please only under the auspices of liberty. In a 
word, leave them to live as they like, under the 
single condition of not injuring one another. 

Population is in proportion to the means of 
subsistence and wants. Montesquieu, Condillac, 
Sir James Stewart, Adam Smith, the economists, 
have only one opinion upon this subject.* Ac- 

• The name of Mr. Malthus, who will for the future oc- 
cupy tha post of honour in political economy upon the subject^ 
of population, is not mentioned here, because this work was 
many years anterior to his. This chapter, with many other 
fragments, was communicated to the authors of the Bibliotheque 



280 B.1V. Cb. XIII.— POPULATION FORCED-INCREASB, &c. 

cording to this principle, there is also a means of 
increasing population, but there is only one : it 
consists in increasing the national wealth, or, to 
speak more correctly, in allowing it to increase. 

Young women, says Montesquieu, are sufficiently 
ready to marry. How should they not be ? The 
pleasures, the avowed sentiments of love, are only 
permitted in this condition : it is thus only tha 
they are emancipated from a double subjection, 
and that they are placed at the head of a little em« 
pire. // is the young men, he adds, who nead to be 
encouraged. 

But why ? Do the motives which lead men to 
marry want force ? It is only by marriage that a 
man can obtain the favours of the woman who, in 
in his eyes, is worth all others. It is only by mar- 
riage that he can live freely and publicly with an 
honest and respectable woman, and who will live 
only for him. There is nothing more delightful 
than the hope of a family, where proofs of the 
tenderest affections may be given and received; 
where power blended with kindness may be ex- 
ercised ; where confidence and security are found ; 
where the consolations of old age may be treasured 
up; where we may behold ourselves replaced by 
other selves. Where we may say, 1 shall not en- 

Britannique, published at Geneva, and .was inserted in the 
7th vol., in 1798. If Mr. Malthus had known it, he might 
have cited it as an additional proof, that his principle relating 
to population was not a new paradox. But what was new^ 
was to make a rational and connected application of it 5 to 
deduce from it the solution of so many historical problems ; 
to survey Europe with this principle in his hand,* and to prove 
that it cannot be resisted without producing great confusion in 
social order } and this is what Mr. Malthus has accomplished^ 
in a manner as conclusive as respects his arguments, as in- 
teresting in respect of his style and his details. — Note bi^ 

DUMONT. 



B.IV. Ch.XHI.— POPUJUATION FORCED—INCREASE, &c. 281 

tirely die. A man wants an associate, a confidant, 
a counsellor, a steward, a mistress, a nurse, a com- 
panion for all seasons. All these may be found 
united in a wife. What substitute can be pro- 
vided ? ,_ 

It is not among the poor that there is any aver* 
sion to marriage ; that is to say, it is not among the 
labourers; that class, in theincreaseof which, alone, 
the public is interested; that class which consti- 
tutes the strength and creates the wealth of a 
nation ; that class which is the last in the sense- 
less vocabulary of pride, but which the enlightened 
politician regards as the first. 

It is in the country, especially, that men seek to 
marry. A bachelor does not there possess there- 
sources he can find in a town. A husbandman, a 
farmer, require the assistance of a wife, to attend to 
their concerns at all hours of the day. 

The population of the productive classes is 
limited only by their real wants ; that of the un- 
productive classes is limited by their conventional 
wants. 

With regard to these, instead of inducing them 
to marry by invitations, rewards and menaces, as 
did Augustus, we ought to be well pleased when 
they live in celibacy. The increase of the purely 
consumptive classes is neither an advantage to the 
state nor to themselves. Their welfare is exactly 
in the inverse ratio of their numbers. If they 
should insensibly become extinct, as in Holland, 
where there is scarcely one citizen who does not 
exercise some occupation, where >vould be the 
evil ? A workman may in a ihoment be converted 
into an idle consumer. A good workman is not 
so soon made: he needs skill and practice; habits 
of industry are slowly acquired, if indeed, after a 
certain age, they can ever be acquired. On the 



282 B. IV. Ch. XIIL—POPULATION FORCED— INCREASE, ic. 

Other hand, when a consumer passes into the class 
of labourers, it is generally owing to a reverse in 
fortune, and he is in a state ofsuffering. When a 
labourer is transported into the class of consumers, 
he is exalted in his own eyes and in the eyes of 
others, and his happiness is increased. On all 
these accounts, it is desirable that the class of 
idlers be not increased: their own interest requires 
it, and it is also a great good when their number 
is diminished, whether by celibacy or their con- 
version into labourers.* Convents have been con- 



♦ The author is consistent, and Montesquieu appears to me 
not to be so. Book xxiii. ch. x. he has well explained the 
triie principle, but he has not followed it. 

His elogium upon the regulations of Augustus respecting 
marriage, is extremely singular. They have pleased Montes- 
quieu by some vague idea of the protection of manners. They 
violate every principle of reward and piitiishment; they are 
neither analogous or proportional ; they punish a man because 
he is unhappy or prudent, they reward him because he is happy 
or imprudent; they corrupt marriage by mercenary and poli- 
tical views ; and, after all, the object aimed at is missed. Mon- 
tesquieu acknowledges the impotence of these laws. The be- 
nefit of the remedy being null, there remains only the evil. 

He blames Louis XIV. (ch. xxvii.) for not having suflSciently 
encouraged marriage, by only rewarding prodigies of fecundity. 

Louis XIV. did too much by his establishments for the poor 
nobility, and he has been too frequently imitated. Humanity 
was the motive of these foundations ; but this humanity was 
equally productive of evil as it respected those who bore the 
expense, and as it respected the chiss whom it was intended 
to relieve, and who were not relieved. On the contrary, the 
more the indigent of this order were assisted, the more they 
increased. In fact, every individual requires a certain quan- 
tity of wealth to be in a state to marry. Does he marry 
imprudently, his distress is without doubt an evil ; but it 
operates as a warning to other persons of the same class. If 
you oppose this natural eflfect, if you institute foundations for 
families, if you grant pensions or other favours on account of 
marriage, what follows ? It is no longer an establishment 
submitted to calculation, it is a lottery, in which hope is con- 



B.IV. Ch. XIII.— POPULATION FORCED— INCREASE, &c. 283, 

stantly accused of hurting population. Poor con- 
vents, and the mendicant orders, injure it, without 
doubt, since they add to the number of idle con-^ 
sumers. It is not so with rich convents ; they 
add nothing to this number. He who possesses 
the rent of land can command labour without 
working himself; but what matters it whether a 
fund, destined to the support of idlers, be trans- 
mitted from father to son, or from stranger to 
stranger ? 

Large cities are decried : they are the gulphs, 
it is said, in which the population of the country 
is lost. That which is furnished to the towns is 
visible to all the world ; what is received from them, 
is less apparent. It is the ancient quarrel of the 
Belly and the Members. Cultivation increases ia 
proportion to the consumers. People live longer 
in the country ; but that a greater number of per- 
sons may be born there, it is necessary that the 
capital of the towns, which animates labour, 
should be sent thither. 

^his imaginary evil, the increase of towns, has 
excited the most extravagant fears. Absurdity 
has been carried so far, as to make rules for limit- 
ing their bounds : they should rather have been 
made for extending them. They would thus have 

suited rather than prudence : many venture, but few succeed. 
You intended to give support, and you have laid a snare. 
What you did in order to diminish the evil, has only served to 
make it worse. In pity to these unfortunate persons, they 
ought not to be encouraged to marry. When they no longer 
are deceived by hope, they will no longer be unhappy. 

In England there is neither restriction nor encouragement, 
and there is no dread lest the stock of nobility should ftiil ; 
there is no dread lest celibacy should be hurtful to population. 
The shameful and sad misfortune is not known there of the 
existence of a class of persons set apart to idleness and poverty. 
— Note by Du MO NT. 



284 B.IV. Cu. XI II.— POPULATION FORCEO^INCgEASC;, &e. 

prevented contagious disorders ; they would have 
rendered the air more salubrious. The opposite 
regulations do not diminish the number of inba* 
bitants, but oblige them to heap themselves up 
within close habitations, and to build one city 
upon another. 

Are emigrations disadrantageous to a state ? 
Yes, if the emigrants could have found employ-^ 
ment at home : No, if they could not. But it is 
not natural that labourers should exile them-* 
selves, if they could live at home. However, if 
they desire so to do, ought they to be prevented ? 
Cases must be distinguished. It is possible that 
this desire may have been pnroduced by some 
momentary distaste, by some false idea, some 
whim, which mav mislead a multitude of men 
before they have leisure to undeceive themselves. 
1 will not therefore affirm, that circumstances may 
not happen in which emigration may not be for-f 
bidden by a law of short duration ; but to convert 
this prohibition into a perpetual law, is to change 
the country into a prison ; is to publish, in the 
name even of the government itself, that it is 
not good to live there. It would be proper that 
such a law should commence thus — " We, &c., 
ignorant of the art of rendering our subjects happy, 
and well assured that, if we give them an opportu- 
nity to escape, they will go in search of countries 
less oppressed, hereby prohibit,^ &c. 

Would not this be to aggravate the evil } Could 
all the frontiers of a great country be guarded ? 
Louis XIV., with all his authority, could he ac- 
complish it ? As many persons as were thus 
enchained, so many discontented and unhappy 
persons, who would be looked upon with distrust, 
whom it would be necessary perhaps to repress 
by violence, and who would become enemies 



< :. .V -»£&. 



B,iv. ch.xiii.-populatton forced—increase, &c. 285 

when they found themselves treated as such. 
Others, who had never thought of quitting their 
country, would become uneasy when they found 
themselves obliged to remain ; whilst others, who 
might have thought of establishing themselves 
there, would take care not to do it. For those 
individuals retained against their will, you lose 
those who would have come among you volun- 
tarily. 

England has sustained temporary losses of men 
and capital by emigrations to America; but what 
has happened ? she has received from that coun« 
try a mass of productions which have more than 
compensated the loss. The men and capitals 
carried away, employed upon new lands, have 
produced a benefit more considerable for England 
itself, than if they had been employed upon her 
own. To exhibit this clearly, would require a 
multitude of facts and calculations ; but it may be 
presumed to be the case, from the vast extent of 
this new commerce. 

On the subject of emigration, the wisest part 
then is to do nothing. Under the guidance of 
liberty, the benefit is certain ; under the guidance 
of constraint, it is uncertain. 

After this, the advantages of emigration are 
easily estimated. In order to people a country as 
yet untitled, it will be advisable to invite thither 
strangers who depend upon their labour alone. It 
may even be advantageous to make them advances 
for their support, in order to establish them. 

In respect to methods of preventing the destruc- 
tion of the species, they belong to that branch of 
police which is employed about the means of sub- 
sistence and the public health. We may be tran- 
quil, therefore, upon the subject of population.. 
There will be everywhere an abundance of meq, 



286 B.IV. Ch.XIII.—POPULATION FORCfiD— increase, Ac. 

provided they are not deprived, by a hard and ty- 
rannical government, of what is necessary for 
subsistence and enjoyment, of which contentment 
constitutes a part.* 

♦ I have under my eyes a large political work of M. Beau- 
sobre, counsellor to the King of Prussia, in which, at the 
article Populatioriy he gives no less than twenty recipes for in- 
creasing it. The nineteenth is as follows : — " It is proper to 
watch during the fruit season, lest the people eat that which 
is not ripe." He ought to have provided the means for car- 
rying this regulation into execution -, to have indicated the 
number of inspectors who should judge of the ripeness of 
fruit, the watchmen who should -be stationed over it, and the 
magistrates who were to judge of its infractions. 

Another method consists in '' hindering men from marrying 
very disagreeable women.*' He neither says to what judge he 
would remit this delicate inquiry, nor upon what principles he 
would have the ugliness of women proved; nor the degree of 
inquiry which ought to be permitted, nor the fees that ought 
to be paid. The remainder is very nearly in the same taste. 

{lindering the marriage of old men with young women, that 
of young men with women much older than themselves -, hin- 
dering the marriage of persons not likely to have children : 
there are other recipes of this political pharmacopoeia littlie less 
ridiculous, but not less useless. 

His complaints respecting prostitution are reasonable, if they 
had for their object the misery of the class of courtesans, 
victims of a constrained celibacy. They are of no force as 
respects population, which suffers nothing. I refer to what 
has been said upon this subject in Les Traites de Legislatian, 
tom. ii. partie 4. (Ed. 1820) 3 '' Des moyens indirects pour 
prevenir les Delits, ch. 6 : Faire en sorte qu'un desir donne se 
satisfaire sans prejudice, ou avec le moindre prejudice pos- 
sible." 



[ 287 ] 



CHAPTER XIV. 

COLONIES DESIRABLE ? 

\ 

I 

When an excess of population, in relation to 
territory, exists or is foreseen, colonization is a very 
proper measure. As a means of increasing the ge- 
neral wealth of a country, or of increasing the 
revenue of the mother country, it is a very impro- 
per measure. .All the common ideas upon this 
subject are founded in illusions. 

That colonies add to the general wealth of the* 
world, is what cannot be doubted ; for if labour is 
necessary to production, land is no less so. The 
soil also of many colonies, independently of what 
it annually produces, is rich in raw materials, 
which only require that they should be extracted 
and carried away, to give them value. But this 
wealth belongs to the colonists, to those who oc- 
cupy the land, and not to the mother country. 

When first established, colonies are not in a 
condition to pay taxes ; in the end they will nat 
pay them. In order to establish them, to protect 
them, to keep them in dependance, expense is re- 
quired ; and all these expenses must be discharged 
by ta^ces levied upon the mother country. 

Colonization requires an immediate expense, an 
actual loss of wealth, for a future profit, for a con- 
tingent gain. The capital which is carried away 
for the improvement of the land in the colonies, 
had it been employed in the mother country would 
have added to its increasing wealth, as well as to 
its population, and to the means of its defence ; 



288 B.IV. Ch.XIV.— COLONIES DESIRABLE? 

whilst, as to the produce of the colonies, only a 
small part ever reaches the mother country. 

If colonization is a folly when employed as a 
means of enrichment, it is at least an agreeable 
folly. New enjoyments, insomuch as enjoyments 
depend upon the novelty and variety of objects, 
result from it. The substitution of sugar for 
honey ; of tea, coflfee, and chocolate, for the beer 
and meat which composed the breakfast of maids 
of honour in the reign of Elizabeth ; of the indigo 
which varies our dyes ; the cochineal which fur- 
nishes the most brilliant scarlet ; the mahogany 
Mrhich ornaments our Apartments ; the vessels of 
gold and silver which decorate our tables, are all 
sources of enjoyment, and the pleasure which re- 
sults from these objects of luxi^ry is, in part, the 
profit of colonization ; whilst the medicinal and 
nutritive plants which have been received from the 
colonies, in particular bark and potatoes, are pos- 
sessed of much superior utility. 

Novelty and variety, in respect of means of en- 
joyment, add nothing to the quantity of wealth, 
which remains as it was, if the old productions are 
supplanted by the new ones. It is thus also with 
new fruits, new flowers, new colours, new clothes, 
new furniture, if the new supplant the old. But 
as novelty and variety are sources of pleasure, in 
proportion as they are increased, wealth increases 
also, if not in quantity, at least in value. And if 
these new wants are incentives to new labour, a 
positive increase of real wealth results from them. 

These advantages, such as they are, can only be 
derived from a colony situated in a climate whose 
productions cannot be naturalized in the mother 
country ; whilst as to the mines of Mexico and 
Potosi, their effect has been to add to the quantity 



B. IV. Ch.XIV.— COLONIES DESIRABLE ? 289 

of vessels composed of the precious metals and to 
the quantity of coin. The addition to the vessels 
increases the amount of real wealth ; the addition 
to the coin has all been lost : the new mass of gold 
and silver has had no ojlher effect than to depreci- 
ate the old, and to diminish in the same proportion^ 
the value of all pecuniary revenues, without adding 
to the amount of real capital or future wealth. 

However, in taking all interests into the calcula- 
tion, it iscertainthatthewelfareofmankind has been 
increased by the establishment of colonies. There 
can l)e no doubt on this subject, in respect to the 
nations who by degrees have become established 
there, and who owe their existence to coloniza- 
tion ; the mother countries also have themselves 
gained in happiness in another point of view. Let 
* us take England, for example. According to the 
progress which population has made during the last 
century, it may be supposed that it would soon 
have attained its extreme limits, that is to say, that 
it would have exceeded the ordinary means of sub- 
sistence, if the superabundance had not found 
means of discharging itself in these new countries. 
But, along time before population has reached these 
limits, there will be a great diminution of relative 
opulence, a painful feeling of general poverty and 
distress, a superabundance of men in all the labo- 
rious classes, and a mischievous rivalry in offering 
their labour at the lowest price. 

For the benefit of mankind at large, it is desira- 
ble that the offsets which are to be employed as 
new plants, should be taken from the'^most healthy 
stocks and the most flourishing roots ; that the 
people who go forth to colonize unoccupied lands, 
should go forth from the nation whose political 
constitution is most favourable to the security of 
individuals ; that the new colonies should be 

19 



293 B. IV. Ch. XIV^COLONIES DESIRABLE ? 

swarms from the most industrious hive ; and that 
their education should have formed them to those 
habits of frugality and labour which are necessary 
to make transplanted families succeed* 

It may often be advantageous for colonies to re- 
main a long time under the government of the 
mother country, provided always that such govern- 
ment be what it ought to be. 

It would, without doubt, have been advantage- 
ous to Egypt to have remained under the govern- 
ment of Great Britain ; a government which would 
have bestowed upon it peace, security, the fine 
arts, and the enjoyment of the magnificent gifts 
which nature has lavished upon it. But, in respect 
to wealth, the possession of Egypt, far from being 
advantageous to England, would have proved only 
a burthen. 

I hear a universal cry raised against this paradox. 
So many profound politicians, divided upon every 
other point, are unanimous upon the importance 
of colonies, — are they only agreed, that they may 
fall into an error? So many merchants, — have 
they deceived themselves in so simple a calculation 
as that of the profit or loss of colonial commerce ? 
The experience of two or three centuries,— has it 
not opened the eyes of governments ? would it 
not be extraordinary that they should still obsti^ 
nately sustain the enormous weight of these distant 
establishments, if their advantages were not clear 
and manifest ? 

I might reply, that a long train of alchymists, 
after all the misfortunes of their predecessors, long 
continued obstinately to seek after the philoso- 
pher's stone, and that this great work yet has its 
partisans. 1 might reply, that many nations in the 
East have, during many ages, been governed by 
astrology, I might enumerate a long list of errors 



B.IV. Ch. XIV.— COLONIES DESIRABLE? 291 

which have misled both governments and people. 
But a question of this nature ought not to be ob- 
scured by declamation. He who alleges the 
number of partisans by which a system is supported 
instead of supporting it by proofs, desires to inti- 
midate and not to convince his adversary. Let us 
examine all the arguments by which the advan- 
tages of colonies, in respect of wealth, have been 
endeavoured to be proved : we shall not find a 
single one which is not in opposition to the iDost 
firmly established principles of political economy. 

I. The wealth of the colonies is poured into the 
mother country ; it is brought thither by commerce^ 
it consequently animates manufactures^ and they 
support the large toums : the prosperity of Bordeaux^ 
for example, is one proof; its wealth depends upon 
its trade with the West Indies. 

This reasoning proves nothing in favour of a 
system of colonies ; there is no necessity for go- 
verning or possessing any island in order that we 
may sell merchandise there. The inhabitants of 
the Antilles stand in need of the productions of 
England and France. Were they independent 
states, it would still be necessary that they should 
buy them : during their state of dependance whiat 
can they do more ? They will not give their sugars 
to the mother country ; they exchange them for 
corn and cloth. Those who supply these commo- 
dities, if they had not sold them to these parties, 
would have sold them to others. Suppose thatthe 
inhabitants of St. DoitaiBgo, in place of buying 
their corn in France, were to buy it id England; 
France would lose nothing, because, on the whole, 
the consumption of corn would not be less : Eng- 
land having supplied St. Domingo, would not be 
able to supply other countries, which would be 
obliged to supplj^.th^^mselvesftpq^ France. 

19. 



292 B. IV. Cn.XIVi—COLONIES DESIRABLE ? 

Trade is in propprtion to capital. This is the 
principle; the total amount of trade in each 
country is always in proportion tp the capital which 
each country possesses. I am a merchant ; I have 
a capital of 10,000/. employed in commerce; — 
suppose Spanish America were opened to me, 
could I, with my 10,000/., carry on a greater trade 
than I do at present ? Suppose the West Indies 
were shut against me, would my 10,000/. become 
useless in my hands ? should I not be able to apply 
them to some other foreign trade, or to make them 
useful in the interior of the country, or to employ 
them in some enterprise of domestic agriculture ? 
It is thus capital always preserves its value. The 
trade to which it gives birth may change its form 
.or its direction, may flow in different channels, 
may be directed upon one manufacture or another, 
upon foreign or domestic undertakings ; but the 
final result is, that these productive capitals al- 
ways produce ; and they produce the same quan- 
tity, the same value, or at least the difference does 
not deserve attention. 

It is therefore the quantity of capital which 
determines the quantity of trade, and not the ex- 
tent of the market, as has been generally believed. 
Open a new market, the quantity of trade will not, 
unless by some accidental circumstance, be in- 
creased. Shut up an old market^ the quantity of 
trade will not be diminished, unless by i^ccident, 
and only for a moment. 

Should the new market be more advantageous 
than the old ones, in this case the profit wnl be 
greater, the trade may become more extended; 
but the existence of this extra profit is always 
supposed but never proved,* 



Bryan Edwards > hi Mv HMbpj^ «E the West Indies^, even 



X ♦ 



B. IV. Ch. XiV.— colonies DESIRABLE ? 293 

The mistake consists in representing all the pro- 
fit of a new trade, as so much added to. the amount 
of national profit, without considering that the 
same capital employed in any other branch of 
trade would not have been unproductive. People 
suppose themselves to have created^ when they 
have only transferred. A minister pompously 
boasts of certain new acquisitions, certain esta- 
blishments upon far distant shores, and if the ad^ 
ventures which have been made have yielded a 
million profit, for example, he does not fail to be- 
lieve that he has opened a new source of national 
wealth; he supposes that this million profit would 
not have existed without him, whilst he may 
have occasioned a loss : he will have done so, if 
the capital employed in this new trade has only 
yielded ten per cent, and that employed in the 
ordinary trade, has yielded twelve. 

The answer to this first objection may be re-, 
duced to two points. 1. That the possession of 
colonies is not necessary to the carrying on of 
trade with them. 2. That even when trade is not 
carried on with the colonies, the capital which 
such trade would have required, will be applied as 
productively to other undertakings. 

II. The advocates of the colonial system would 
consider the above answer extremely weak ; they 

in exaggerating the utility of colonies, does not suppose the 
rate of profit upon capitals employed in the plantations greater 
than seven per cent.> whilst it is fifteen per cent, upon capital 
employed in the mother country.* 

* This fifteen per cent, was taken from one of the finance pamphlets 
of Treasury Secretary Rose. Some years before, to a question put by me 
to the late Sir Francis Baring, the answer was, six per cent. This meant, 
of course, over and above interest^ then at five per cent.-^Commfmko/ec/ 
by the Author, 



294 B. IV. ch. xiv.--coi/)nies desirable ? 

see in this commerce two circumstances which 
render it more advantageous than that which is 
carried on with free nations. 

" We established ^^^ say they, " a double mono- 
paly against the colonist y'^rst, the monopoly of their 
productions^ which we permit them to sell to us 
aioncy and which we thus obtain from them ut the 
lowest price. Secondly, the monopoly of their pur- 
Phases, which we oblige them to make among our- 
selves, so that we are able to sell our produce and 
manufactures to them, at a dearer - rate than we 
could to a free people, among whom, other nations 
would enter into competition with us.^^ 

Let us examine the effect of these two mono- 
polies separately. 

• 1. You prevent your colonies from selling their 
productioqs to any but yourselves ; but you caq- 
not oblige them to cultivate their lands, or to ma- 
nufacture at a loss. There is a natural price for 
every commodity, determined by the average rate 
of profit in commerce in general. If the cultiva- 
tor connot obtain this natural price, he will not 
continue to cultivate ; he will apply his capital to 
other undertakings. The monopoly may produce 
^forced reduction of price ybr a time; but the co- 
lonist will not continue to cultivate sugar, if he 
lose by its cultivation instead of gaining. It is 
therefore impossible for this monopoly to produce 
R constant reduction of the price of commodities 
below their natural price ; whilst free competi- 
tion is sufficient to reduce them and keiep them 
at this natural price. The high price which you 
wish to remedy by the monopoly is an evil which 
will cure itself. Large profits in any one branch 
of trade will draw thither a large number of com- 
petitors : all merchants are rivals, and their rivalry 



B. iV. Ctt. XIV.— COLONIES DESIRA^E ? 295 

naturally produces a reduction of price, till the 
rate of profit in each particular branch of trade is 
upon a level with all others. 

2. You may oblige your colonist to buy every 
thing of you, but the advantage you expect to 
derive from this exclusive commerce is decep- 
tive. 

If it respect commodities and manufactures, 
which, owing to a natural superiority, you are 
enabled to furnish of better quality and at a lower 
price than foreigners, it is clear that, without mo- 
nopoly, your colonists would rather buy them of 
you than of others. The monopoly will not en- 
able you to sell them at a higher price ; your mer- 
chants, being all in a state of competition with 
each other, naturally seek to support each other by 
offering their goods at the lowest price possible. 

While as to the productions and other articles 
which you are not able to furnish them upon 
terms equally favourable with foreigners, it is 
certain that, without the monopoly, your colonists 
will not buy them of you. Ought we to conclude, 
that the monopoly will be advantageous to you ? 
Not in the least. The nation in general will gain 
nothing. It will only follow, that a species of in- 
dustry will be cultivated among you, which does 
not naturally suit you ; that bad commodities will 
be produced, and bad manufactures carried on. 

The monopoly is similar to a reward bestowed 
by government, for the maintenance of manufac- 
tures inferior to those of other nations. If this 
monopoly did not exist, the same capital would be 
applied to other species of industry in which you 
have a decided advantage. Instead of losing by 
this arrangement, you will.gain a more stable pros- 
perity ; since the manufactures, which cannot be 
maintained but by forced means, are exposed to a 



296 B.1V. Ch. X1V.—C0L0N1£S DESIRABLE? 

thousand vicissitudes. Observe further, that this 
monopoly is burthened with a counter monopoly. 
It is not permitted to you to purchase productions 
similar to those of your colonies, when you find 
them elsewhere at a lower price. In compensation 
for the restraint you impose upon your colonies, 
you iniposeone upon yourselves. If they can buy 
only of you, you can buy only of them. How 
many inconveniences result from this! When 
the harvest has been deficient in your colonies, 
you are not able to supply yourselves from those 
places where the season has been more favourable; 
in the midst of abundance you are suffering from 
dearth. The monopoly has no effect in lowering 
the price of commodities ; but the counter mono- 
poly is certain occasionally to produce extraordi- 
narily high prices. 

III. The partisans of the colonial system con- 
sider colonies under another point of view — the 
advantage they produce to the revenue. The taxes 
levied upon the commerce of the colonies^ whether 
upon importation or upon exportation, produce a 
revenue which would cease, or be much diminished, 
if they were independent. 

The taxes levied upon the commerce with the 
colonies may produce a considerable amount; but 
if they were free, would they carry on no com- 
merce ? Could not this commerce be taxed ? 
Could it not be taxed as heavily as smuggling 
would permit ? England levies taxes upon its 
commerce with France ; France levies taxes upon 
its commerce with England. The possession of 
colonies is not necessary to the levying of taxes 
upon the commerce carried .on with them. 

I do not repeat here, that your taxes upon the 
articles of their production, and upon those of 
your importation from the colonies, are taxes of 



N 



B. IV. Ch. XIV.^C0L0NIES DESIRABLE ? 29)" 

which you pay every farthing' yourself: this has 
already been demonstrated. What you make the 
colonies to pay, are only the taxes upon your ex- 
portations to them, 

I allow that you may thus gain more from your 
colonies than you would be able to gain from foreign . 
nations ; since the foreigners can quit your market 
when they please, if they cannot obtain among you 
certain articles so cheap as from others ; — you are 
therefore obliged to humour them. But your own 
subjects, obliged to supply themselves from you, 
are obliged to submit ; you keep them in a prison, 
and you can put what price you please upon their 
existence. 

An advantage, however, of this nature can only 
be deceptive. When you have made a prison of 
your colonies, it is necessary to keep all the 
doors carefully shut: you have to strive against 
the Proteus of smuggling; fleets are necessary to 
blockade their ports, armies to restrain ^ discon- 
tented people, courts of justice to punish the 
refractory. How enormous are the expenses to 
be deducted, before this forced commerce will 
yield a net revenue ! 

To the amount of the expenses of peace, add 
that of a single armament, of a single war, and 
you will perceive, that dependant colonies cost 
much to the mother country, and never yield an 
equal return ; that, far from contributing to the 
strength of a state, they are always its weak and 
vulnerable points ; that they keep up among 
maritime nations continual jealousy, and that thus 
the people in France, and in England, are sub- 
jected to heavy taxes, which have no other effect 
than to render the productions of the colonies 
dearer than if they were free. 

To these considerations, opposed to the colonial 



298 B. IV. ch. XIV.— colonies desirable ? 

system, drawn frop political economy, many others 
may be added, derived from justice and huma- 
nity. This system is often mischievous to the 
people submitted to it; government is almost 
always, as it respects jthem, in a state either of 
jealousy or indifference: they are either neglected 
or pillaged ; they are made places of banishment 
for the reception of the vilest part of sopiety, or 
placjss to be pillaged by minions and favourites, 
whom it is considered desirable suddenly to enrich. 
The sovereign, at two thousapd leagues distance 
from his subjects, can be acquainted neither with 
their wants, their interests, their inanners, nor 
their character. Their most legitimate and weighty 
complaints, weakened by reason of distance, 
stripped of everything which might excite sensi- 
bility, of everything which might soften or subdue 
the pride of power, are delivered, without defence, 
into the cabinet of the prince, to the most insi- 
dious interpretations, to the most unfaithful repre- 
sentations : the colonists are still too happy, if their 
demand of justice is not construed into a crime, 
and if their most moderate remonstrances are not 
punished as acts of rebellion. In a word, little is 
cared for their affection, nothing is feared for their 
resentment, and their despair is contemned. The 
most violent procedures are easily disguised, under 
an appearance of necessity, and the best intentions 
will not always suffice to prevent the sacrifice of 
the public to private interests. 

If we proceed to consider the situation of colo- 
nies in detail, we shall not fail to be struck with 
its disadvantages. Have the colonists any law- 
suits in their mother country — rtheir witnesses 
must cross the seas ; they are at the mercy of their 
agents ; years glide away, and the expenses of 
justice continually accumulate. Is there danger 



B. IV. Ch. XIV.— colonies DESIRABLE f 299 

of a revolt — Are they threatened by an enemy — 
succours arrive when the mischief is done. The 
remedy oftentimes proves an additional calamity. 
Do they want food — famine has laid waste the 
country, before the mother country has been ap- 
prised of their necessities. 

These are not mere assertions ; they are borne 
out by a faithful summary of the history of every 
colony. It is tragical, even to horror ! The evils 
suffered in these establishments, from the igno- 
rance, the weakness, or the insensibility |j»f Euro- 
pean governments, exceed everything which can 
be imagined. When we considejr the multitude 
of men destroyed, the fleets lost, the treasures 
swallowed up, the establishments pillaged, we are 
astonished to hear colonies spoken of as a means 
of enrichment. The natural development of their 
fruitfuine^s, and of their industry, has been re- 
tarded for ages ; they have been covered a thou- 
sand times with ruins; nations have impoverished 
themselves, that they might hold them in servi- 
tude, when they might have been sharers in their 
wealth by leaving to them the enjoyment of the 
benefits of liberty. 

There are many arguments which prove the 
inutility of their dependance : North America 
presents a striking fact which ought to enlighten 
Europe. > Has the trade of England diminished 
since her former subjects became free? Since 
she lost these immense possessions, has she exhi- 
bited any symptoms of decay ? Has she had fewer 
sailors? Has her maritime power been weak- 
ened ? She has found a new source of wealth in 
the independence of the United States. The 
emancipation of this great country has carried 
thither a greater number of men, more capital, 
and more industry. Great Britain, relieved from 
the expense of defence c^nd government, has car- 



300 B. IV. ch. XIV.— colonies desirable? 

ried on a more advantageous comoierce with a 
more numerous and wealthy people ; and it is thus 
that everything concurs in proving, that the pros- 
perity of a nation is a benefit in which all others 
participate — every one in proportion to his means; 
and that the colonial system is hurtful to £uro-* 
peans, only because it is hurtful to the colonies. 

Let us, however, see the consequences which 
we ought to draw from these data. 

1. Ought we not to form any colonial establish- 
ment ? ^ Certainly not with the intention of en- 
riching the mother country : it is always a certain 
expense for a contingent and far distant profit. But 
we have seen that, as a means of relieving .the 
population, of preventing its excess, by providing 
a vent tor those who find themselves overburthened 
upon their native soil, colonization offers an ad- 
vantageous resource; and when it is well con- 
ducted, and free from any regulations which may 
hinder its prosperity, there may result from it a 
new people, with whom we shall possess all the 
connections of language, of social habits, of natural 
and political ties. 

2. Ought colonies already possessed to be eman- 
cipated ? Yes, certainly ; if we only consider the 
saving of the expenses of their government, and 
the superior advantages of a free commerce. But 
it is necessary to examine what is due to colonial 
establishments; to a family which has been created, 
and which ought not to be abandoned. Can they 
-maintain themselves? Will not their internal 
tranquillity be interrupted ? Will not one class of 
the inhabitants be sacrificed to another — for exam- 
ple, the free men to the slaves, or the slaves to the 
free men ? Is it not necessary that they should 
be protected and directed, in their condition of 
comparative weakness and ignorance? Is not 
their present state of dependance their safej[uard 



B. IV. ch. XIV.— colonies desirable ? 301 

against anarchy, murder, and pillage ? Such are 
the points of view under which this question 
ought to be considered. 

When we shall have ceased to consider colonies 
with the greedy eyes of fiscality, the greater 
number of these inconveniences will cease of 
themselves. Let governments lay aside all false 
mercantile notions, and all jealousy of their sub- 
jects, and everything which renders their yoke 
burthensome will fall at once : there will no 
longer be any reason to fear hostile dispositions, 
and wars for independence. If wisdom alone were 
listened to, the ordinary object of contention 
would be reversed, the mother country would 
desire to see her children powerful, that they 
might become free, and the colonies would fear 
the loss of that tutelary authority which gave them 
internal tranquillity, and security against external 
foes. 



[ 302 3 



CHAPTER XV. 

WEALTH — MEANS OF INCREASE. 

If we trace the progress of wealth in its natural 
channel, we shall clearly perceive that the inter- 
position of government is only beneficial and ne- 
cessary when employed in the maintenance of 
security, in the removal of obstacles, or the disse- 
mination of knowledge. 

Wealth may be increased — 

I. By increasing the efficacy of labour. 

II. By increasing the number of labourers. 

III. By the more advantageous employment of 
capital. 

IV. By increasing the mass of capital* 

V. By means of trade. 

I. By increasing the efficacy of labour. 

This subject might furnish most interesting and 
instructive historic details ; we shall confine our- 
selves to a simple enumeration of the means 
whereby it may be accomplished. 

The efficacy of labour may be augmented — 

1. By increase of skill and dexterity. 

2. By saving the time occupied by superfluous 
movements. 

3. By the invention of machines. 

4. By employing, instead of human labour, 
more powerful and less costly prime movers, as 
water, air, fire, explosive powders, and beasts of 
burthen. 

The two first advantages are obtained by the 
division of labour : the third necessarily results 
from it. Adam Smith has developed this grand 
means of attaining perfection with an attention. 



B. IV. Ch. XV.— wealth— means of increase. 303 

and, so to speak, a particular affection. He relates, 
that the process of converting a morsel of brass 
wire into a pin requires eighteen operations, and 
employs as many different workmen, of whom the 
greater part borrow the assistance of machines ; 
whereby, although ten workmen would not sepa- • 
rately have been able to make more than 340 pins 
a day, they are enabled to make 4800. It is hetlde 
that this little branch of national wealth, which 
affords a more commodious adjustment than the 
buckles of the Romans, and the skewers em-^ 
ployed by Queen Elizabeth, has increased in pro- 
portion. What our country people throw away 
would have been luxuries in the court of Darius. 

5. By the simplification of intermediate pro- 
cesses. 

6. By the saving of materials. The extension 
given to the quantity of gold employed in gilding 
silver wire, is an example equally suited to astonish 
the natural philosopher, and to charm the political 
economist. 

Chemistry has introduced a multitude of eco*- 
nomical processes into all the arts ; it has taught 
the means of economically applying fuel ; of pro- 
ducing great effect with little expense, it has sub- 
stituted less costly for raore'expensive materials ; it 
has imitated, and even rivalled, the productions of 
nature. 

7. By the improvement of the products, that 
is to say, in proportion to the price. It is thu9 
that porcelain has supplanted the coarse pottery of 
former times: the potteries of Wedgwood and 
Bentley have excelled the porcelain of China. 

8. By the diminution of the expense of carriage,, 
by the multiplication of roads, canals and iron rsliU 
ways. The advantages which the low countries have 
derived from thciir canals is incalculable. Govern- 



304 B. IV. ch. XV.— wealth—means of increase. 

ments may often usefully interfere in respect to 
these objects, either by advancing the capitals and 
sharing in the benefit, or by granting to the indi- 
viduals interested the powers necessary for making 
arrangements among themselves, and defraying 
the expense. When however it is necessary for a- 
government to take charge of these worjis, it is 
a proof that confidence does not exist ; 1 mean 
confidence in the stability of the actual order of 
things, and in the protection of the laws. No 
other circumstance speaks so highly in praise of 
the British government, as the disposition of indi- 
viduals to unite in carrying on great undertakings 
in canals, docks, ports, &c. ; a disposition to un- 
dertake such works denotes the prevalence of a 
feeling of security, which unites the future to the 
present, and embraces an horizon of large extent. 

The advantage of machines consists in the in- 
creased efficacy of labour. To reduce the num- 
ber of men employed upon any species of labour 
by half, without diminishing the quantity of the 
product, is in fact the same thing as doubling the 
number of men employed, with the same degree 
of efficacy as before. That which required two 
thousand men for its performance, being performed 
by one thousand, there remains one thousand men 
who may be employed either upon similar or other 
works. 

But this supposes that the workmen, no longer 
required in the production of a given quantity of 
labour, are otherwise employed ; for if they were 
without employment, the quantity of wealth pro- 
duced would remain the same after the invention, 
as before. 

If a manufacturer found himself thus in a con- 
dition to execute, with one thousand workmen, 
what had heretofore required two thousand, it 



/ 



B.IV. CH.XV.— WEALTH— MEANS OF INCREASE. 306 

appears, at first sight, that the natural result would 
be, that he would employ the two thousand work- 
men to produce a double quantity of work. But 
unless his pecuniary capital be augmented, it will 
be impossible for him to employ the same number. 
The new machines, the new warehouses required 
for this increase of produce, require a proportionate 
increase of capital. The most ordinary case, 
therefore, will be the reduction of the number of 
workmen; and, as it respects them, the conse- 
quence is a temporary distress. 

, It is upon this circumstance, that the popular 
opposition to the improvement of machines de- 
pends ; it is a very reasonable opposition on the 
part of the handicraftsmen. It is they who suffer, 
whilst the benefit is, in the first instance, for the 
manufacturer, and in perpetuity for the public, 
who obtain a better article at a less price. 

There are two kinds of countries where this 
objection has no force — countries badly peopled, 
and countries where the people are slaves. Do 
you desire an increase of population — Do you 
desire children, who may beconie workmen in 
future — I give you full grown men ; workmen 
actually prepared. You would charge yourself 
with the expense of their education ; I relieve you 
of it. You are willing to receive foreigners, and 
I give you natives. Such is the language an 
inventor may address to a sovereign ; whilst to the 
individual proprietor, he may say, — With one 
hundred slaves you are now able to raise a certain 
quantity from your mines ; with fifty you will, in 
future, be able to raise the same quantity. If it 
were necessary to support the others in idleness, 
where would be the evil ? 

In stationary or retrograde countries, where the 
dismissed workman cannot easily find a new em- 

20 



306 B. IV. ch. XV.— wealth—means of increase* 

ployment to which to apply himself, where there 
exists no capital ready to furnish him an etnplov- 
ment that suits him, this objection would not Be 
without force. It is however a transient evil, to 
which transient remedies ought to be applied. 

II. By the increase of the number of labourers. 

I have nothing further to add upon this subject 
to what has been said in the chapter on po- 
pulation ; but I shall point out those things 
which, in an indirect manner, tend to produce 
this eflfect. 

1. By the banishment of all prejudices unfa- 
vourable to labour. Honour has tied the hands of 
some; religion of others. Some have been kept 
in a state of perpetual idleness, others in a stkteof 
periodical idleness. In some Catholic countries, 
the Saints' days occupy more than one hundred 
working days. The loss of these days alone 
ought not only to be considered, but also the 
bad habits which this idleness encourages. They 
have not worked upon the Saint's day ; they do 
not work on the day following, because they were 
intoxicated the day past. 

2. The amount of labour may be increased by 
giving productive employments to those classes of 
men who, owing to their station in life, produce 
nothing, — to prisoners, beggars, monks, and sol- 
diers. It has been pretended that, to make a good 
soldier, an individual ought to follow no other trade ; 
an exception ought at least to be made in favour 
of those kinds of labour which may be useful in 
war, as the digging of ditches, the construction of 
bridges, the throwing up of embankments, and the 
formation and repair of roads.* These employ- 

* It is said> that the success of the American armies was partly 
owing to their skill in these employments. Composed sdmost 



BAY. Cx. XV.— WEALTH— MEANS OF INCREASE. 307 

ments afford an inelchaustible means 6f increasing 
the most permanent part of the capital of a nation. 

3, Substitute alluring for coercive motives: re- 
ward for punishment. With suitable precautions, 
abolish all services in kind, all forced labour and 
slavery. A country peopled with serfii will be 
always poor. Pay for labour in money, and the 
reward, mingling drop after drop with the labour, 
will sweeten its bitterness. Every free labourer 
is worth two slaves. This reflection is often 
presented in this work, but it is so just and 
favourable to humanity, that it cannot be too 
often repeated; we ought not to be afraid to 
repeat it. 

III. The more advantageous employment of 
capital. 

We have already seen that, under the guidance 
of individual interest, capital of itself takes the 
most advantageous direction, at least certainly 
more advantageous than when under the guidance 
of government. 

Of all employments of capital, the most advan- 
tageous for the state, is the cultivation of the earth. 
It is, at the same time, as has been demonstrated 
by Adam Smith, the most beneficial in itself, and 
the most attached to the state. Most advanta- 
geous: the capitalist must find it nearly as advan- 
tageous as any other, since, unless this be the case, 
he will not engage in it ; and this, after he has de- 
ducted the rent be pays to the landlord, and which 
often amounts to a third of the produce. It is thus 
that the state gains by this employment more than 

entirely of husbandmen^ they excavated ditches and formed 
entrenchments and other works connected with camps^ with a 
facility which astonished their adversaries. The Russian 
armies possess the same advantage in a still higher degree. 

20. 



308 a IV. ch. XV.— wealth*-mean8 op increase. 

it can possibly gain by any other. More attached 
to the state : the workman may carry away his in- 
dustry, the money-lender his capital, the merchant 
may change his warehouses, but the farmer cannot 
carry away the land. 

For the encouragement of this most advanta- 
geous employment of capital, what ought govern- 
ment to do? Nothing: that is to say, nothing in 
the way of positive encouragement ; for it cannot 
too completely remove the clogs and obstacles to 
the free alienation of landed property,* or too 
greatly favour the conversion of goods held in 
common into individual property.^ 

The condition most favourable to the prosperity 
of agriculture exists when there are no entails, no 
unalienable endowments, no qomnaon lands, no 
right of redemption, no tithes, or taxes or dues 
which punish industry, and levy a contribution 
upon agriculture, increasing in proportion to the 
expenses incurred, and the greater care paid to 
cultivation. 

Generally speaking, the great landed proprietors 
give themselves little care about the improvement 
of their domains. Some leave large tracts of 
country, sufficient for the maintenance of hun- 
dreds of families, in a state of nature, that they 
may enjoy the pleasures of the chase; others, pro- 
digal in proportion to their wealth, expend every 
thing in present enjoyments, and trouble them- 
selves but little with the future. Where the sys- 
teni of leases and farms is upon, a good footing, the 
evil is not great; but it is altogether otherwise 
when the administration is in the hands of a super- 

* Upon this subject^ see Traiiis de Legislation, torn. L 
p. 275 (Ed. 1820). 

t Ibid, tom.i. p. 305 (Ed. 1820). 



B. IV. ch. XV.— wealth— means of increase. 309 

intendent, still less interested than his masters in 
the increase of the rent. Were large properties 
divided into three or four parts, the proprietors 
would be animated with an entirely different spirit. 
The spur of necessity would render them intelli- 
gent and industrious. A nobleman would employ 
twenty gardeners in raising pine apples and taking 
care of bowling greens. Five manufacturers would 
employ twenty husbandmen in producing corn for 
themselves and a hundred workmen. But let it 
not be supposed that I recommend agrarian laws 
and forced divisions: this would be to cut off* an 
arm, in order to avoid a scratch. 

In the scale of public utility, so far as it depends 
upon the general wealth, after agriculture come 
those manufactures whose products are sold within 
the country; after these, the manufactures whose 
products are exported ; and in the last place, the 
carrying trade. Adam Smith has demonstrated 
this. Thus much for theory ; it does not follow 
that in practice it would be proper to favour a 
branch of industry higher in the scale, at the ex- 
pense of one which is placed below it. They all 
exercise a reciprocal influence upon one another, 
and benefits are divided among them with suffi- 
cient equality. If for a moment one branch be- 
comes more advantageous than the others, a greater 
number of adventurers are soon drawn towards 
this side, and the equilibrium is not Jong in re- 
establishing itself. If any species of industry is 
more constantly useful to a nation, it is because 
the benefit more certainly remains ; because the 
wealth which it produces is more secure. 

IV. Bff increasing the inass of capital. 

The mass of capital is increased, when the pro- 
ducts of labour exceed the amount of products 
consumed. 



310 B. IV. ch. XV.— wealth— means op increase. 

The addition made to the wealth of a nation in 
one year, is the total amount of the savings of all 
the individuals composing that nation in that yean 
It is the diflerence between the values produced 
or imported, and the values destroyed or exported 
in the course of the same year. 

The addition made to the pecuniary wealth of a 
community is, in the same manner, the difference 
between the sum produced or imported, and the 
sum destroyed or exported in the period in ques- 
tion. 

In the case of an individual, increase of money 
is increase of wealth. If his fortune consist to-day 
of one thousand guineas, and he has two thousand 
to-morrow, he will be twice as rich as he was the 
day before : he can command twice the quantity 
of the products of all kinds of labour. 

The case is not the same with a nation. If its 
coin be to-day 1,000,000/. sterling, and to-mor- 
row it were to be 2,000,000/. its wealth would not 
be doubled as was that of the individual. As it 
respects its internal condition, the nation would 
not be richer than befofre. Instead of having at 
its command a double quantity of productions, it 
would only have the same. 

It is true that, in exporting to other nations this 
suddenly acquired mass, the community in ques- 
tion would obtain an addition to the mass of its 
non-pecuniary wealth ; but in proportion as this 
exchange is made, the case which we have sup- 
posed does not continue the same. It ceases to 
possess the additional million of coin. 

This apparent contradiction between the two 
cases is easily removed. When an individual 
finds the quantity of coin which he possesses sud- 
denly doubled, the value of the coin is not dimi- 



B. IV. ch. XV.— wealth— means of increase. 311 

nisbed by this addition : the community to wbich 
be belongs does not possess more than before, sup- 
posing that the amount has not been received from 
abroad. The proportion between the amount of 
coin and the things to be sold remains exactly the 
same. 

The v^lue pf all the things sold in the course of 
a year is equal in value to the sum of the coin 
given in exchange for them : that is, to the value 
of the actual quantity of the coin multiplied by 
the number of times it has been exchanged. Each 
of these masses is equal in value to the other; 
since, by the supposition, the one has been ex- 
changed for the other. 

This equality exists, whatever may be the dif- 
ference in quantity between these two masses. 
When the million of coin, circulating three times 
during the year, has purchased the whole mass of 
goods which were to be sold, it has given to all 
its successive possessors the enjoyment of this 
mass. When, taking the same course, the two 
millions of coin have produced the same effects, 
they have only performed what the single OMllion 
had performed before, since, by the supposition, 
the mass of goods has not been increased. In other 
terms, that is to say, the new mass of coin is swal- 
lowed up in the general mass of coin, and as much 
as it has increased its quantity so much has it 
diminished its value. 

The addition made to the coin of the commu- 
nity, produces a proportional increase in the price 
of all vendible commodities, in the pecuniary 
price of all commodities not pecuniary; and con- 
sequently it may be in the price of every article, 
it may be in that of the greater number of ar- 
ticles. 



312 B. IV. ch. XV.— wealth— means of increase. 

If an addition made to the coin of a commu- 
nity, is employed in creating a portion of wealth 
not pecuniary, which would not have been created 
without it, if it produces by labour or exchange 
an increase of real wealth, the result is no longer 
the same. In proportion as the real wealth is in- 
creased, the addition made to the coin ceases to 
produce a diminution of relative value. 

In order to simplify the case and render it more 
striking, I have supposed a large and sudden ad- 
dition. It is very seldom that an addition of this 
nature takes place with respect to the precious 
metals ; but it has often happened with respect to 
' paper money. 

Thus the increase of the price of commodities, 
all other things remaining the same, is a proof of 
an addition to the coin and a measure of its quan- 
tity. 

This defalcation of value is equivalent to an in- 
direct tax upon pecuniary revenues ; a tax which 
may continually increase in amount ; a tax which 
benefits those who issue the paper money, and of 
which the weight presses entirely upon the pos- 
sessors of fixed revenues. There is a compensa- 
tion for this tax to producers and merchants, who 
may raise the price of their commodities to all 
those who have part of this new money ; but 
those, whose fortune consists in a pecuniary re- 
venue which cannot be increased, bear all the bur- 
then.* 

When this diminution of revenue takes place 

♦ It is not without distrust that I here give this feeble ex- 

, tract, from a manuscript work of Mr. Bentham's, On Prices 

and upon the causes which increase Prices, It embraces so 

great a number of questions, that it is not possible to give a 

correct outline of the whole in so short an abridgment. 



B. IV. Cr. XV.-.WEALTH— means OF INCREASE. 313 

gradually, although it is an evil, this evil may re- 
sult from the general prosperity, and may be com- 
pensated by a greater benefit. Losses which oc- 
cur in the ordinary course of affairs, are experienced 
and hardly felt ; they may be provided against. 
But when the government itself interferes by ope- 
rations, whose effects are as great as they are sud- 
den, in order to give a sudden increase to the mass 
of pecuniary capital, whether metallic or otherwise, 
it confounds all the calculations of pnidence, it 
ruins one part of its subjects, and its imaginary 
wealth becomes the instrument of its destruction. 
This is what was experienced in France under the 
system of Law, and again under the reign of the as- 
sign&ts. 

V. By means of trade. 

Some advantage results from every exchange, 
provided it be made intentionally and without 
fraud, otherwise such exchange would not be 
made ; there would be no reason for making it. 
Under this point of view, the two contracting par- 
ties receive an equal benefit, each one of them 
surrenders what suits him less, that he may ac- 
quire what suits him more. In each transaction 
of this kind there are two masses of new enjoy- 
ments. 

But though all trade is advantageous, a particu- 
lar branch may be more advantageous to one of the 
parties than to the other. It is more advanta- 
geous to you than it is to me, if for an article 
which only costs you one day's labour, you obtain 
from me an article which has cost me two. The 
real balance of trade is the quantity of labour re- 
ceived exceeding the quantity of labour given in 
exchange. 

It is not necessary \\v this place to examine to 



3H 1. IV. 01k |CV,-»W£A|.TH«-M£ANS Of INCHEAS^ 

what (}egree, spil, clims^te, situation, natural cir-^ 
cumstaaces, &c. may give this advantage to one 
state over another ; since this kpowledge can have 
scarcely any influencie upon practice. It is of 
greater importance to observe, that it nuay in 9 
certain degree be acquired by art, aqd that the 
superiority of workmanship or of instruments is a 
species of monopoly established by fortune in 
favour of genius. Time i3 saved by ingenuity. 
The greater the number of new inventions in 9 
country, whose productions are carried into foreign 
lands, the more favourable will the real balance of 
commerce be to that country. The advantages 
belonging to dexterity are more permanent than 
those resulting from knowledge. The discoveries 
of chemistry are speedily disseminated. The skill 
pf the Bengalese workmen will remain peculiar to 
tbem for ages. 

The great politicians who so much value foreign 
commerce, consider it as a means of obtaining a 
balance in gold, and they hasten to interfere to 
prevent those exchanges which require an expen- 
diture of the preciou3 metals. If a merchant 
wish to send coin from Liondon to Paris, it is to 
make a payment which will cost him less in this 
manner than any other, or that he may obtain 
some kind of merchandise which he values more 
than the coiu;. The politician is more clever than 
this. He is not willing that this gain should be 
made, because, he thinks, thus to gain would be to 
lose. Preventing the profits of every one is the 
method he has discovered of preventing loss to all. 
He has therefore been employed in heaping one 
law upon another, that he may prevent the expor- 
tation of the precious metals : success would be a 
great misfortune, but it has never been obtained. 



B. IV. Cbl Xy.-^WEALTH*-MSAN8 OF INCRSA9K, 3 IS 

Want of success in diminishing the evil has only 
increased the folly. I say in diminishing the evil, 
for it never entirely disappears. There will, for 
example, aiwaya be a greater or less expense on 
the part of the government in endeavouring to 
execute the law ; more or less vexation, more or 
less restraint, a larger or smaller number of indivi-* 
duals punished for having rendered service to the 
country (by the breach of the law.) .People will be 
accustomed to elude the prohibitions, and to es^ 
cape the vigilance of government* Money being 
more or less lowered in value, the price of manu«> 
factures will be raised in proportion, and the expor- 
tation of manufactures diminished. Such has beea 
the folly exhibited in Spain and Portugal; yet are 
they too happy only to have half succeeded. 
Grant to Midas his wish, he will die of hunger 
upon a heap of gold. 

In recommending freedom of trade, I suppose 
the minds of merchants in their sound, that is, 
their ordinary .state. But there have been times 
when they have acted as though. they wese deliri*- 
ous ; sucfa^ were the periods of the Mississippi 
schiBme in Franbe, and the South Sea scheme in 
England. The other xrlasses <of people would have 
had ground for seeking to divert their fellow citix 
zens from the purchase of the smoke . sold by 
Zotr, or of the huhhle» of the South Sea. What is 
here said, maybe compared with the observations, 
in the preceding chapter, upon emigration. In 
laying down general rules, fortuitous and transient 
cases ought not to be forgotten. 

What has been said respecting the precious 
metals is true respecting every article of trade and 
commerce, considered as general wealth. There 
cannot be any incompatibility between the wealth 



316 a IV. Ch.'XV^WEALTH— MEANS OP INCREASE. 

of each and the wealth of all. But the same rule 
does not apply to subsistence and defence. Indi- 
viduals may find their individual profit in com- 
mercial operations which may be opposed to the 
subsistence of all, or the defence of all. This 
particularly may happen to a small community in 
the neighbourhood of a large one. Establish an 
unlimited freedom of trade in the small commu- 
nity, the great one may ruin it by means of gold. 
In case of famine, it might purchase all its provi- 
sions ; at the approach of war, it might purchase 
all its arms. 

The conduct to be pursued, to insure the pos- 
session of the means of subsistence and defence, 
are infinitely diversified by the situation, the 
soil, the climate, and the extent of the country to 
which it may refer. 

The great difficulty to be overcome as it re- 
spects subsistence, is the difference between good 
and bad harvests. If the produce is l^ss than the 
consumption, the evil is evident ; if it is greater, 
the abundance lessens the price, the farmer is 
ruined or discouraged, and the year of plenty may 
be followed by one of dearth. For the produc- 
tion of equality, some have established public 
granaries for storing up the superabundance of 
years of plenty ; others have encouraged cultiva- 
tion as much as possible, depending upon foreigners 
for drawing oflf the excess. Were we to judge 
from abstract reasoning alone, the first plan would 
appear best calculated to prevent accidents ; but, 
forming our judgments from facts, the second 
appears least subject to abuse. It is from the 
adoption of this plan that England has Aijoyed 
an abundance sufficiently regular. Freedom of 
trade, therefore, appears the best method for 



B. IV. en. XV.— WEALTH— MEANS OF INCRSASB. 317 

insuring an abundance of the means of subsist- 
ence. 

In respect to subsistence and defence, there is 
no better security than that which results from 
the general prosperity. A superabundance is the 
best security against want.* 

After the examination we have given to the 
different methods by which real wealth may be 
increased, we see that government may rely upon 
the intelligence and inclination of individuals for 
putting them in operation, and that nothing is 
necessary to be done on its part but to leave them 
in possession of the power, to insure to them the 
right of enjoyment, and to hasten the develop- 
ment of general knowledge. All that it can do 
with success may be ranged under this small 
number of heads : — 

1. To encourage the study of different branches 
of natural philosophy. The difficulties of science 
form a barrier between practice and theory, be- 
tween the artisan and the philosopher. 

3. To institute prizes for discoveries and expe- 
riments. 

3. To cause the processes employed in every 
branch of trade to be published. The French 
government, rising above little jealousies, has dis- 
tinguished itself in this manner, and has rendered 
itself a benefactor to the human race. 

4*. To cause everything of the same nature in 
foreign countries to be observed with attention, 
and to give the knowledge they obtain the same 
publicity. 

5. To cause the price of different articles of 



* See Traitii de Legislation. ** Des lois relativement k la 
subsistance et ii Tabondance." 



318 B. IV. €■. XV^WUkllT»^4MMMMS OP INGRKASB. 

trade to be published. The price of an article is 
an extra reward for whoever can manufacture or 
furnish it at a cheaper rate. 

6. To grant patents for a limited number of years. 

7* To class with the crime of foigery the in- 
justice done by the artisan who puts upon his 
own productions the mark of another. In order 
to prevent the commission of this crime through 
Ignorance, it would be necessary to establish a 
register, in which every artisan might make an 
entry of his mark. This would tend to secure 
the privilege which nature has established in 
favour of skill, and which the legislator ought to 
maintain. It can never be obtained without 
labour, and it can never be abused. 

With respect to a great number of inventions in 
the arts, an exclusive privilege is absolutely neces- 
sary, in order that what is sown may be reaped. 
In new inventions, protection against imitators is 
not less necessary than in established manuftic- 
tures protection against thieves. He who has no 
hope that he shall reap will not take the trouble 
to sow. But that which one man has invented, 
all the world can imitate. Without the assist- 
ance of the laws, the inventor would almost always 
be driven out of the market by his rival, who, 
finding himself without any expense in possession 
of a discovery which has cost the inventor much 
time and expense, would be able to deprive him 
of all his deserved advantages, by selling at a lower 
price. An exclusive privilege is of all rewards 
the best proportioned, the most natural^ and the 
least burthensome. It produces an infinite efiect, 
and it costs nothing. " Grant me fifteen years,^' 
says the inventor, " that I may xe^p the fruit of 
my labours ; after this term, it shall be enjoyed by 



B. IV. Cb. XV.— WEALTH--lf£ANS OP INCREASE. 319 

all the world/' Does the sovereign say " No, 
you shall not have it/' what will happen? It 
will be enjoyed by no one, neither for fifteen 
years nor afterwards: everybody will be disap- 
pointed ; inventors, workmen, consumers, every* 
thing will be stifled, both benefit and enjo3r<« 
inent* 

Exclusive patents in favour of inventions havd 
been long established in England ; an abuse, how* 
ever, has crept into the system of granting them, 
which tends to destroy the advantage derivable 
from them. This privilege^ which ought to be 
gratuitous, has afforded an opportunity for plun* 
aering inventors, which the duration of tht 
Custom has converted into a right It is a 
real conspiracy against the increase of national 
wealth. 

We may picture to ourselves a poor and timid 
inventor, after years consumed in labouk* and un- 
certainty, presenting himself at the Patent Office 
to receive the privilege which he has heard that 
the law bestows upon him. Immediately, the 
great officers of the crown pounce upon him to*- 
gether, as vultures upon tneir prey: a solicitor- 
general, who levies four guineas upon hrnci; k 
keeper of the privy seal, four guineas and a half; n 
keeper of another seal, four guineas; a secretary 
of state, sixteen guineas ; the lord chancellor, 
who closes the procession, as the first in dignity, 
so also the first in rapacity, he cannot take less 
than twenty-six guineas. Need it be added, that 
in carrying on this process of extortion, recourse 
is had to fraud ; that the individual applying for 
a patent is referred from office to office, that 
different pretexts may be afforded for pillage; 
that not one of these officers, great or small, takes 
the trouble to read a single word of the farago of 



320 a IV. Cfl. XV^WEiiLTH— MEANS OF INCREASE. 

nonsense which they sign, and therefore that the 
whole parade of consultation is only a farce.* 

Suppose a law, granting the patent as at pre- 
sent, without condition. Suppose another law, 
prohibiting the obtaining of a patent under a 
penalty of fifty guineas. What exclamations 
should we not hear against such contradictory 
laws and such folly ! And*yet this supposed folly 
is only half as great as the folly actually displayed. 
People always allow themselves to be duped by 
words. The law, or rather the customary abuse 
which has the force of law, instead of a permis* 
sion, is, as it respects the greater number of inven- 
tors, a real, although masked prohibition. If you 
wish to strip off this mask, translate the language 
of each into the language of the other. 

These insults and oppressions have sometimes 
been approved as tending to repress the temerity 
of projectors ; in the same manner taxes upon 
law proceedings have been applauded as tending 
to repress the temerity of isuitors. As if poverty 
were synonymous with temerity; as if the rich 
only had need of the assistance of the laws, or that 
they only were worthy of it ; as if, indeed, this 
reason for only half opening the doors of the tem- 
ple of Justice were not equally conclusive for 
closing them altogether! 

* It is scarcely necessary to remark that, in blaming the 
abuse, no reproach is intended to be cast upon the individuals, 
who, finding it established, profit by it. These fees form as 
lawful a portion of their emoluments as any other. It is, 
however, to be desired, that in order to put, a dtop to this 
insult and oppression, an indemnification were granted at the 
public expanse equal to the average value of these fees. If it 
be proper to levy a tax upon patents, it ought, instead of being 
levied in advance upon capital^ to be postponed till the patent 
has produced some benefit. 



[ 321 ] 



CHAPTER XVI. 

RATES OF INTEREST EVILS OF FIXATION. 

If it be reasonable for legislators to encourage 
inventive industry by factitious rewards, it is much 
more reasonable that they should not oppose obsta- 
cles to the productiveness of natural rewards. 

The natural reward of inventions, when carried 
into effect, is the proGt to be derived from them in 
the way of trade. But all tjrade requires capital. If 
the inventor has it of his own, it is well ; if not, 
he must seek it from others : many circumstances, 
however, conspire to hinder his obtaining it. 

Does he endeavour to borrow it, upon what 
conditions can he hope to find a lender ? Upon 
the ordinary conditions, it is naturally impossible 
that be should find one. A new undertaking 
cannot fail of being hazardous, if it were only 
because it is new. It is therefore necessary to 
grant to the lender an advantage proportionate to 
the apparent degree of risk. There are two me- 
thods of granting this advantage. The English 
laws proscribe them both. One method consists 
in granting interest at a rate superior to the ordi- 
nary rate : but this is prohibited by the laws 
fixing the rat« of interest. This prohibition is 
partly inefficacious, and partly pernicious ; that it 
was altogether useless would be its greatest elo- 
gium.* 

* For the proof of these positions^ the reader is referred to 
Mr. Bentham's '* Defence of Usury> showing the Impolicy of 
the legal Restraints upon Pecuniary Bargains." Inconsistency 

31 



322 B.IV. C«. XVI.— RATES OF INTEREST-rEVILS, &c. 

The second method consists in granting a varia- 
ble interest, proportioned to the profits of the 
undertaking.* 

In France, there is one branch of commerce at 
least in which it is possible to limit the portion of 
property that one is willing to risk. It is in the 
business of banking. The sum employed in this 
manner is said to be en commandite. If this liberty 
is useful in this branch of commerce, why should 
it not be equally so in every other; and especially 
in newly-discovered branches, which have so many 
natural obstacles to overcome, which it is needless 
to increase by legal interference ? This liberty, under 
certain restrictions for the prevention of monopo- 
lies from the unrestrained accumulation of capital, 
has been established in Ireland. When will Kng- ^ 
land have the wisdom to imitate this example? 

An inventor therefore in want of funds can only 
apply to a tradesman, or merchant, to enter into 
partnership with him; but persons etigaged in 
business are those who have the least portion of 
disposable capital ; and, as they are enabled to make 
their own terms, inventive industry is often stifled 
or oppressed. 

Were it lawful for every one to engage in com- 
mercial undertakings for a limited amount, how 

is the natural companion of laws dictated by narrow views: it is 
lawful to lend or borrow^ at any rate> in maritime enterprises ; 
«8 if the pretended dangers and pretended abuses^ which render 
the indefinable evil, qamed usury, so much the object of dread, 
could only exist upon dry land, and depended upon the solidity 
or fluidity of the element, upon which the enterprises were 
carried on. 

* In England, a capitalist cannot empby any portion of his 
capital in trade, without being considered a trader; and, con- 
sequently, responsible in the whole extent of his fortune. 
There is not statute law to this efifect, but it said to be a rul« 
of common law. 



B, IV. Cn. XVI.— RATES OF INTEREST— EVILS, &c. 3^3 

many facilities would be afforded to men of ge- 
nius ! All classes of society would furnish assist- 
ance to inventive industry : those who wished to 
risk only a small sum, those who could annually 
dispose of a certain sum, would be enabled to 
engage in this species of lottery, which promised 
to yield them an interest above the ordinary rate. 
The most elevated classes might find an amuse- 
ment in descending into the territories of industry, 
and there staking a small part of that wealth 
which they risk upon games of chance. The 
spirit of gaming, diverted from its pernicious 
direction, might serve to increase the productive 
energy of commerce and art. 

There are some who are natural enemies to 
merit of every kind: every conquest achieved by 
industry, in the career of invention, is a loss to 
them ; every discovery an injury. Common-place 
men have a common interest which they under- 
stand but too well; it is, that all should be 
common-place like themselves. It is to be re- 
gretted that, Adam Smith, in his " Wealth of 
Nations,^' a work which will rise in public est\*f 
mation in proportion as genius shall be held in 
honour, slM^uld have furnished arms, which the 
adversaries of genius may direct against that 
work itself. It is to be regretted that, under the 
odious name of projects, a name applied to the 
most useful enterprises, even to the moment when 
they receive the sanction of success, they may 
there be seen indiscriminately stamped with the 
seal of opprobrium, and rndiscriminately enveloped 
with contempt. 

It is not only that he may prevent prodigals 
from obtaining money, but that he may prevent 
its reaching the hands of projectors, whom he 
places together upon the same level, that he ap- 

21. 



824 B. IV. Ch. xvl^rates of intkrest— evils, &c. 

proves of the fixing of the rate of interest upon the 
footing upon which hefound it. ** If the legal rate 
of interest in Great Britain, for example^ was fixed 
so high as 8 or 10 per cent, the greater part of the 
money, which was to be lent, would be lent to 
prodigals and projectors, who alone would be 
willing to give this high interest. Sober people, 
who will give for the use of money no more than a 
part of what they are likely to make by the use 
•of it, would not venture into the competition^ 
A great part of the capital of the country would 
thus be kept out of the hands which were most 
likely to make a profitable and advantageous use 
of it, and thrown into those which were naost 
likely to waste and destroy it. Where the legal 
rate of interest, on the contrary, is fixed but a 
very little above the lowest market rate, sober 
people are universally preferred as borrowers to 
prodigals and projectors. The person who lends 
money gets nearly as much interest from the 
former as he dares to take from the latter, aixl his 
money is much safer in the hands of the one set of 
people than in those of the other.'^ * 

This is not the only passage in which this au« 
thor attacks projectors (see b. i. ch. iv.) ; but it 
is here that he attacks them more directly ; whilst 
as toprodigals, it has been elsewhere shewn that it 
is not to them that money is lent, or that any are 
willing to lend at extraordinary interest. Friends 
will either not lend at all, or will lend at the ordi- 
nary rate. Strangers will only lend to those who 
are without industry, upon isecurity. But he who 
has security to oflFer, has no need to give a half- 
penny more, because he is a prodigal. It is upon 
his security that the money will be lent, and not 

^ Wealth of Nations, b. % ch. iv 



B.IV. Ch. XVI.— RATES OF INTEREST— EVILS, &c. 325 

upon his character. Whether the security oflFered 
be present or future, certain or contingent, pro- 
duces no difference; a future or contingent secu- 
rity by means of a valuation, becomes as good a 
pledge as if it were present or certain. In a word, 
if money be lent upon the industry of the bor- 
rower, it is lent not to a prodigal, but to a pro- 
jector. It is therefore upon the latter class alone, 
that the burthen of these prohibitory laws presses. 

An opinion which derives all its force from the 
authority of the individual who publishes it, can- 
not be better combatted than by that authority 
Itself. 

1. The prosperity of England has been progres- 
sive ever since the number of projectors has been 
not only in an uninterrupted, but in an accelerated 
state of increase. 2. The aggregate of the good 
economy has always been greater than the aggre- 
gate of the bad. 3. With respect to commerce, 
each individual is a better judge of his own interests 
than government can be for him. And 4. General 
laws must be much more defective with respect to 
commercial regulations. The members of a govern- 
• ment may take notice of particular cases, but ge- 
neral laws can never regard them. 

These are the general propositions of the work 
of Adam Smith. Truths precious and irrefragable, 
whigh no one has more successfu41y laboured to 
unfold than this illustrious politician. But if these 
principles are followed out, no laws ought to exist 
for the restraint of projectors, and for preventing 
them From obtaining the capital of which they 
stand in need. 

The censure which condemns projectors falls 
upon every species of new industry. It is a general 
attack upon the improvement of the arts and 



326 B. IV. ch. xvl— rates of interest— EVILS» &c. 

sciences. Every thing which is routine to day 
was originally a project. Every manufacture, 
how old soever it may be, was once new; and 
wl^en new, it was the production of that mis- 
chievous and bold race who ought to be destroyed 
— ^the race of projectors ! 

1 know not what can be replied to this, unless 
it be said, that the past projects have been useful ; 
but that all future projects will not be so. Such 
an assertion would, however, require proof, strong 
in proportion to its opposition to general opinion. 
In every career, experience is considered as worth 
something. The warning to be derived from past 
failures may contribute to future security, if not to 
success. 

Were it even proved, that no projector ever en- 
gaged in a new branch of industry without being 
ruined, it would not be proper to conclude, that 
the spirit of invention and of projects ought to be 
discouraged. Each projector, in ruining him- 
self, may have opened a new path, by which 
others may have attained to wealth. So soon as a 
new dye, more brilliant or more economical than 
the old ones, a new machine, or a new practice 
in agriculture has been discovered, a thousand 
dyers, ten thousand mechanicians, a hundred thou- 
sand agriculturists may reap the benefit: and 
then — though the original author of the invention 
have been ruined in the bringing the discovery to 
perfection — as it respects the national wealth, of 
what consequence is this, when considered as the 
price of so much gain ? 

That restrictions of this nature are inefficacious, 
has been successfully shewn by Adam Smith him- 
self.* But if inefficacious, this is sufficient reason 

* See b. i. ch. ix. 



B.1V. Cm. XVI.— RATES OP INTEREST— EVILS, kc. 32*7 

for. their condemnation : unless they effect the 
purpose designed, the are positively mischievous. 

They tend, in the first place, to drive away useful 
projectors. 1 do not say that they drive away all ; 
had that been the case, we should not have at- 
tained our present degree of prosperity. But they 
drive away a part. Unhappily we cannot know 
what part, nor how great a part of their number. 
The talent required for operating upon matter, or 
directing the powers of nature, is extremely dif- 
ferent from that required for operating upon the 
mind, — the talent of meditating in a study, and 
thereby making discoveries, from that requisite for 
making known those discoveries to the world. 
The chance of success in the career of invention 
is in proportion to the talent ofthe Individual ; the 
chance of obtaining a loan of capital from another 
to make an invention productive, is in proportion 
to his reputation. But this latter, far from being 
indirect, is naturally in inverse proportion with 
the former. The more unaccustomed an indivi- 
dual is to society, the greater his dread of mingling 
in it, the less is he at his ease ; the less is he mas- 
ter of his faculties when he is obliged to mingle 
with it. The effect produced upon the mind of 
the individual who has, or who supposes that he 
has, made a great discovery, is a mixture of pride 
and timidity, both which feelings concur in aliena- 
ting the minds of men, and diminishing the proba- 
bility of success in every enterprize, in as much 
as it may depend upon the degree in which such 
individual succeeds in rendering himself and his 
projects estimable in the eyes of others. This 
pride has for its cause the superiority which he 
believes himself to possess above them ; this timi- 
dity is caused by the faint dope he possesses of 
making them sensible of this superiority. But 



328 B.1V. Cii.XVl.--RAT£S OF INTfiREST— EVILS, &c. 

though pride united with courage is one of the 
most powerful means of subjugating men, pride 
united with timidity is one of the most certain 
causes of exposure to their aversion and contempt. 
That disposition which, under the name of mo- 
desty, is so much praised as a companion well 
adapted to the introduction of true merit, arid 
which is so necessary when inferiority of situation 
will not allow the employment of boldness in the 
service, is. not true timidity, but skill which has 
learnt to assume this appearance ; it is skill, which 
to strength, and consciousness of that strength, 
unites the knowledge of when, and how, and in 
what sense, and in what proportion this strength 
ought to be displayed, for the most favourable ex- 
hibition of its pretensions ; and when, and how, 
and in what sense it ought to be hidden, that the 
protector whose assistance is desired, may enjoy 
the feeling of his own superiority. If ever timi- 
dity has effected anything at the expense of that 
assurance which assumes its appearance, it has 
been when allied with beauty, which causes every- 
thing to be forgiven, and which nothing can resist. 
Separated from this powerful protectrix, it labours 
in grief, in darkness, in awkwardness, embarrass- 
ment, and false shame ; the bugbears of love and 
of esteem, but the frequent and afflictive com- 
panions, and most cruel enemies, of merit and 
solitary genius. 

Not to speak of the obstacles which oppose the 
progress of an inventor encumbered with his re- 
jects and his wants, before he reaches the anti- 
chamber of the rich, or the noble whom it may be 
necessary to persuade, suppose these obstacles 
overcome, and that he is admitted to their pre- 
sence; how will the poor inventor, the necessi- 
tous man of genius behave when he has arrived 



B.IV. Ch. XVI.— RATES OF INTEREST— EVILS, &c. 329 

there? Oftentimes he will lose his presence of 
mind, forget what he was about to say, stammer 
out some unconnected propositions, and finding 
himself despised, indignant that his merit should 
be thus treated, he will retire, resolving never 
again to expose himself to such an adventure ; 
and even when he is not devoid of courage, there 
is nothing more different, though in certain points 
the connection may appear most intimate, than 
the talent of conceiving new ideas of certain kinds, 
and the talent of developing these same ideas: 
altogether occupied with the idea itself, the in- 
ventor is most frequently incapable of directing 
his attention to all the accessories which must be 
re-united before his invention can be understood 
and approved ; his attention being entirely occu- 
pied with what is passing in his own mind, he is 
incapable of attending to what passes in the minds 
of others; incapable of arranging and directing his 
operations, so that he may make the most favour- 
able impression upon them. 

Thus the ingenious philosopher, who has deli- 
vered the most. excellent instructions respecting 
the art of developing the thoughts of others, and 
who possessed in so perfect a degree the talent of 
developing his own, well knew how necessary it 
was, that in every career of invention, except 
that of eloquence, minds should be attended by 
an accoucheur. How many difficulties did not 
Diderot experience in eflFecting this development, 
he who possessed this talent in so excellent a 
degree, where the two parties^were agreed, had a 
common interest and were equally well disposed ! 
How numerous were the difficulties experienced by 
the ingenious artists of every description to whom 
he applied in making liim comprehend the fruits 



330 y^lV. Cm. XVI.— RATES OF INTSRBST— EVILS, Ac 

of their studies, whe^i they had for their interpre- 
ter the mao the most capable and the best dis-^ 
posed to understand them ! How much more 
difficult would they have found it had they been 
applicants for the assistance necessary to render 
their projects available to a rich ignoramus, filled 
with the idea of the necessity which existed for 
his assistance, and puffed up with that pride 
which commonly accompanies wealth, when un- 
attended by that politeness which education 
teaches, and full of that distrust which a poor 
projector cannot fail to inspire in the mind of an 
individual favoured with the gifts of fortune ! 

Should the inventor succeed in making his plan 
understood, he will still find it difficult to make 
the interest of the capitalist accord with his de- 
sires : it is in this respect that the prohibition 
displays its mischievous qualities. How shall 
the poor inventor dare to propose a loan at the 
ordinary rate of interest ? This rate may at all 
times be obtained without risk. Where then 
would be the advantage to the capitalist in such a 
bargain ? Is it possible that it could be otherwise 
than disadvantageous to him ? A loan at the or- 
dinary rate of interest cannot be hoped for ; it is 
only to a most intimate friend that such a loan 
would be granted. Deprived of this resource, 
how shall he dare to propose to the individual 
whose assistance he seeks, to expose himself to 
the rigour of the laws ? Scarcely daring to ask 
for the assistance he needs, upon the most secure 
and unexceptionable conditions, how shall he pro- 
pose conditions which the laws consider criminal } 
Whilst there are laws against usury, it may be 
said, thqre will still be usury. Yes, and whilst 
there are laws against theft, there will still be 



B.IV. Ch.XVL^RATES of INTBREST— EVIL3, &c. 331 

thieves : does it follow that the laws which forbid 
theft are without effect, and that theft is as com* 
mon as if these laws did not exist ? 

In the same proportion as the tendency of these 
prohibitory laws is unfavourable to true merit in 
the career of invention, is it favourable to the 
cheat which assumes the appearance of merit, 
were it only by the advantage given to imposture^ 
by preventing merit from entering into the com- 
petition. The essential requisite is not merit, but 
the gift of persuasion : this gift most naturally 
belongs to the superficial man, who knows the 
world, half enthusiast and half rogue; and not to 
the studious and laborious individual, who is 
only acquainted with th^ abstract subjects of his 
studies. It is true, that at all times truth po8«> 
sesses powerful advantages ; but these advantages 
are less in proportion as the career to which it 
relates is more removed from the ordinary routine, 
respecting which, ordinary minds are capable of 
forming a judgment upon what is presented to 
them. It has therefore happened, that of all pro- 
jectors, those have been treated with the greatest 
^confidence, whose projects are now known to have 
been founded upon no basis of truth. Were it 
possible to ascertain the amount furnished under 
the existing laws against usury by capitalists, to 
the authors of useful and practicable projects, it 
would most probably be found less than the 
amount which in the same space of time has been 
drawn by the professors of alchemy from the ava- 
ricious credulity of the ignorant or half learned. 

Truth possesses, however, this advantage over 
error of every kind : it will ultimately prevail, 
fcow freqUeiit or how deplorable soever may have 
been the'di$gtaces it has undergone. This error 
respecting prohibitory laws is nearly discredited ; 



&!¥. Cn^XVL— Si^IES OF OmSBST— EVILS, Ac 

this soofoe of ddaskm is nearly closed fin* ever. 
As the world advances, the snares, the traps, the 
pitfidls, which inexperience has found in the path 
of inventive indostrj, will be filled op by the 
fortunes and the mincb of those who have fallen 
into them and been mined : in this, as in every 
other career, the ages gone by have been the 
forlorn hope, which has received for those who 
follow them the blows of fortune. There is not 
one reason for hoping less well of future projects 
than of those which are passed ; but here is one 
for hoping better. 

The more closely the reasons, on account of 
which Adam Smith would have desired to dis- 
courage projectors, are examined, the more asto- 
nishing it appears that he should have so widely 
deviated from the principles he had himself laid 
down. It is probable, that his imagination had 
been pre-occupied with the idea of certain incau- 
tious or dishonest projectors, the history of whose 
proceedings had fallen under his own observation, 
and that he had a little too promptly taken these 
few individuals as exact models of the whole race. 
To preserve himself from the error of too hasty 
and indiscriminate generalizations, never to allow 
any proposition to escape without having made 
all the reservations necessary to confine it within 
the limits of the exact truth, is the last boun- 
dary, and even now the ideal boundary of human 
wisdom.* 



• Adam Smithy after having read the letter upon Projects, 
which was addressed to him^ and printed at the end of the 
first edition of " The Defence of Usury/* declared to a gen- 
tleman, the common friend of the two authors, that he had 
been deceived. With the tidings of his death, Mr. Bentham 
received a copy of his works, which had been sent to him as a 
token of esteem. 



B.IV. Ch. XVI.— RATES OF INTEREST— EVILS, Ac. 333 

Nothing would more contribute to the prelimi- 
nary separation of useless from useful projects, 
and to secure the labourers in the hazardous routes 
of invention from failure, than a good treatise upon 
projects in general. It would form a suitable ap-* 
pendix' to the judicious and philosophical work of 
the abb^ Condillac upon Systems. What this is 
in matters of theory, the other would be in matters 
of practice. The execution of such a work might 
be promoted by the proposal of a liberal reward for 
the most instructive work of this kind. 

A survey might be made of the different branches 
of human knowledge ; and what each presents as 
most remarkable in this respect might be brought 
to view. Chemistry has its philosopher's stone ; 
medicine its universal panacea ; mechanics its 
perpetual motion ; politics, and particularly that 
part which regards finance, its method of liqui-^ 
dating, without funds and without injustice, na- 
tional debts. Under each head of error, the in- 
superable obstacles presented by the nature of 
things to the success of any such scheme, and the 
illusions which may operate upon the human 
mind to hide the obstacles, or to nourish the ex- 
pectation of seeing them surmounted, might be 
pointed out. 

Above all, dishonest projectors, impostors of 
every kind, ought to be depicted : the qualities of 
mind and character which they possess in common 
should be described ; their volubility, their rapi- 
dity, that lightness, natural or affected, with which 
they treat the arguments opposed to them; that 
manner which they have, and which it is neces- 
sary they should have, of declaiming, instead 
of analysing and reasoning ; of flying off in tan- 
gents when they are pressed — ^of giving birth to 
incidents ; of pretending to be tired with the spe- 



334 B. IV. Cb. X VI.— RATES.OP INTEREST^ BVILS, &c. 

cies of opposition they experieDce; of attaching 
themselves to the manner in which questions and 
doubts, or arguments, are. proposed to them, in-* 
stead of ta the foundations of things themselves; 
of complaining of the prejudices which they pre- 
tend are experienced against them ; and in quit-* 
ting the ground under those circumstances, in 
which, if they were sincere, it would be most 
proper for them to maintain themselves there. 

But throughout the whole work, that tone of 
malignity, which seems to triumph in the disgraces 
of genius, and which seeks to envelop wise, 
useful, and successful projects, in the contempt and 
ridicule with which useless and rash projects are 
justly covjered, should be guarded against. Such 
is the character, for example, of the works of the 
9plenetic Swift : under the pretence of ridiculing 
projectors, he seeks to deliver up, to the contempt 
of the ignorant, the sciences themselves. They 
were hateful in his eyes on two accounts: the one 
because he was unacquainted with them; the 
other, because they were the work, and the glo- 
rious work, of that race which he hated ever since 
' he had lost the hope of governing part of it. 

The projectors who seek to deceive ought to 
be unmasked; those who are deceivedv to be in- 
structed: the interestsofscience and justice equally 
demand that they should be: distinguished. I 
cannot discern what purpose ridicule can serve, if 
it be not to confound the distinction between 
useless and useful projectors. 

In conclusion^ some general counsels might be 
added for the use of those who, little versed in 
the fundamental sciences in which the respective 
projects take their rise, may find themselves in a 
situation to be addressed by the author of- a pro- 
ject, with the design of obtaining their assistance. 



JB.IV. Ch. XVI.— RAXES OF INTEREST-DEVILS, Ac. 336 

In effect, it is true that the whole work would be 
a. collection of more or less approved counsels ; 
but, in making the recapitulation, some general 
remarks might be added, which would not have 
been suitable elsewhere, but which might be par- 
ticularly useful here. They might, for example, 
be advised to apply to those learned individuals 
who would be able to supply their ignorance : the 
class of learned men who ought to be found com- 
petent judges in each department might be pointed 
out. Instructions might be furnished to enable 
them to judge of the counsels of the judges them- 
selves, by warning them of the interests and pre- 
judices, to the seduction of which these judges 
may themselves be exposed. 



APPENDIX. 



(A.) Book I. ch. viii. p. 62. 

On Subscriptions io Matters of Opinion, 

Of the two English Universities, Oxford is the most 
ancient and most dignified. Of its numerous statutes 
which are penned in Latin, as many as fill a moderate 
duodecimo volume are published, as the title page de- 
clares, for the use of youth : and of these care is taken> 
(for the honour of the government let it be spoken) that 
those, for whose observance they are designed, shall not, 
without their own default, be ignorant : since, at every 
man's admission, a copy is put into his hands. All these 
statutes, as well those that are seen as those that are not 
seen, every student at his admission is sworn in Latin to 
observe, " So help me God," says the matriculated per- 
son, *' touching as 1 do the most holy Gospel of Christ."* 

The barbers, cooks, bed-makers, errand-boys, and other 
unlettered retainers to the university, are sworn in En- 
glish to the observance of these Latin statutes. The 
oath thus solemnly taken there has not, we may be ., 
morally certain, for a course of many generations, per- 
haps from the first era of its institution, been a single 
person that has ever kept. Now, though customary, it is 
perhaps not strictly proper, as it tends to confusion and 

* Tu fidem dabis ad observandum omnia statuta, privllegia, et con- 
suetudio^s bujus universitatis Oxon, Ita te Deus adjuvet, tactis sacro 
Sanctis Cbristi evang^eliis. — ParechoUe siveJSxeerpia t Corpore Statutoru^,- 
p. 3iyO,Oxon. 1756. 

22 



<. 



338 APPENDIX. 

On Suhscr^tUms to Matters of Opinion, 

to false estimates, to apply the term perjury, without dis- 
tinction, to the breach oi an assertive and to that of a pro- 
missive declaration — to the breach of an oath and to that of 
a vow, and to brand with the same mark of infamy a solemn 
averment, which at the time of making it was certainly 
false, — and a single departure from a declared resolution, 
which at the time of declaring it might possibly have 
been sincere.* But, if they themselves are to be believed 
who have made the oath, and who break it, — the university 
of Oxford, for this century and half has been, and at 
the time I am writing is, a commonwealth of perjurers* 
The streets of Oxford, said (the first) Lord Chatham 
once, " are paved with disaffection." That weakness is 
outgrown : but he might have added then (if that had 
been the statesman's care) and any one may add still, 
" and with perjury." The face of this, as of other pros- 
titutions, varies with the time : purjurers in their youth, 
they become suborners of perjury in their old age. 

It should seem that there was once a time, when the 
persons subjected to this yoke, or some one on their be- 
nalf, began to murmur : for, to quiet such murmurs, or at 
«[ny rate to anticipate them, — a practitioner, of a faculty 
now extinct, but then very much in vogue, — a physician 
of the soul, a casuist, was called in. His prescription, at 
the end of every one of these abridged editions of th6 
statutes; his prescription, nndevthetitle of Ejpinomis seu 
explanatioJuramenti,Sfc. stands annexed .+ This casuist is 
kind enough to inform you, that though you have taken 
an oath indeed, to observe all these statutes-^and that 
without exception, yet, in ninety-nine instances out of a 
hundred, it amounts to nothing. What, in those instances 
you are bound to do is — not to keep your oath, but to 
take your choice whether you will do that or suffer — 
not to do what jou are bid ; but, if you happen to be 
found out (for this proviso, I take for granted, is to be 
supplied) to bear the pendty. For — ^what now do you 
think your sovereign seriously wishes you to do, when he 

* " Statuimus,** say these reverend legislators, " idque sub poena per* 
jurii," in a multitude of places. 

f The title at length is Ejnnomis seu Expianatio JuramenH quod de 
tihservandis Statutis UniversiiaHs a sinptUs prmttari solet: quatemu 
scilicet, seu quousguc ohUgare jurcmtes eensendum est. 






APPENDIX. 339 

On Subscriptions to Matters of Opinion. 

forbids you to commit murder? that you should abstain 
from murder at all events? No surely; but that, if you 
happen to be found out and convicted, you should sit 
quiet while the halter is fitted to your neck. 

Who is this casuist, who by his superior power 
washes away the guilt from puijury, and controuls the 
judgments of the Almighty? Is it the legislator himself ? 
By no means. That indeed might ms£e a difference. 
The sanction of an oath would then not with certainty be 
violated ; it would only with certainty be profaned. It 
was a Bishop Saunderson, who in the bosom of a Pro- 
testant church, before he was made a bishop, had set up 
a kind of confessional box, whither tender consciences 
repaired from all parts to heal their scruples. 

This institution, whether it were the fruit of blind- 
ness or of a sinister policy, has answered in an admira- 
ble degree some, at least, of the purposes for which it 
was probably designed. It has ariven the consciences 
of the greater part of those by whom the efficient parts 
of government are one day to be filled, into a net, of 
which the clergy hold the cords. The fear and shame of 
every young man of sense, of spirit, and reflection, on 
whom these oaths are imposed, must at one time or 
other take the alarm. What! says he to himself, am I a 

Eerjurer? If he asks his own judgment, it condemns 
im. What then shall he do ? Perjury, were it only for 
the shame of it, is no light matter : if his education has 
been ever so loose, he has frequently heard it condemned ; 
if strict and virtuous, he has never heard it mentioned 
without abhorrence. But, when he thinks of the guilt of it, 
hell yawns under his feet. What then shall he do i Whither 
then shall he betake himself? He flies to his revei;end in- 
structors in a state of desperation. " These men are older 
than myself," says he, " they are more learned, they are 
therefore wiser : on them rests the charge of my education. 
My own judgment, indeed, condemns me ; but my own 
judgment is weak and uninformed. Why may not I trust to 
others ? See, their hands are outstretched to comfort me ! 
Where can be the blame in listening to them ? in being 
guided by them ? in short, in surrenaering my judgment 
into their hands ? Are not they my ruleys, my instructors ? 

22. 



340 APPENDIX. 

On Subscriptions to Matters of Opinion. 

the very persons whom my parents have appointed to 
take charge of me, to check my presomption, and to in- 
form my ignorance? What obligation am I under, nay 
what liberty have I to oppose my feeble lights to theirs ? 
Do they not stand charged with the direction of my con- 
science? charged by whatsoever I ought to hold most sa- 
cred? Are they not the ministers of God's word? the depo- 
sitaries of our holy religion ? the very persons, to whose 
guidance I vowed, in the person of my godfathers and 
godmothers, to submit myself, under the name of my 
spiritual pastors and masters? And are they not able 
and willing to direct me ? In all matters of conscience> 
then, let me lay down to myself the following as inviolable 
rules : — ^not to be governed by my own reason j not to 
endeavour at the presumptuous and unattainable merit of 
consistency ; not to consider whether a thing is right or 
wrong in itself, but what they think of it. On all points 
then let me receive my religion at their hands ; what to them 
is sacred, let it to me be sacred ; what to them is wicked- 
ness, let it to me be wickedness ; what to them is truth, let 
it to me be tr^th; let me see as they see, believe as they 
believe, think as they think, feel as they feel, love as they 
love, fear as they fear, hate as they hate, esteem as they 
esteem, perform as they perform, subscribe as they sub- 
scribe, and swear as they swear. With them is honour, 
peace, and safety ; without them, is ignominy, contention, 
and despair." Such course must every young man, who 
is brought up under the rod of a technical religion^ dis- 
tinct from morality and bestrewed ^ith doubts and dan- 
gers, take on a thousand occasions, or run mad. To 
whom else should he resort for counsel? to whom else 
should he repair? To the companions of his own ag€? 
They will laugh at him, and call him methodist : for 
many a one who dreads even hobgoblins alone, laughs at 
them in company. To their friends and relations who 
are advanced in life, and who live in the world ? The 
answer they get from them, if they are fortunate enough 
to get a serious one, is — that in all human establishments 
there are imperfections ; but that innovation is dangerous, 
and reformation can only come from above : that young 
men are apt to be hurried away by the warmth of their 



APPENDIX. 341 

On Subscriptions to Matters of Opinion. 

temper^ led astray by partial views of things, of which 
they are unable to see the whole : that these effusions of 
self-sufficiency are much better repressed than given 
way to : that what it is not in our power to correct, it 
were better to submit to without notice : that prudence 
commands what custom authorises — to swim quietly with 
the stream : that to bring matters of religion upon the 
carpet, is a ready way to excite either aversion or con- 
tempt : that humanity forbids the raising of scruples 
in the breasts of the weak, — good humour, the bringing 
up of topics ^hat are austere, — good manners, topics 
that are disgusting: that policy forbids our offending 
the incurious with the display of our sagacity, the 
ignorant with the ostentation of our knowledge, the 
loose with the example of our integrity, and the power- 
ful with the noise of our complaints : that, with regard 
to the point in question, oaths, like other obligations, 
are to be held for sacred or insignificant, according to the 
fashion: that perjury is no disgrace, except when it 
happens to be punished : and that, as a general rule, it 
concerns every man to know and to remember, as he 
tenders his peace of mind and his hopes of fortune, that 
there are institutions, which though mischievous are not 
to be abolished, and though indefensible are not to be 
condemned. 

A sort of tacit convention is established : " give your 
soul up into my hands — I ensure it from perdition. Surely 
the terms, on your part, are easy enough : exertion there 
needs none: all that is demanded of you is — to shut 
your eyes, ears, lips, and to sit quiet. The topic of 
religion is surely a forbidding enough, as well as a for- 
bidden topic : all that you have to do then, is to thipk 
nothing aoout the matter ; look not into, touch not the 
ark of the Lord, and you are safe." 



(B.) Book I. ch. viii, p. 62; 

Mischievofisness of Reward latent — Exemplifications, 

When a reward is groundless, it may be either simply 
groundless, or positively mischievous : the act, which it 



342 APPENDIX. 

MUchievoumeu o/* Reward latent — ExempU/kations. 

is employed to produce, may be either simply useless, or 
pernicious. 

It would be a nugatory lesson to say, that reward should 
not be applied to produce any act, of which the tendency 
is acknowledged to be pernicious : and this, whether 
such act have been aggregated to the number of offences 
or not. The only cases which it can be of any use, in 
this point of view, to mention, are those in which the 
miscnievousness of the act, or the tendency of the re- 
ward to produce it, is apt to lie concealed. 

To begin with the cases, which come under the former 
of these descriptions : those in which the mischievousness 
of the act is apt to lie concealed. One great class of pub- 
lic services, for which rewards have been or might be 
offered, are those which consist in the extension of 
knowledge, or according to the more common, though 
obscure and imposing phrase, the discovery and propa- 
gation of truth. Now there is one way in which rewards 
offered for the propogation of truth (that is, of what is 
looked upon, or professed to be looked upon, as truth) 
cannot but have a pernicious tendency: and that of 
whatever nature be the proposed truth. A point being 
proposed, concerning which men in general are thought 
to be ignorant or divided, if a man sincerely desired 
that the truth relative to that point should be as- 
certained, and in consequence of that desire is content 
to furnish the expense of a reward, the natural course 
is— to invite men to the enquiry. "How stands the 
matter? Which of the two contradictory propositions is 
the true one?" To a question of some such form as this, 
he requires an answer. The service then to which he 
annexes his reward, is the giving an answer to a ques- 
tion ; such an answer as upon examination shall appear 
to be a true one, or to come nearest to the truth. The 
tendency of a reward thus offered, to produce the disco- 
very of the truth, is obvious : the tendency of it will, at 
least, be to produce the discovery of what to him, who puts 
in for the reward, shall appear to be truth. What else should 
it tend to produce ? My aim being to establish what to 
you shall appear to be the truth, what other means have 
I of doing this, but by advancing what appears to me to 



APPENDIX. 343 

MiscMevousness of Reward latent — Exempiyicatums, 

be so? Accordingly, thus to apply the reward, is to pro- 
mote a sincere and impartial enquiry, and to pursue the 
best, and indeed only course that by meajis of artificial 
reward can be pursued for promoting real knowledge. 

Another course, which has been sometimes taken, 
is — to assume the truth of the one of two contradictory 
propositions, that may be framed concerning apy object 
of enquiry, — ^and to make the demonstration of tne truth 
of that proposition the condition of the reward. In this 
course the tendency of the reward is pernicious* The 
habit of veracity is one of the ^reat supports of human 
society : a virtue which in point of utili^ ought to be, 
and in point of fact is, enforced in the highest degree by 
the moral sanction. To imdermine that habit, is to un- 
dermine one of the principal supports of human society. 
The tendency of a reward thus offered is to undermine 
this virtuous habit, and to introduce the opposite vi- 
cious one. The tendency of it may be to produce what 
is called logical truth, or not> as may happen : but it is, 
at any rate, to produce ethical falsehooa : it may tend 
to promote knowledge or error, as it may happen ; but it 
tends, at any rate, to promote mendacity^ The proposition 
either is true or it is false : and, be that as it may, men 
are either agreed about its being true, or they are not. 
In as far as they are agreed, the reward is useless ; in as 
far as they are not, it tends to make them act as if they 
were, and is pernicious. 

It may be said — no : all that it tends to do, at least all 
that it is designed to do, is to call forth such, and such 
only, whose opinion is really in favour of the proposition, 
and to put them upon giving their reasons for it : it is not 
to corrupt their veracity, but to overcome their indolence. 
But whatever may be the design, the former is in fact 
its tendency. On the one side, mey have reward to urge 
them; on the other, they have impunity to permit them. 
For, when a man declares that his opinions on a given 
subject are so and so, who can say that they are other 
wise ? Who can say with certainty, what are a man's 
private opinions? And, if the effect is bad, what si^ifies 
the intention? Or how, indeed, can the intention be 



344 APPENDIX. 

MischievauM€8S of Reward latent— Exemplifications, 

pure, if it be seen that the effect is likely to be a bad 
one? 

Thus would it standi were it doubtful whether there 
are any persons or no, whose unbiassed opinions are on 
the opposite side to that on which the demonstration is 
sought to be procured. But the case always is, that it 
is dear there are such persons: that it is the very per- 
suasion of there being such, that is the cause of offering 
the reward; and that the more numerous they are, the 
more likely it is to be offered, and the greatef it is likely 
to be. Such then is the danger of promoting mendacity : 
to avoid which danger, it may be laid down in short terms, 
as a general rule, that Reward should be given, not for de- 
monstration, but for enquiry. 

More than this, a reward thus applied tends always, in 
a certain degree, to frustrate its own purpose ; and is so far, 
not only inefficacious, but efficacious on the other side. It 
does as good as tell mankind — that, in the opinion of him 
at least by whom the reward is offered, the probability 
is, that men's opinions are most likely to be on the op- 
posite side; and in so far gives them reason to think, 
that the truth is also on that opposite side . " People in 
general," a man will naturally say to himself, *' are not of 
this way of thinking: if they were, what need of all this 
pains to make them so ?" This then affords another rea- 
son why reward should be given — not for demonstration 
but for enquiry. 

Such, accordingly, has been the course pursued in 
relation to almost every branch of science, or supposed 
science. The science, or supposed science of divinity, 
furnishes exceptions, which are perhaps the only ones. 
What should we say to a man who should seek to pro- 
mote physical knowledge by such devices ? What should 
we say to a man, who instead of setting men honestly 
and fairly to enquire whether, in regard to living powers, 
for example, the momentum were in the simple or in the 
duplicate proportion of the velocity ; whether heat were 
a substance, or only a quality of other substances ; whe- 
ther blunt or pointed conductors of electricity were the 
safest; should pay them for endeavouring to prove — that 



APPENDIX. 345 

Mischievimsness of Reward latent — Exemplifications, 

in living forces, the momentum is in the simple proporti6n 
only, that heat is only a quality, and that blunt con- 
ductors are the safest? 

In divinity, however, examples of this method of ap- 
plying reward are frequent. 

It may be said, that an exception ought to be made 
from the rule, in the cases wherein, whichever side the 
truth may be, the utility is clearly on the side thus 
favoured. Thus, there is use, for instance, in the people's 
believing in the being and attributes of a God : and that 
even in a political view, since upon that depends all the 
assistance which the political can derive from the reli^- 
ous sanction : and that there can be no use in their dis- 
believing it. That there is use again, in the people's 
believing in the truth of the Jewish prophecies ; since 
upon that depends one argument in favour of the truth 
of that history, the truth of which is one main ground of 
men's expectation of the rewards and punishments be- 
longing to that sanction. This observation certainly 
deserves great attention. It exhibits a reason whicn 
diere may be for making an exception to the rule. It 
does not, however, invalidate the arguments adduced, 
as above, in favour of it : it does not disprove the pro- 
bability of the mischiefs on the apprehension of which 
it is grounded. What it does, is to exhibit a benefit as to 
acting in balance against these inconveniences. If then 
the interests of religion be at variance with those of 
virtue, and it be necessary to endanger the one, in 
order to promote the efficacy of the otner^ — so then it 
must be. 

It is to be observed, that all the advantage which can 
accrue to* the cause from this manoeuvre, is composed of 
the difference between what it may derive from these 
hireling advocates, and what, were there no such artifi- 
cial encouragement given, it would derive from volun- 
teers. On this head it may be worth considering, whether 
the calling forth of the one does not contribute to pre- 
vent the enlistment of the other. " What need is there 
for me, a stranger, to give myself the trouble, when there 
are so many others whose particular business it is, and 
who are so well paid for it?" Of this sort is the language. 



346 APPENDIX. 

j9fticAi0iM)iMfieii of Reward laient^^ExempU/ieatunu. 

which a man will very naturally hold with himself on 
such occasions. 

A strange circumstance it would be indeed, — and one 
which would afford no very favourable presumption 
either of the truth or of the utility of the cause which it 
is meant to favour, — ^if all the unbiassed suffrages of 
any considerable majority in number or value of the 
thinking men should, if left to themselves, be on the op- 

Eosite side. Great, indeed, must be the penury of un- 
ought advocates, that can make it advantageous, — I do 
not say merely to the cause of truth, but to any cause, 
however wide of the truth, — to apply to mercenaries for 
assistance. Of how little weight the suffrages of the 
latter are in comparison of those of the former, — let any 
one judge, who has observed the superior eclSlt with 
which the work of a layman is received, when it hap- 
pans to be on the side of orthodoxy. 

But, however the matter may stand with regard to 
questions of political importance, in which utility is 
clearly on one side, — ^whatever reason there be for violating 
the law of impartiality in this case, it ceases altogether 
when applied to the merely speculative points, which form 
the matter of those articles of faith, to which, on a variety 
of occasions, subscriptions or other testimonies of accep- 
tation are required. These will serve as one set of in- 
stances of the other branch of the cases, where the mis- 
chievous effects of reward are apt to lie concealed : viz. 
where, in the case of a line of conduct produced by 
a reward, apparent or no, the tendency of the reward 
to produce it is apt not to be apparent at first glance ; 
inasmuch as it may escape observation, that the ad- 
vantage held forth acts to this purpose in the capacity* 
of a reward. 

For an emolument to operate in the capacity of a 
reward, so as to give birth to action of any kind, it is not 
necessary that it should be designed so to do. When- 
ever any such connexion is established, between emolu- 
ment on the one part, and a man's conduct on the other, 
that by acting in any manner, he sees that he acquires an 
emolument, or chance of emolument, which without 
acting in such manner he could not have> — the view of 



APPENmx* 347 

JkOtckievousneu of Reward laten^-^ExemplifieatUma. 

such emolument will operate on him in the capacity of a 
reward. It matters not^ whether it be the sole act which 
is to entitle him to the reward^ or only one act amongst 
many. It matters not, whether it be the act to which me 
reward is professedly annexed, or any other act of which 
no mention is made. It may not be held up to view in 
that character : it may even be not held up to view at all. 
In this unconspicuous way an emolument may operate, and 
in a thousand instances does operate, in the capacity of 
a reward, on a long and indefinite course of action; in 
short, on the business of a whole life. Whenever, on the 
part of the same person, two acts are so connected, that 
the performance of the one is necessary to his having it 
in his power to perform the other, a reward annexed 
to the latter operates eventually as if annexed to the 
former; and, whether designedly or not, it promotes 
the production of the one act as much as of the other. 
In this case, the having performed the i)rior act is 
said to be a qualification for the being permitted to per- 
form the posterior. • The emolument annexed to the act 
professedly rewarded, is therefore, in this case, as much a 
reward for assuming the qualification, as a reward for 
performing the act, for the performance of which a man 
is required to qualify himself by the performance of the 
other. 

In England (for I will go no farther) the subscribing a 
declaration of this sort is made a qualification for many of 
the principal emoluments to which a man can aspire : for 
every preferment in the church; for the liberty of engag- 
ing in the instruction of youth ; for admission to the 
benefits of tliat mode of education which is looked upon 
as most liberal and advantageous, and thereby to the 
enjoyment, or the chance of the enjoyment of any one of 
that ample stock of emoluments, which have been pro- 
vided in the view of inducing young persons to put 
themselves in the way of that favourite mode of educa- 
tion. The articles, or propositions, to which this sub- 
scription is required, are termed Articles of Religion^ 
By subscribing to these articles a man declares, that he 
believes the truth of certain facts which they aver. 
Among these facts there are many, which, whether true 



348 APPENDIX. 

Miichievoumeu of Reward latent- — ExemplificatiofU, 

or not (a point which is nothing to the present purpose^ 
are plainly, in a political view^ of no sort of importance 
whatsoever. I say of no importance ; since they con- 
tribute nothing to the furnishing either of any motive ta 
prompt to action, or of any rule or precept to direct it. 
Be they true, or be they false, — nothing is to be done in 
consequence ; nothing to be abstained from. 

The mischievous tendency, which the giving a reward 
has in this case, is much more palpable tnan what it has 
in the other ; because the probability of its giving birth 
to falsehood is the greater. 

1 • In the case of demonstrative lectures, all that it is 
absolutely necessary a man should do, is — simply to state 
the arguments, in mvour of the proposition in question ; 
he does not necessarily assert his own belief of the truth of 
it. " Such are the reasons," he may say, "which induce 
other people, and which, if attended to, may perhaps in- 
duce you jto believe it : whether they are conclusive * or 
not, it lies upon you to judge: as to myself, whether I my- 
self believe it or no, is another matter. . I do not tell you : 
I am not bound to tell you." In the case of subscrip- 
tion, he directly, plainly, and solemnly says — I believe it. 

2. In the next place, the probability of falsehood is 
much greater in this case than in the other. In the case 
of demonstrative lectures, men are reasoned with, lest 
otherwise they should not believe. In the case of sub- 
scriptions, men are rewarded for subscribing, because it 
is known many do not believe. Had men never disbe- 
lieved or doubted, they never would have been called 
upon to subscribe. It would have been useless and 
needless ; nor would any one have thought of it. 

Those who are inclined to place in the most favour- 
able point of view the political efficacy of subscriptions 
to such articles, have called diem articles of peace: as if 
there were nothing more in saying, I believe this propo- 
sition, than in saying, I engage not to say anything that 
tends to express a disbelief of it. 

They would have been much better named had they 
been termed articles of war » 

In regard to speculative opinions, there are but two 
cases in which men can be said to be at peace :— when 



APPENDIX. 349 

Misthiev&umess of Reward latent'-^Exemplifications. 

they think about it, and are of the same opinion ; and 
when they think nothing about the matter : unless we 
reckon as a third, that of their thinking about it, and 
differing about it, and not caring about the diflPerence. 
That the expedient in question has no tendency to pro- 
mote peace of the first kind has been already shown. It 
is equally clear, that it has none to produce peace of 
either of the two other kinds. The tendency of it is just 
the contrary. If left to himself, there is not one person 
in a hundred who would ever trouble himself about the 
matter. Of this we may be pretty certain. What motive 
should he have? What should lead him to it? What 
pleasure or what profit is there to be got by it? If left 
then to themselves, the bulk of mankmd, — or, to speak 
more properly, the bulk of those whom it is proposed 
thus to discipline, — ^would think nothing about the matter. 
They would therefore be in a state of the profoundest 
and most lasting peace. If this should not be granted, 
at least it will be granted, that it would be possible for 
them to be so. Subscriptions render it impossible. For 
making peace between men, subscriptions are just the 
same sort of recipe, that it would be for making peace 
between two mastiffs, to set a bone before them, and then 
tie them to the same stake. 

When both parties are at liberty, both parties are at 
their ease, and there is peace between them. But when 
the stronger party says to the weaker,-^" Stand forth and 
lie in the sight of God, or give up the choicest advantages 
of society, that we may engross them to ourselves,*' what 
sort of peace is it that can subsist between them ? Just 
that sort of peace which subsists between the house- 
breaker and the householder, when the one has bound 
the other hand and foot and gagged him. It is not to be 
denied, but that there may be some sort of uneasiness 
between them in the first-mentioned state of things : to 
wit, where, neither of them being sacrificed, they are both 
at liberty, and both of them protected. But what sort of 
uneasiness is this ? Just that sort of uneasiness which 
may, perhaps, subsist between two neighbours, at the 
thoughts that neither of them can break into the other^s 
bouse. Against this sort of uneasiness, peace, it must be 



350 APPENDIX. 

Mischievcumess of Reward latent^-^Exempl^icdiiom. 

confessed, affords no remedy: but^ from the possibility 
of there subsisting this sort of uneasiness between two 
neighbours, or two nations, who ever thought of speaking 
of them as not being at peace? 

If this method of insuring peace were good in one 
case, how should it be otherwise in any other? Religion, 
or rather the nonaense which has been grafted on it — 
(for, the part that is capable of being made useful is not 
thus exposed to controversy) — ^reli^ion, I say, is not 
the only topic which has given rise to controversy. 
So long as there is any man whose knowledge falls 
short of omniscience, and whose faculties are liable 
to error, men will have their differences : they will 
differ about matters of jud^ent, and about matters of 
taste : about the sciences, aoout the arts, about the ordi- 
nary occurrences of life : in short, about everything 
which has a name. It would then be making peace among 
the lovers of music to make them swear, oefore God, 
that they think the Italian style, or that they think the 
French style of music is the more pleasing: among the 
lovers of heroic poetry, that they tnink it best in Hank 
verse^ or that they think it best in rhyme : among the 
lovers of dramatic poetry, that the unities of time and 
place may be dispensed with, or that they must^ at any 
rate, be observed. It would be making peace between 
an affectionate pair, to question them about every pos- 
sible point of domestic management^ till some slight 
diversity were found in thoir opmions, and then force 
one of them to swear, before God, that he was convinced 
his own opinion was the wrong one. It would be making 

peace*^ but surely by this time, the pacific tendency of 

this policy must be sufficiently understood. 

Another mischievous effect of this policy is the ten- 
dency it hsts to vitiate the understanding. Over a man's 
genuine opinion, such forms, it has oeen shown, can 
have no influence : either his veracity must give way, or 
his understanding, or both : he must deceive either him- 
self or others. A deceit of some kind or other he must 
put on somebody ; either on himself or others. There 
is one thing which a man cannot do ; that is, destroy the 
force of arguments which are aetually present to his 



APPENDIX. 361 

Mischievousnesi rf Rekftird Udeiit-^ExempiykaikmB. 

mind. There is another thing which he is enabled to do 
in a great measure; that is^ keep them from getting 
ther6. This, accordingly, is what, if the consciousness 
of falsehood sits uneasy on him, he will labour to do 
with all his might. To believe, is not in his power: 
for, when all the arguments that have ever been urged, or 
can be devised in favuur of the proposition, are col- 
lected and applied to his mind, and make no impression, 
what help is there? What may perhaps be in his 
power, is — ^not to disbelieve : and that, if possible, he will 
do. But thus to shut the right eye, if one may so say, 
of the understanding, and keep open only the left, is not 
the work of a minute nor of an hour. He must make 
many ineffectual attacks, and return as often to the 
charge. He must wage war against the stubbornness of 
the understanding : he must bring it under the dominion 
of the affections. He must debilitate its powers : he must 
render it incapable of placing, in a clear lignt, the difference 
betweert right and wrong. In a word, he must instil into 
his mind a settled habit of partiality and bad reasoning : 
a habit of embracing falsehood with facility, and regard- 
ing truth, not with indifference merely, but with sus- 
picion, in the apprehension of being brought by it into 
trouble. 

One might imagine, that it could not have both these 
bad effects at once : that if it have the one, it cannot 
have the other: if a man disbelieves, his understanding, — 
if he believes, his morals, — ^are yet safe. But, whoever 
thinks thus is led away by words: he'does noi. understand 
aright the workings of the human mind. He supposes 
the mind fixed as between two rocks : whereas it is per- 
petually shaken, and tossed about, as by a thousand waves. 
He supposes a man at all times perfectly conscious of 
the state of his own mind : and aware of the momenta 
and directions of the incessantly fluctuating forces that 
are operating on him. But this is not the case with one 
man in a million, in an^ the least de^ee : nor perhaps 
with any man in perfection. Thus it is also with hypo- 
crisy and fanaticism : it might naturally be imagined, 
that the one excludes the other; but repeated expe- 
rience, and long continued observation, have at length 



C- 



352 APPENDIX. 



Mitduevoutnea of Reward latent — Exempiykatiaiu. 

opened the eyes of most men upon that head : and it 
seems now to be pretty generally understood, that these 
two seemingly incompatible bad qualities are found fre- 
quently in Sie same receptacle. 



THE END. 



LONDON ! 

PRINTED nV C. H. RRYNELL, BROAD STREET, GOLDEN SQUAR£« 







3 2044 058 228 156 



The borrower must return this item on or before 
the last date stamped below. If another user 
places a recall for this item, the borrower will 
be notified of the need for an earlier return. 

Non-receipt of overdue notices does not exempt 
the borrower from overdue fines. 



Harvard College Widener Library 
Cambridge, MA 02138 617-495-2413 




Please handle with care. 

Thank you for helping to preserve 
library collections at Harvard. 




